UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
Form 10-K
(Mark one)
☒    ANNUAL  REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the fiscal year  ended December  31, 2022
or
☐    TRANSITION REPOR T PURSUANT  TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF  THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT  OF 1934
For the transition period fr om to
Commission file number: 001-33156
First Solar , Inc.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delawar e 20-4623678
(State or other jurisdiction of incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification No.)
350 West Washington Str eet, Suite 600
Tempe , Arizona  85288
(Address of principal executive offices, including zip code)
(602) 414-9300
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which registered
Common stock, $0.001 par value FSLR The NASDAQ Stock Market LLC
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:
None
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.  Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.  Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the
preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past
90 days.  Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation
S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such files).  Yes ☒   No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting company, or an emerging
growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of
the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐ Non-accelerated filer ☐
Smaller reporting company ☐ Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised
financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of its internal control over
financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit
report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Act).  Yes ☐   No ☒
The aggregate market value of the registrant’s common stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant as of June 30, 2022, the last business day of the registrant’s most
recently completed second fiscal quarter, was approximately $7.2 billion (based on the closing price of the registrant’s common stock on that date). As of February
24, 2023, 106,609,094 shares of the registrant’s common stock, $0.001 par value per share, were outstanding.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
The information required by Part III of this Form 10-K, to the extent not set forth herein, is incorporated by reference from the registrant’s definitive proxy statement
relating to the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held in 2023, which will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission within 120 days after the end
of the fiscal year to which this Form 10-K relates.
FIRST SOLAR, INC.
FORM 10-K FOR THE YEAR ENDED DECEMBER 31, 2022
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Page
PART I
Item 1. Business 3
Information about Our Executive Officers 15
Item 1A. Risk Factors 18
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments 40
Item 2. Properties 40
Item 3. Legal Proceedings 40
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures 40
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 41
Item 6. Reserved 42
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 42
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 59
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 61
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 61
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures 61
Item 9B. Other Information 62
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections 62
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance 63
Item 11. Executive Compensation 63
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 63
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 64
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 64
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 65
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary 124
Signatures 125
Throughout this Annual Report on Form 10-K, we refer to First Solar, Inc. and its consolidated subsidiaries as “First Solar,” “the
Company,” “we,” “us,” and “our.” When referring to our manufacturing capacity, total sales, and solar module sales, the unit of
electricity in watts for megawatts (“MW”) and gigawatts (“GW”) is direct current (“DC” or “”) unless otherwise noted. When
referring to projects or systems, the unit of electricity in watts for MW and GW is alternating current (“AC” or “”) unless
otherwise noted.DC
AC
Table of Contents
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended (the “Exchange Act”), and the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”), which are subject to
risks, uncertainties, and assumptions that are difficult to predict. All statements in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, other than
statements of historical fact, are forward-looking statements. These forward-looking statements are made pursuant to safe harbor
provisions of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. The forward-looking statements include statements, among
other things, concerning: effects resulting from certain module manufacturing changes; our business strategy, including anticipated
trends and developments in and management plans for our business and the markets in which we operate; future financial results,
operating results, revenues, gross margin, operating expenses, products, projected costs (including estimated future module
collection and recycling costs), warranties, solar module technology and cost reduction roadmaps, restructuring, product reliability,
investments, and capital expenditures; our ability to continue to reduce the cost per watt of our solar modules; the impact of public
policies; the potential impact of legislation intended to encourage renewable energy investments through tax credits; our ability to
expand manufacturing capacity worldwide; the impact of supply chain disruptions, which may affect the procurement of raw
materials used in our manufacturing process and the distribution of our modules; research and development programs and our
ability to improve the wattage of our solar modules; sales and marketing initiatives; and competition. In some cases, you can
identify these statements by forward-looking words, such as “estimate,” “expect,” “anticipate,” “project,” “plan,” “intend,” “seek,”
“believe,” “forecast,” “foresee,” “likely,” “may,” “should,” “goal,” “target,” “might,” “will,” “could,” “predict,” “continue,”
“contingent,” and the negative or plural of these words, and other comparable terminology.
Forward-looking statements are only predictions based on our current expectations and our projections about future events. All
forward-looking statements included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K are based upon information available to us as of the
filing date of this Annual Report on Form 10-K and therefore speak only as of the filing date. You should not place undue reliance
on these forward-looking statements. We undertake no obligation to update any of these forward-looking statements for any reason,
whether as a result of new information, future developments, or otherwise. These forward-looking statements involve known and
unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause our actual results, levels of activity, performance, or achievements to
differ materially from those expressed or implied by these statements. These factors include, but are not limited to:
•structural imbalances in global supply and demand for photovoltaic solar modules;
•the market for renewable energy, including solar energy;
•our competitive position and other key competitive factors;
•the reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, policies, and support programs for solar energy projects
and other renewable energy projects;
•the impact of public policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules;
•the passage of legislation intended to encourage renewable energy investments through tax credits, such as the Inflation
Reduction Act of 2022;
•our ability to execute on our long-term strategic plans, including our ability to secure financing;
•our ability to execute on our solar module technology and cost reduction roadmaps;
•our ability to incorporate technology improvements into our manufacturing process, including the production of bifacial
solar modules and next generation Series 7 modules;
1
Table of Contents
•our ability to improve the wattage of our solar modules;
•interest rate fluctuations and our customers’ ability to secure financing;
•the loss of any of our large customers, or the ability of our customers and counterparties to perform under their contracts
with us;
•the severity and duration of public health threats (including pandemics such as COVID-19), including its potential impact
on the Company’s business, financial condition, and results of operations;
•the satisfaction of conditions precedent in our sales agreements;
•our ability to attract new customers and to develop and maintain existing customer and supplier relationships;
•our ability to construct new production facilities to support new product lines;
•general economic and business conditions, including those influenced by U.S., international, and geopolitical events;
•environmental responsibility, including with respect to Cadmium Telluride and other semiconductor materials;
•claims under our limited warranty obligations;
•changes in, or the failure to comply with, government regulations and environmental, health, and safety requirements;
•effects arising from and results of pending litigation;
•future collection and recycling costs for solar modules covered by our module collection and recycling program;
•supply chain disruptions, including demurrage and detention charges;
•our ability to protect our intellectual property;
•our ability to prevent and/or minimize the impact of cyber-attacks or other breaches of our information systems;
•our continued investment in research and development;
•the supply and price of components and raw materials, including Cadmium Telluride;
•our ability to attract and retain key executive officers and associates; and
•all other matters discussed in Item 1A. “Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, our
subsequently filed Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q, and our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission
(the “SEC”).
You should carefully consider the risks and uncertainties described under this section.
2
Table of Contents
PART I
Item 1. Business
Company Overview
We are a leading American solar technology company and global provider of photovoltaic (“PV”) solar energy solutions.
Developed at our research and development (“R&D”) labs in California and Ohio, we manufacture and sell PV solar modules with
an advanced thin film semiconductor technology that provide a high-performance, lower-carbon alternative to conventional
crystalline silicon PV solar modules. From raw material sourcing through end-of-life module recycling, we are committed to
reducing the environmental impacts and enhancing the social and economic benefits of our products across their life cycle. We are
the world’s largest thin film PV solar module manufacturer and the largest PV solar module manufacturer in the Western
Hemisphere.
In addressing the overall global demand for electricity, our modules provide energy at a lower levelized cost of electricity
(“LCOE”), meaning the net present value of a system’s total life cycle costs divided by the quantity of energy that is expected to be
produced over the system’s life, when compared to traditional forms of energy generation. With over $1 billion in cumulative R&D
investments in the last 10 years alone, we have a demonstrated history of innovation and continuous improvement. We believe our
strategies and points of differentiation provide the foundation for our competitive position and enable us to remain one of the
preferred providers of PV solar modules.
Business Strategy
Advanced Module Technology
Our current module semiconductor structure is a single-junction polycrystalline thin film that uses Cadmium Telluride (“CdTe”) as
the absorption layer. CdTe has absorption properties that are well matched to the solar spectrum and can deliver competitive
wattage using approximately 2% to 3% of the amount of semiconductor material used to manufacture conventional crystalline
silicon modules. In terms of performance, in many climates our solar modules provide certain energy production advantages
relative to competing crystalline silicon modules. For example, our CdTe solar technology provides:
•a superior temperature coefficient, which results in stronger system performance in typical high insolation climates as the
majority of a system’s generation, on average, occurs when module temperatures are well above 25°C (standard test
conditions);
•a superior spectral response in humid environments where atmospheric moisture alters the solar spectrum relative to
standard test conditions;
•a better partial shading response than competing crystalline silicon technologies, which may experience significantly
lower energy generation than CdTe solar technologies when partial shading occurs; and
•an immunity to cell cracking and its resulting power output loss, a common failure often observed in crystalline silicon
modules caused by poor manufacturing, handling, weather, or other conditions.
In addition to these technological advantages, we also warrant that our solar modules will produce at least 98% of their labeled
power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage reducing by a degradation factor between 0.3% and 0.5%,
depending on the module series, every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years. As a
result of these and other factors, our solar modules can produce more annual energy in real world operating conditions than
conventional crystalline silicon modules with the same nameplate capacity.
3
Table of Contents
Manufacturing Process
Our modules combine our leading-edge CdTe technology with the manufacturing excellence and quality control that comes from
being the world’s most experienced producer of thin film PV solar modules. With more than 50 GW of modules sold worldwide,
we have a demonstrated history of manufacturing success and innovation. Our global manufacturing footprint includes facilities in
the United States, Malaysia, and Vietnam. We are in the process of expanding our manufacturing capacity by approximately 11
GW, including the construction of our third manufacturing facility in the United States, which commenced commercial
production of modules in early 2023; our first manufacturing facility in India, which is expected to commence operations in the
second half of 2023; our fourth manufacturing facility in the United States, which is expected to commence operations in late 2024;
and the expansion of our manufacturing footprint at our existing facilities in Ohio. Our newest factory in the United States began
producing and our newest factory in India is expected to produce our next generation Series 7 modules, which combine our thin
film CdTe technology with a larger form factor and an innovative steel back rail mounting structure that reduces module installation
time.
Our modules are manufactured in a high-throughput, automated environment that integrates all manufacturing steps into a
continuous flow process. Such process eliminates the multiple supply chain operators and resource-intensive batch processing steps
that are used to produce crystalline silicon modules, which typically occur over several days and across multiple factories. At the
outset of our module production, a sheet of glass enters the production line and in a matter of hours is transformed into a completed
module ready for shipment.
This proprietary production process includes the following three stages: (i) the deposition stage, (ii) the cell definition and
treatment stage, and (iii) the assembly and test stage. In the deposition stage, panels of transparent oxide-coated glass are
robotically loaded onto the production line where they are cleaned, laser-mark identified with a serial number, heated, and coated
with thin layers of CdTe and other semiconductor materials using our vapor transport deposition technology, after which the
semiconductor-coated plates are cooled rapidly to increase glass strength. In the cell definition and treatment stage, we use high-
speed lasers to transform the large continuous semiconductor coating on the glass plate into a series of interconnected cells that
deliver the desired current and voltage output. In this stage, we also treat the semiconductor film using certain chemistries and
processes to improve the device’s performance and apply a metal sputtered back contact. In the assembly and test stage, we apply
busbars, inter-layer material, and a rear glass cover sheet that is laminated to encapsulate the device. We then apply anti-reflective
coating material to the substrate glass to further improve the module’s performance by increasing its ability to absorb sunlight.
Finally, junction boxes, termination wires, and a frame are applied to complete the module assembly.
We maintain a robust quality and reliability assurance program that monitors critical process parameters and measures product
performance to ensure that industry and more stringent internal standards are met. We also conduct acceptance testing for electrical
leakage, visual quality, and power measurement on a solar simulator prior to preparing a module for shipment. Our quality and
reliability tests complement production surveillance with an ongoing monitoring program, subjecting production modules to
accelerated life stress testing to help ensure ongoing conformance to requirements of the International Electrotechnical Commission
and Underwriters Laboratories Inc. These programs and tests help assure delivery of power and performance in the field with a
high level of product quality and reliability.
Research and Development
Our R&D model differentiates us from much of our competition due to its vertical integration, from advanced research to product
development, manufacturing, and applications. We continue to devote substantial resources to our R&D efforts, which generally
focus on continually improving the wattage and energy yield of our solar modules. We also have R&D programs to improve
module durability and manufacturing efficiencies, including throughput, volume ramp, and material cost reduction. We continue to
invest significant financial resources in such initiatives, including approximately $0.3 billion for a dedicated R&D facility in the
United States to support theDC
DC
4
Table of Contents
implementation of our technology roadmap. We expect such R&D facility to feature a high-tech pilot manufacturing line, allowing
for the production of full-sized prototypes of thin film and tandem PV modules. Such R&D facility is expected to be completed in
2024. Based on publicly available information, we are one of the leaders in R&D investment among PV solar module
manufacturers.
In the course of our R&D activities, we explore various technologies in our efforts to sustain competitive differentiation in our
modules. We primarily conduct our R&D activities and qualify process and product improvements for full production at our
Perrysburg, Ohio plant and systematically deploy them to our other facilities. We believe that our systematic approach to
technology change management enables continuous improvements and ensures uniform adoption across our production lines. In
addition, our production lines are replicas or near replicas of each other and, as a result, a process or production improvement on
one line can be rapidly and reliably replicated across other production lines.
We regularly produce research cells in our laboratories, some of which are tested for performance and certified by independent labs,
such as the National Renewable Energy Laboratory. Cell efficiency measures the proportion of light converted to electricity in a
single solar cell at standard test conditions. Our research cells are produced using laboratory equipment and methods and are not
intended to be representative of our manufacturing capability. Our module conversion efficiency has improved on average more
than half a percent every year for the last ten years. We currently hold two world records for CdTe PV cell efficiency, achieving an
independently certified research cell efficiency of 22.1% and a module aperture area efficiency of 19.7%. We continue to evaluate
opportunities to develop and leverage other solar cell technologies in multi-junction applications consisting of CdTe, silicon, or
other materials. We believe such applications have the potential to enable our module conversion efficiency to reach 28% by 2030.
Sustainability
We are committed to enhancing the social and economic benefits of our products and reducing our carbon footprint, even as we
continue to increase our manufacturing capacity and module throughput. Our thin film modules are manufactured through an
integrated process that uses less energy, water, and semiconductor material than conventional crystalline silicon modules.
Accordingly, our modules provide an ecologically leading solution to address climate change, energy security, and water scarcity.
On a lifecycle basis, our thin film module technology has the fastest energy payback time, smallest carbon footprint, and lowest
water use of any competing PV solar technology.
The energy payback time of our module technology, which is the amount of time a module must operate to generate the energy
required to produce it, is facilitated by our proprietary and resource efficient production process. Our module energy payback time
is approximately four months, which represents a 90-fold energy return on investment over a theoretical 30-year system lifetime
and an abundant net energy gain to the electricity grid. Furthermore, our modules have a carbon footprint that is 2.5 times lower
and a water footprint that is three times lower than conventional crystalline silicon modules, measured on a lifecycle basis that
accounts for the energy and water used for the raw materials, throughout our manufacturing process, and during end-of-life module
recycling. In addition, our industry-leading PV solar module recycling process further enhances our sustainability advantage by
recovering approximately 90% of the glass for reuse in new glass container products and over 90% of the semiconductor material
for reuse in new modules. The module frame is removed and recycled for reuse in aluminum products, and in Malaysia, the
recovered laminate material is reused in rubber products. We are the only PV solar module manufacturer with global in-house
recycling capabilities.
Our Series 6 (“Series 6”) and Series 6 Plus (“Series 6 Plus”) modules are the world’s first and only PV products to be included
in the Electronic Product Environmental Assessment Tool (“EPEAT”) Registry’s Photovoltaic Modules and Inverters product
category. The EPEAT Registry enables the identification of credible sustainable electronic products from a broad range of
manufacturers based on several factors, including the management of substances in the product, manufacturing energy, water use,
product packaging, end-of-life recycling, corporateTM TM
5
Table of Contents
responsibility, and human rights. We have also committed to the RE100 campaign, a collaborative, global initiative of influential
businesses committed to 100% renewable electricity, in which we plan to utilize renewable sources to power our manufacturing
operations by 2028. We have set science-based targets to reduce our absolute direct (scope 1) and indirect (scope 2) greenhouse gas
emissions by 34% by 2028, from a 2020 baseline, and achieve net zero emissions by 2050. As a result of these commitments and
our engagement with key suppliers to minimize the carbon footprint of our module components, we expect to reduce our module
carbon footprint by more than 65% by 2028, further enabling our customers to achieve their sustainability objectives.
Financial Stability
In addition to our sustainability commitments, we are also committed to creating long-term shareholder value through a decision-
making framework that delivers a balance of growth, profitability, and liquidity. This framework has enabled us to fund our module
manufacturing and capacity expansion initiatives primarily using cash flows generated by our operations and by maintaining
appropriate debt levels based on cash flow expectations. Our financial stability provides strategic optionality as we evaluate how to
invest in our business and generate returns for our shareholders. Our financial stability also enables us to offer meaningful
warranties, which provide us with a competitive advantage relative to many of our peers in the solar industry. Furthermore, we
expect our financial discipline and ability to manage operating costs to enhance our profitability as we continue to scale our
business.
Market Overview
Solar energy is one of the fastest growing forms of renewable energy with numerous economic and environmental benefits that
make it an attractive complement to and/or substitute for traditional forms of energy generation. In recent years, the cost of
producing electricity from PV solar power systems has decreased to levels that are competitive with or below the wholesale price of
electricity in many markets. This price decline has opened new possibilities to develop systems in many locations with limited or
no financial incentives, thereby promoting the widespread adoption of solar energy. Other technological developments in the
industry, such as the advancement of energy storage capabilities, have further enhanced the prospects of solar energy as an
alternative to traditional forms of energy generation. In addition to these economic benefits, solar energy has substantial
environmental benefits. For example, PV solar power systems generate no greenhouse gas or other emissions and use minimal
amounts of water compared to traditional energy generation assets. As a result of these and other factors, worldwide solar markets
continue to develop and expand.
Recently enacted government support programs, such as the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (the “IRA”), have contributed and are
expected to continue to contribute to this momentum by providing solar module manufacturers, project developers, and project
owners with tax incentives to accelerate the ongoing transition to clean energy. The provisions of the IRA are generally effective for
tax years beginning after 2022 and, based on recent U.S. Treasury Department estimates, are expected to provide aggregate funding
of $369 billion to address climate change, of which $270 billion is expected in the form of various tax incentives. Among other
things, the IRA (i) reinstates the 30% investment tax credit for qualifying solar projects that meet certain wage and apprenticeship
requirements, (ii) extends the production tax credit (“PTC”) to include energy generated from solar projects, (iii) provides
incremental investment and production tax credits for solar projects that meet certain domestic content and location requirements,
and (iv) offers tax credits for solar modules and solar module components manufactured in the United States and sold to third
parties. In light of such regulatory developments, we have commenced certain manufacturing expansion activities and continue to
evaluate opportunities for future expansion, particularly within the United States, as described below under “Global Markets.” For
more information about certain risks associated with the IRA, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – We expect certain financial benefits as a
result of tax incentives provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. If these expected financial benefits vary significantly from
our assumptions, our business, financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.”
6
Table of Contents
Although module average selling prices in many global markets have declined for several years, recent module spot pricing has
increased, in part, due to trade measures and policies, government regulations, raw material availability, and supply chain
disruptions. For example, module spot pricing in the United States has increased, in part, due to elevated commodity and logistics
costs and, more recently, due to the rising demand for modules manufactured in the United States as a result of the IRA described
above. The duration of this elevated period of pricing is uncertain. In light of such market realities, we continue to focus on our
strategies and points of differentiation, which include our advanced module technology, our manufacturing process, our R&D
capabilities, the sustainability advantage of our modules, and our financial stability.
Global Markets
We have established and continue to develop a global business presence. Energy markets are, by their nature, localized, with
different drivers and market forces impacting electricity generation and demand in a particular region or for a particular application.
Accordingly, our business is evolving worldwide and is shaped by the varying ways in which our modules can provide compelling
and economically viable solutions to energy needs in various markets. We are currently focusing on markets, including those listed
below, in which our CdTe solar modules provide certain advantages over conventional crystalline silicon solar modules, including
high insolation climates in which our modules provide a superior temperature coefficient, humid environments in which our
modules provide a superior spectral response, markets that favor the superior sustainability profile of our PV solar technology, and
markets that value responsible sourcing through transparent supply chain reporting and ethical business practices. To the extent our
production capacity expands in future periods, we have the potential to extend our focus to additional geographic markets.
United States. Multiple markets within the United States, which accounted for 84% of our 2022 net sales, exemplify favorable
characteristics for a solar market, including (i) sizeable electricity demand, particularly around growing population centers and
industrial areas; (ii) strong demand for renewable energy generation; and (iii) abundant solar resources. In those areas and
applications in which these factors are more pronounced, our PV solar modules compete favorably on an economic basis with
traditional forms of energy generation. The market penetration of PV solar is also impacted by certain federal and state support
programs described below under “Support Programs.” The United States currently has an installed solar generation capacity of
approximately 140 GW, which is expected to double by 2027 due, in part, to the economic incentives provided by the IRA. In
addition, the government has established a net-zero carbon emissions target by 2050. As a result of such market opportunities and
renewable targets, we are in the process of expanding our U.S. manufacturing capacity by approximately 7.7 GW, including the
construction of our third manufacturing facility in the U.S., which commenced commercial production of modules in early 2023,
our fourth manufacturing facility in the U.S., which is expected to commence operations in late 2024, and the expansion of our
manufacturing footprint at our existing facilities in Ohio.
India. India continues to represent one of the largest and fastest growing markets for PV solar energy with an installed generation
capacity of approximately 63 GW, approximately 30 GW of projects under various stages of construction, and over 19 GW
of new projects being contracted under active procurement programs. In addition, the government has established aggressive
renewable energy targets, which include increasing the country’s overall renewable energy capacity to 500 GW by 2030 and
establishing a net-zero carbon emissions target by 2070. Based on these targets, it is projected that the installed solar energy
generation capacity will be 350 GW by 2030. The government has also announced a series of policy and regulatory measures to
incentivize domestic manufacturing of PV solar modules, as described below under “Support Programs.” These targets, policies,
and regulatory measures are expected to help create significant and sustained demand for PV solar energy. In addition to these
factors, our CdTe solar technology is well suited for the India market given its hot and humid climate conditions. As a result of such
market opportunities, we are in the process of expanding our manufacturing capacity by an additional 3.3 GW by constructing
our first manufacturing facility in India, which is expected to commence operations in the second half of 2023. Such expansion
builds upon our existing presence of approximately 2.2 GW of modules sold in India.DC
DC
AC AC AC
AC
AC 
DC
DC
7
Table of Contents
Europe. Most markets across Europe reflect strong demand for PV solar energy due to its ability to compete economically with
more traditional forms of energy generation and, more recently, as a means to establish greater energy independence. During 2022,
European Union (“EU”) member states added a combined 41 GW of solar capacity, representing the largest annual solar
deployment in the region in the last 10 years. Such expansion, which was primarily driven by solar capacity additions in Germany,
Spain, Poland, the Netherlands, and France, brings the region’s installed generation capacity to approximately 209 GW. We
continue to pursue module sales activities in many of the countries mentioned above.
Support Programs
Although we compete in markets that do not require solar-specific government subsidies or support programs, our net sales and
profits remain subject to variability based on the scope of tax and production incentives, renewable portfolio standards, tendering
systems, and other policies or support programs intended to stimulate economies, achieve decarbonization initiatives, and/or
establish greater energy independence. Such programs continue to influence the demand for PV solar energy around the world.
United States. In the United States, support programs exist at both the federal and state levels and can take the form of investment
and production tax credits, sales and property tax exemptions and abatements, and/or renewable energy targets. Such incentives
include the following:
•Advanced Manufacturing Production Credit. In August 2022, the U.S. President signed the IRA into law, which is
intended to accelerate the country’s ongoing transition to clean energy. The provisions of the IRA are generally effective
for tax years beginning after 2022. As discussed above, the IRA offers various tax credits, including the advanced
manufacturing production credit, pursuant to Section 45X of the Internal Revenue Code (the “IRC”), for solar modules
and solar module components manufactured in the United States and sold to third parties. Such credit, which may be
refundable or transferable to a third party, is available through 2032, subject to phase down beginning in 2030. For eligible
components, the credit is equal to (i) $12 per square meter for a PV wafer, (ii) 4 cents multiplied by the capacity of a PV
cell, and (iii) 7 cents multiplied by the capacity of a PV module. Such credit is expected to increase domestic
manufacturing of solar modules and solar module components in the near term. For more information about certain risks
associated with the benefits available to us under the IRA, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – We expect certain financial
benefits as a result of tax incentives provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. If these expected financial benefits
vary significantly from our assumptions, our business, financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely
affected.” For more information about pending and ongoing developments related to the IRA, see Item 7. “Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations - Certain Trends and Uncertainties.”
•Investment Tax Credit. At the federal level, investment tax credits for business and residential solar systems have gone
through several cycles of enactment and expiration since the 1980s. The current federal energy investment tax credit
(“ITC”) for solar energy property requires projects to meet certain wage and apprenticeship requirements and to have
commenced construction by a certain date, which may be achieved by certain qualifying procurement activities. In 2020,
the U.S. Congress extended the 26% ITC through 2022 as part of its COVID-19 relief efforts, and such credit was
scheduled to step down to 22% for projects that commence construction in 2023. However, during 2022, the U.S.
Congress reinstated the 30% ITC through 2032 as part of the IRA discussed above. Such credit is currently scheduled to
step down to 26% for projects that commence construction in 2033, 22% for projects that commence construction in 2034,
and will expire thereafter. The ITC has been an important economic driver of solar installations and qualifying
procurement activities in the United States, and its extension is expected to contribute to greater long-term demand. The
positive impact of the ITC depends on the availability of tax equity for project financing or the ability to transfer the ITC
to other taxpayers.DC
DC
8
Table of Contents
•R&D grants. In July 2022, the U.S. Department of Energy Solar Energy Technologies Office announced the 2022 Solar
Manufacturing Incubator Funding Opportunity, which provides up to $27 million for qualifying solar R&D projects,
particularly those related to CdTe. These grants are intended to accelerate and expand domestic solar R&D to strengthen
U.S. solar manufacturing and contribute to renewable energy targets. Award recipients are expected to be announced in
early 2023.
•Renewable portfolio standards. Many states have enacted legislation adopting Renewable Portfolio Standard (“RPS”)
mechanisms. Under an RPS, regulated utilities and other load serving entities are required to procure a specified
percentage of their total retail electricity sales to end-user customers from eligible renewable resources, such as solar
energy generation facilities, by a specified date. For example, California’s RPS program, which is one of the most
significant in the United States in terms of the volume of renewable electricity required to meet its RPS mandate, currently
requires utilities and other obligated load serving entities to procure 60% of their total retail electricity demand from
eligible renewable resources by 2030 and 100% of such electricity demand from carbon-free resources by 2045. Some
programs may further require that a specified portion of the total percentage of renewable energy must come from solar
generation facilities or other technologies. RPS mechanisms and other legislation vary significantly from state to state,
particularly with respect to the percentage of renewable energy required to achieve the state’s RPS, the definition of
eligible renewable energy resources, and the extent to which renewable energy credits qualify for RPS compliance.
India. In India, incentives at both the federal and state levels have contributed to growth in domestic PV solar module
manufacturing and solar energy installations. Such incentives include the following:
•Production Linked Incentive. In September 2022, the Indian government announced an expansion of the Production
Linked Incentive (“PLI”) scheme to INR 195 billion ($2.6 billion), which is intended to promote the manufacturing of
high efficiency solar modules in India and to reduce India’s dependency on foreign imports of solar modules. Under the
PLI scheme, manufacturers are selected through a competitive bid process and receive certain cash incentives over a five-
year period following the commissioning of their manufacturing facilities. Among other things, such incentives are based
on the efficiency and temperature coefficient of the modules produced, the proportion of raw materials sourced from the
domestic market, the extent to which the manufacturer’s operations are fully integrated within India, and the quantity of
modules sold from such manufacturing operations.
•Import duty tariffs. In April 2022, the Indian government began imposing import duty tariffs of 40% on solar modules and
25% on solar cells. In connection with such tariffs, the Indian government has also implemented a regulation mandating
that any solar project with federal utility, state utility, or commercial and industrial off-takers that interconnects through
government owned transmission lines only use solar modules from an approved list of module manufacturers, and a
requirement that all federal procurement of solar modules be only from cells and modules produced domestically.
•Green hydrogen targets. In January 2023, the Indian government announced its National Green Hydrogen Mission
(“NGHM”), which is intended to make India a hub for the production and export of green hydrogen and to contribute to
the broader energy transition from fossil fuels to renewable energy sources. The NGHM provides for an initial outlay of
approximately $225 million for pilot projects and R&D, which, among other program investments, is expected to result in
5 million metric tons of annual green hydrogen production capacity and 125 GW of incremental renewable energy
capacity, among other initiatives, by 2030. The Ministry of New and Renewable Energy (“MNRE”) will be responsible for
overall coordination and implementation of the NGHM, including formulating programs for financial incentives, and other
central and state government agencies will be responsible for implementing various policies, regulations, and compliance
standards.AC
9
Table of Contents
Europe. In Europe, renewable energy targets, in conjunction with tenders for utility-scale PV solar and other support measures,
have contributed to growth in PV solar markets. Renewable energy targets prescribe how much energy consumption must come
from renewable sources, while incentive policies and competitive tender policies are intended to support new supply development
by providing certainty to investors. Such targets and policies include the following:
•REPowerEU plan. In May 2022, the European Commission set forth its REPowerEU plan, which aims to reduce
dependence on Russian fossil fuels by 2027. The REPowerEU plan supports the EU’s rapid deployment of renewable
energy sources, including solar energy, as a means to establish greater energy independence. Such plan sets forth targets
for all EU member states, which includes an EU energy mix with a 45% share of energy from renewable sources by 2030.
Solar targets for the same period include 300 GW installed by 2025 and 600 GW by 2030. The REPowerEU plan also
aims to facilitate solar deployment through easier access to land and a framework to expedite permitting at national and
local levels.
•Renewable energy tenders. Certain markets in Europe, such as France, have adopted regulations for public tenders of
renewable energy to prioritize PV solar power systems that utilize solar modules produced in low-carbon manufacturing
processes. Such regulations require developers to provide information about the carbon footprint of PV solar modules used
in their utility-scale projects and precludes the use of module technology that does not meet certain minimum carbon
footprint thresholds.
Various proposed and contemplated environmental and tax policies may create regulatory uncertainty in the renewable energy
sector, including the solar energy sector, and may lead to a reduction or removal of various clean energy programs and initiatives
designed to curtail climate change. For more information about the risks associated with these potential government actions, see
Item 1A. “Risk Factors – The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives,
renewable energy targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or the impact of other public policies, such as
tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar
modules and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our operating
results.”
Modules Business
Our primary segment is our modules business, which involves the design, manufacture, and sale of CdTe solar modules, which
convert sunlight into electricity. Since the inception of First Solar, our modules have used our advanced thin film semiconductor
technology. Each of our currently produced Series 6 and Series 6 Plus modules is a glass laminate approximately 4ft x 6ft in size
that encapsulates thin film semiconductor materials. Our Series 7 modules, which we began producing in early 2023 at our newest
manufacturing facility in the U.S. and expect to begin producing in India in the second half of 2023, are expected to have a larger
form factor of approximately 4ft x 7ft in size. At the end of 2022, our modules had an average power output of 467 watts.
Raw Materials
Our module manufacturing process uses approximately 30 types of raw materials and components to construct a solar module,
including CdTe, front glass coated with transparent conductive oxide, other semiconductor materials, organics such as photo resist,
tempered back glass, frames, packaging components such as interlayer, cord plate/cord plate cap, lead wire, and solar connectors.
Before we use these materials and components in our manufacturing process, a supplier must undergo rigorous qualification
procedures, and we continually evaluate new suppliers as part of our cost reduction roadmap and expansion activities. When
possible, we attempt to use suppliers that can provide a raw material supply source that is near our manufacturing locations,
reducing the cost and lead times for such materials. For more information about the risks associated with our supply chain, see Item
1A. “Risk Factors – Several of our key raw materials and components are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number
ofAC AC
10
Table of Contents
suppliers, and their failure to perform could cause manufacturing delays and impair our ability to deliver solar modules to
customers in the required quality and quantities and at a price that is profitable to us.”
Customers
Our customers include developers and operators of systems, utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial
companies, and other system owners. During 2022, our third-party module sales represented approximately 93% of our total net
sales, and we sold the majority of our solar modules to developers and operators of systems in the United States. During 2022,
Intersect Power, Lightsource BP, and NextEra Energy each accounted for more than 10% of our modules business net sales. For
more information about risks related to our customers, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – The loss of any of our large customers, or the
inability of our customers and counterparties to perform under their contracts with us, could significantly reduce our net sales and
negatively impact our results of operations.
We continue to focus on certain key geographic markets, particularly in areas with abundant solar resources and sizable electricity
demand, and additional customer relationships to diversify our customer base. The wholesale commercial and industrial market
continues to represent a promising opportunity for the widespread adoption of PV solar technology as corporations undertake
certain sustainability commitments. The demand for corporate renewables continues to accelerate, with corporations worldwide
committing to the RE100 campaign. We believe we also have a competitive advantage in the commercial and industrial market due
to many customers’ sensitivity to the sustainability, experience, and financial stability of their suppliers and geographically diverse
operating locations. With our sustainability advantage, financial strength, and global footprint, we are well positioned to meet these
needs.
Additionally, the increase of utility-owned generation has expanded the number of potential buyers of our modules as such utility
customers benefit from a potentially low cost of capital available through rate-based utility investments. Given their long-term
ownership profile, utility-owned generation customers typically seek to partner with stable companies that can provide low-cost
alternatives to or replacements for aging fossil fuel-based generation resources, including reliable PV solar technology, thereby
mitigating their long-term ownership risks.
Competition
The solar energy and renewable energy sectors are highly competitive and continually evolving as participants in these sectors
strive to distinguish themselves within their markets and compete within the larger electric power industry. Among PV solar
module manufacturers, the principal method of competition is sales price per watt, which may be influenced by several module
value attributes, including wattage (through a larger form factor or an improved conversion efficiency), energy yield, degradation,
sustainability, and reliability. Sales price per watt may also be influenced by warranty terms and customer payment terms. We face
intense competition for sales of solar modules, which may result in reduced selling prices and loss of market share. Our primary
source of competition is crystalline silicon module manufacturers, the majority of which are linked to China. Allegations of forced
labor in the Chinese solar supply chain have emerged in recent years, which means we also compete on our approach to responsible
sourcing and supply chain due diligence. Our differentiated technology, integrated manufacturing process, and tightly controlled
supply chain helps limit the risks associated with outsourcing and the multiple supply tiers of conventional crystalline silicon
module manufacturing.
We also expect to compete with future entrants into the PV solar industry and existing market participants that offer new or
differentiated technological solutions. For additional information, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Our failure to further refine our
technology and develop and introduce improved PV products, including as a result of delays in implementing planned
advancements, could render our solar modules uncompetitive and reduce our net sales, profitability, and/or market share.”
11
Table of Contents
Certain of our existing or future competitors, including many linked to China, may have direct or indirect access to sovereign
capital or other forms of state support, which could enable such competitors to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for
sustained periods of time. Our results of operations could be adversely affected if competitors reduce module pricing to levels
below their costs, bid aggressively low prices for module sale agreements, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating
margins for sustained periods of time. We believe the solar industry may experience periods of structural imbalance between supply
and demand, which could lead to periods of pricing volatility. For additional information, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Competition
in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense and could remain that way for an extended period of time. The
solar industry may experience periods of structural imbalance between global PV module supply and demand that result in periods
of pricing volatility, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.”
Solar Module Warranties
We provide a limited PV solar module warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship under normal use and service
conditions for up to 12.5 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with agreed-upon specifications will
produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage reducing by a
degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years. Among other
things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking. For additional information on our
solar module warranty programs, refer to Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Problems with product quality or performance may cause us to
incur significant and/or unexpected contractual damages and/or warranty and related expenses, damage our market reputation, and
prevent us from maintaining or increasing our market share.”
Solar Module Collection and Recycling
We are committed to mitigating the environmental impact of our products over their entire life cycle. As part of such efforts, we
offer recycling services to help module owners meet their end-of-life (“EOL”) obligations. In 2005, we voluntarily established the
industry’s first global and comprehensive module collection and recycling program, and in 2013 we implemented a “pay-as-you-
go” recycling service. We continue to invest in module recycling technology improvements to increase recycling efficiency and
reduce recycling prices for our customers. Our module recycling process is designed to maximize the recovery of materials,
including the glass and encapsulated semiconductor material, for use in new modules or other products and enhances the
sustainability profile of our modules. Approximately 90% of each collected First Solar module can be recycled into materials for
reuse. We currently operate recycling facilities at our manufacturing sites in the United States, Malaysia, and Vietnam and at our
former manufacturing facility in Germany.
For certain legacy customer sales contracts that were covered under the 2005 module collection and recycling program, which has
since been discontinued, we agreed to pay the costs for the collection and recycling of qualifying solar modules, and the end users
agreed to notify us, disassemble their solar power systems, package the solar modules for shipment, and revert ownership rights
over the modules back to us at the end of the modules’ service lives.
For modules covered under our program that were previously sold into and installed in the EU, we continue to maintain a
commitment to cover the estimated collection and recycling costs consistent with our historical program. The EU’s Waste Electrical
and Electronic Equipment (“WEEE”) Directive places the obligation of recycling (including collection, treatment, and
environmentally sound disposal) of electrical and electronic equipment products upon producers and is applicable to all PV solar
modules in EU member states. As a result of the transposition of the WEEE Directive by the EU member states, we have adjusted
our recycling offerings, as required, to ensure compliance with specific EU member state WEEE regulations.
12
Table of Contents
Intellectual Property
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to maintain and protect our proprietary technology and to conduct our business without
infringing on the proprietary rights of others. We rely primarily on a combination of patents, trademarks, and trade secrets, as well
as associate and third-party confidentiality agreements, to safeguard our intellectual property. We regularly file patent applications
to protect inventions arising from our R&D activities in the United States and other countries. Our patent applications and any
future patent applications may not result in a patent being issued with the scope of the claims we seek, or at all, and any patents we
may receive may be challenged, invalidated, or declared unenforceable. In addition, we have registered and/or have applied to
register trademarks and service marks in the United States and a number of foreign countries for “First Solar.”
With respect to proprietary know-how that is not patentable and processes for which patents are difficult to enforce, we rely on,
among other things, trade secret protection and confidentiality agreements to safeguard our interests. We believe that many
elements of our PV solar module manufacturing processes, including our unique materials sourcing, involve proprietary know-how,
technology, or data that are not covered by patents or patent applications, including technical processes, equipment designs,
algorithms, and procedures. We have taken security measures to protect these elements. Our R&D personnel have entered into
confidentiality and proprietary information agreements with us. These agreements address intellectual property protection issues
and require our associates, to the extent permitted by law, to assign to us all of the inventions, designs, and technologies they
develop during the course of their employment with us that are directed towards our actual or anticipated business. We also require
our customers and business partners to enter into confidentiality agreements before we disclose sensitive aspects of our modules,
technology, or business plans.
Regulatory, Environmental, Health, and Safety Matters
We are subject to various federal, state, local, and international laws and regulations, and are often subject to oversight and
regulation in accordance with national and local ordinances relating to building codes, safety, and other matters. The impact of
these laws and requirements may increase our overall costs and may delay, prevent, or increase the cost of manufacturing PV
modules. As we operate in the U.S. and internationally, we are also subject to the application of U.S. trade laws and trade laws of
other countries. Such tariffs and policies, or any other U.S. or global trade remedies or other trade barriers that apply to us given
our global operations, may directly or indirectly affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. See Item 1A.
“Risk Factors – Existing regulations and policies, changes thereto, and new regulations and policies may present technical,
regulatory, and economic barriers to the purchase and use of PV solar products, which may significantly reduce demand for our
modules.”
We are also subject to the application of various anti-bribery laws, some of which prohibit improper payments to government and
non-government persons and entities, and others (e.g., the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (the “FCPA”) and the U.K. Bribery
Act) that extend their application to activities outside their country of origin. From time to time, we may compete against
companies for contracts in China, India, South America, and the Middle East, which require substantial government contact and
where norms can differ from U.S. standards, and not all competitors are subject to compliance with the same anti-bribery laws. See
Item 1A. Risk Factors – “We could be adversely affected by any violations of the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and other foreign
anti-bribery laws.”
We are also subject to various federal, state, local, and international laws and regulations relating to the protection of the
environment, including those governing the discharge of pollutants into the air and water; the use, management, and disposal of
hazardous materials and wastes; occupational health and safety; and the cleanup of contaminated sites. Our operations include the
use, handling, storage, transportation, generation, and disposal of hazardous materials and wastes. Therefore, we could incur
substantial costs, including cleanup costs, fines, and civil or criminal sanctions and costs arising from third-party property damage
or personal injury claims as a result of violations of, or liabilities under, environmental and occupational health and safety laws and
regulations or non-compliance with environmental permits required for our operations. We believe we are currently in substantial
compliance with applicable environmental and occupational health and safety requirements and do not expect to
13
Table of Contents
incur material expenditures for environmental and occupational health and safety controls in the foreseeable future. However,
future developments such as the implementation of new, more stringent laws and regulations, more aggressive enforcement
policies, or the discovery of unknown environmental conditions may require expenditures that could have a material adverse effect
on our business, financial condition, or results of operations. See Item 1A. “Risk Factors – Environmental obligations and liabilities
could have a substantial negative impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.”
From time to time, we may also be subject to government policies or laws intended to protect human rights. For example, in late
2021 the U.S. President signed the Uyghur Forced Labor Prevention Act, which bans the import of goods from China’s Xinjiang
region into the United States due to concerns about forced labor practices in the region, which provides approximately half of the
world’s polysilicon supply. While we do not use polysilicon in our solar modules, which mitigates the potential supply chain
disruptions and human rights risks associated with such import ban, the implementation of similar restrictions or trade embargoes
on the purchase of certain materials or equipment necessary to sustain our manufacturing operations may require expenditures and
process changes to ensure our supply chain remains free of such materials, which could have a material adverse effect on our
business, financial condition, or results of operations. We are committed to protecting human rights, enforcing fair labor practices,
and addressing the potential risks of forced labor across our own operations and the operations of our suppliers.
Human Capital
As of December 31, 2022, we had approximately 5,500 associates (our term for full and part-time employees), including
approximately 4,700 in our modules business that work primarily in the United States, Malaysia, and Vietnam. The remainder of
our associates are in R&D, sales and marketing, and general and administrative positions.
Our company’s success depends, to a significant extent, on our ability to attract, train, and retain management, operations, sales,
and technical talent, including associates in foreign jurisdictions. We strive to attract, hire, and retain qualified individuals globally
to further our mission of providing cost-advantaged solar technology through rigorous safety practices, innovation, customer
engagement, industry leadership, and operational excellence. We take a consciously inclusive approach to our hiring practices,
which we monitor through a review of applicant and new-hire metrics on a quarterly basis. We prohibit discrimination based on
race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, or gender identity. As part of our global
talent management process, we engage in succession planning by prioritizing the development and retention of associates in critical
roles.
We follow a pay-for-performance model in which associates are compensated for achieving goals and associated metrics and
demonstrating First Solar values. We review associate compensation on a regular basis to ensure internal and external equity,
including, among other things, minimum wage and living wage assessments across our global operations. We offer competitive
compensation and benefits to our associates, including, for example, health care and other insurance benefits, retirement programs,
paid time off, paid parental leave, flexible work schedules, and education assistance, depending on eligibility.
We are committed to developing and providing career growth opportunities for our associates. We believe a strong culture of
inclusiveness is essential to the success of our company. We gather and respond to associate feedback in a variety of ways,
including through anonymous, periodic associate engagement and inclusion surveys, pulse surveys, and one-on-one interactions.
Additionally, we support career advancement, mentorship, and leadership development programs to ensure the professional growth
of our diverse talent.
None of our associates are currently represented by labor unions or covered by a collective bargaining agreement. As we continue
to expand domestically and internationally, we may encounter regional laws that mandate union representation or associates who
desire union representation or a collective bargaining agreement. We recognize that
14
Table of Contents
in the locations where we operate, employees have the right to freely associate or not associate with third-party labor organizations,
along with the right to bargain or not to bargain collectively in accordance with local laws.
Available Information
We maintain a website at www.firstsolar.com. We make available free of charge on our website our annual reports on Form 10-K,
quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K, proxy statements, and any amendments to those reports filed or
furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, as soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such
materials with, or furnish them to, the SEC. The information contained in or connected to our website is not incorporated by
reference into this report. We use our website as one means of disclosing material non-public information and for complying with
our disclosure obligations under the SEC’s Regulation FD. Such disclosures are typically included within the Investor Relations
section of our website at investor.firstsolar.com. Accordingly, investors should monitor such portions of our website in addition to
following our press releases, SEC filings, and public conference calls and webcasts. The SEC also maintains a website at
www.sec.gov that contains reports and other information regarding issuers, such as First Solar, that file electronically with the SEC.
Information about Our Executive Officers
Our executive officers and their ages and positions as of February 28, 2023 were as follows:
Name Age Position
Mark R. Widmar 57 Chief Executive Of ficer
Alexander R. Bradley 41 Chief Financial Of ficer
Geor ges Antoun 60 Chief Commercial Of ficer
Michael Koralewski 51 Chief Supply Chain Of ficer
Kuntal Kumar Verma 50 Chief Manufacturing Of ficer
Patrick Buehler 45 Chief Product Of ficer
Markus Gloeckler 49 Chief Technology Of ficer
Caroline Stockdale 59 Chief People and Communications Of ficer
Jason Dymbort 45 General Counsel and Secretary
Mark R. Widmar was appointed Chief Executive Officer in July 2016. He joined First Solar in April 2011 as Chief Financial
Officer and also served as First Solar’s Chief Accounting Officer from February 2012 through June 2015. From March 2015 to
June 2016, Mr. Widmar served as the Chief Financial Officer and through June 2018, served as a director on the board of the
general partner of 8point3 Energy Partners LP (“8point3”), the joint yieldco formed by First Solar and SunPower Corporation in
2015 to own and operate a portfolio of selected solar generation assets. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Widmar served as Chief
Financial Officer of GrafTech International Ltd., a leading global manufacturer of advanced carbon and graphite materials, from
May 2006 through March 2011. Prior to joining GrafTech, Mr. Widmar served as Corporate Controller of NCR Inc. from 2005 to
2006, and was a Business Unit Chief Financial Officer for NCR from November 2002 to his appointment as Controller. He also
served as a Division Controller at Dell, Inc. from August 2000 to November 2002. Mr. Widmar also held various financial and
managerial positions with Lucent Technologies Inc., Allied Signal, Inc., and Bristol Myers/Squibb, Inc. He began his career in 1987
as an accountant with Ernst & Young. Mr. Widmar holds a Bachelor of Science in business accounting and a Master of Business
Administration from Indiana University.
15
Table of Contents
Alexander R. Bradley was appointed Chief Financial Officer in October 2016. He joined First Solar in May 2008, and previously
served as Vice President of both Treasury and Project Finance, leading or supporting the structuring, sale, and financing of over $10
billion and approximately 2.7 GW of the Company’s worldwide development assets, including several of the largest PV power
plant projects in North America. From June 2016 to June 2018, Mr. Bradley also served as an officer and board member of the
general partner of 8point3. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Bradley worked at HSBC in investment banking and leveraged finance,
in London and New York, covering the energy and utilities sector. He received his Master of Arts from the University of Edinburgh,
Scotland.
Georges Antoun was appointed Chief Commercial Officer in July 2016. He joined First Solar in July 2012 as Chief Operating
Officer before being appointed as President, U.S. in July 2015. Mr. Antoun has over 30 years of operational and technical
experience, including leadership positions at several global technology companies. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Antoun served
as Venture Partner at Technology Crossover Ventures (“TCV”), a private equity and venture firm that he joined in July 2011. Before
joining TCV, Mr. Antoun was the Head of Product Area IP & Broadband Networks for Ericsson, based in San Jose, California. Mr.
Antoun joined Ericsson in 2007, when Ericsson acquired Redback Networks, a telecommunications equipment company, where
Mr. Antoun served as the Senior Vice President of World Wide Sales & Operations. After the acquisition, Mr. Antoun was promoted
to Chief Executive Officer of the Redback Networks subsidiary. Prior to Redback Networks, Mr. Antoun spent five years at Cisco
Systems, where he served as Vice President of Worldwide Systems Engineering and Field Marketing, Vice President of Worldwide
Optical Operations, and Vice President of Carrier Sales. Prior to Cisco Systems, he was the Director of Systems Engineering at
Newbridge Networks, a data and voice networking company. Mr. Antoun started his career at Nynex (now Verizon
Communications), where he was part of its Science and Technology Division. Mr. Antoun serves as a member of the board of
directors of Marathon Digital Holdings. He is also the Chairman of the University of Louisiana’s College of Engineering Dean’s
Advisory Council board. He earned a Bachelor of Science degree in engineering from the University of Louisiana at Lafayette and
a Master’s degree in information systems engineering from NYU Poly.
Michael Koralewski was appointed Chief Supply Chain Officer in November 2022 and is accountable for maintaining executive
oversight of First Solar’s strategic global supply chain. He previously served as First Solar’s Chief Manufacturing Operations
Officer and provides over 25 years of global operational experience to the executive leadership team. Mr. Koralewski joined First
Solar in 2006, serving in several senior roles in operations and quality management, including Senior Vice President, Global
Manufacturing since 2015; Vice President, Global Site Operations and Plant Manager since 2011; and Vice President, Global
Quality since 2009. In all of these roles Mr. Koralewski has been significantly involved since the beginning of First Solar’s
manufacturing scaling and expansion from site selection through sustaining operations and supply chain development. Prior to
joining First Solar, Mr. Koralewski worked at Dana Incorporated where he held several positions with global responsibility in
operations and quality management. He earned a Bachelor of Science in chemical engineering from Case Western Reserve
University and a Master of Business Administration from Bowling Green State University.
Kuntal Kumar Verma was appointed Chief Manufacturing Officer in November 2022 and previously served as First Solar’s Chief
Manufacturing Engineering Officer. He is responsible for First Solar’s global manufacturing operations and engineering, including
its performance and improvement roadmap, global technology scaling, new plant start-ups, and strategic initiatives. Mr. Verma
joined First Solar in 2002, serving in progressively more senior roles in engineering and manufacturing, including Vice President,
Global Manufacturing Engineering since 2012. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Verma held several engineering and operations
positions at Reliance Industries Limited, India. He is a Master Black Belt in Six Sigma/Lean Manufacturing with an expert
certification in Taguchi Methods (Robust Engineering) and a Certification in Production and Inventory Management from
American Production and Inventory Control Society. He earned a Bachelor of Science in mechanical engineering from the National
Institute of Technology in India, a Master of Science in industrial engineering from the University of Toledo, and a Master of
Business Administration from Bowling Green State University.DC
16
Table of Contents
Patrick Buehler was appointed Chief Product Officer in December 2022, having previously served as Chief Quality and Reliability
Officer. Mr. Buehler has over 20 years of operational and technical experience. In his role, Mr. Buehler is responsible for all aspects
of product lifecycle management, including understanding market demands, technology trends, and competition to facilitate
implementation of new or enhanced products. Mr. Buehler maintains global leadership responsibility for quality and reliability,
environmental, health, safety, and security, recycling technology process development and operations, customer service, program
management, and strategic initiatives. Mr. Buehler joined First Solar in 2006, serving in progressively more senior technical and
operations roles, including Vice President, Quality and Reliability since 2019. Prior to joining First Solar, Mr. Buehler held several
roles in manufacturing, engineering, maintenance, and product development at DuPont de Nemours, Inc. and Cummins, Inc. He
earned a Bachelor of Science in mechanical engineering from the University of Cincinnati and a Master of Science in mechanical
engineering from Purdue University.
Markus Gloeckler was appointed Chief Technology Officer in November 2020 after being appointed Co-Chief Technology Officer
in July 2020. He is focused on driving First Solar’s thin film PV module technology. Mr. Gloeckler has extensive experience
guiding strategic research and development activities and served First Solar as Vice President and Chief Scientist before being
promoted to Senior Vice President, Module Research and Development. He was instrumental in enabling First Solar’s achievement
of various world records relating to conversion efficiency for CdTe solar cells. In his role as Vice President of Research, he led the
thin film technology transfer from General Electric to First Solar following the intellectual property acquisition in 2013. He joined
First Solar in 2005 in an engineering function supporting First Solar’s technology development after the initial launch of the Series
2 module. Mr. Gloeckler holds an undergraduate degree in microsystems engineering from the Regensburg University of Applied
Sciences in Germany, and a Doctor of Philosophy in physics from Colorado State University.
Caroline Stockdale joined First Solar in October 2019 as Executive Vice President, Human Resources and Communications and
was appointed Chief People and Communications Officer in October 2020. Prior to joining First Solar, she served as the Chief
Executive Officer for First Perform, a provider of human resources services for a variety of customers, from Fortune 100
companies to cyber start-ups. Previously, she served as Chief Human Resources Officer for Medtronic from 2010 to 2013 and
Warner Music Group from 2005 to 2009. Before joining Warner Music Group, she served as the senior human resources leader in
global divisions of American Express from 2002 to 2005 and General Electric from 1997 to 2002. Ms. Stockdale is a member of
the Forbes Human Resources Council. Ms. Stockdale holds a Bachelor of Arts in political theories and institutions, and philosophy,
from the University of Sheffield, England.
Jason Dymbort joined First Solar in March 2008, serving in a broad range of legal roles before being appointed General Counsel
and Secretary in July 2020. Between 2015 and 2018, Mr. Dymbort served as General Counsel and Secretary for the general partner
of 8point3 Energy Partners, then a publicly-traded yieldco and affiliate of First Solar. Before joining First Solar, Mr. Dymbort was a
corporate attorney at Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP. He holds a Juris Doctor degree from the University of Pennsylvania Law
School, where he was a member of the Penn Law Review, and a bachelor’s degree from Brandeis University.
17
Table of Contents
Item 1A. Risk Factors
An investment in our stock involves a high degree of risk. You should carefully consider the following information, together with
the other information in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, before buying shares of our stock. If any of the following risks or
uncertainties occur, our business, financial condition, and results of operations could be materially and adversely affected and the
trading price of our stock could decline.
Summary of Risk Factors
The following is a summary of the principal risks and uncertainties that could materially adversely affect our business, financial
condition, and results of operations and make an investment in our stock speculative or risky. You should read this summary
together with the more detailed description of each risk factor contained below.
Risks Related to Our Markets and Customers
•Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense and could remain that way for an
extended period of time. The solar industry may experience periods of structural imbalance between global PV module
supply and demand that result in periods of pricing volatility. If our competitors reduce module pricing to levels near or
below their manufacturing costs, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of
time, or if global demand for PV modules decreases relative to installed production capacity, our business, financial
condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.
•The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy
targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or other public policies could negatively impact
demand and/or price levels for our solar modules. The imposition of tariffs on our products could materially increase our
costs to perform under our contracts with customers, which could adversely affect our results of operations.
•The loss of any of our large customers, or the inability of our customers and counterparties to perform under their
contracts with us, could significantly reduce our net sales and negatively impact our results of operations.
Risks Related to Our Operations, Manufacturing, and Technology
•We face intense competition from manufacturers of crystalline silicon solar modules; if global supply exceeds global
demand, it could lead to a further reduction in the average selling price for PV solar modules, which could reduce our net
sales and adversely affect our results of operations.
•Problems with product quality or performance may cause us to incur significant and/or unexpected contractual damages
and/or warranty and related expenses, damage our market reputation, and prevent us from maintaining or increasing our
market share.
•Our failure to further refine our technology and develop and introduce improved PV products, including as a result of
delays in implementing planned advancements, could render our solar modules uncompetitive and reduce our net sales,
profitability, and/or market share.
•Several of our key raw materials and components, in particular CdTe and substrate glass, and manufacturing equipment
are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of suppliers, and their failure to perform could cause
manufacturing delays, especially as we expand or seek to expand our business, and/or impair our ability to deliver solar
modules to customers in the required quality and quantities and at a price that is profitable to us.
18
Table of Contents
•Our failure to effectively manage module manufacturing production and selling costs, including costs related to raw
materials and logistics services, could render our solar modules uncompetitive and reduce our net sales, profitability,
and/or market share.
•Our future success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing production with market demand,
effectively manage our cost per watt, and, when necessary, continue to build new manufacturing plants over time in
response to market demand, all of which are subject to risks and uncertainties.
•We may be unable to generate sufficient cash flows or have access to the sources of external financing necessary to fund
planned capital investments in manufacturing capacity and product development.
Risks Related to Regulations
•We expect certain financial benefits as a result of tax incentives provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. If these
expected financial benefits vary significantly from our assumptions, our business, financial condition, and results of
operations could be adversely affected.
•Existing regulations and policies, changes thereto, and new regulations and policies may present technical, regulatory, and
economic barriers to the purchase and use of PV solar products, which may significantly reduce demand for our modules.
Risks Related to Our Markets and Customers
Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense and could remain that way for an extended
period of time. The solar industry may experience periods of structural imbalance between global PV module supply and
demand that result in periods of pricing volatility, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial
condition, and results of operations.
In the aggregate, we believe manufacturers of solar cells and modules have significant installed production capacity, relative to
global demand, and the ability for additional capacity expansion. For example, we estimate that in 2022 approximately 160 GW
of capacity was added by solar module manufacturers, primarily in China. We believe the solar industry may from time to time
experience periods of structural imbalance between supply and demand, and that excess capacity will continue to put pressure on
pricing. Although module average selling prices in many global markets have declined for several years, recent module spot pricing
has increased, in part, due to trade measures and policies, government regulations, raw material availability, and supply chain
disruptions. There may be additional pressure on global demand and average selling prices in the future resulting from fluctuating
demand in certain major solar markets, such as China. If our competitors reduce module pricing to levels near or below their
manufacturing costs, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods of time, or if global
demand for PV modules decreases relative to installed production capacity, our business, financial condition, and results of
operations could be adversely affected.
The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy
targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or the impact of other public policies, such as tariffs or other
trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules
and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our operating
results.
Although we believe that solar energy will experience widespread adoption in those applications where it competes economically
with traditional forms of energy without any support programs, in certain markets our net sales and profits remain subject to
variability based on the availability and size of government subsidies and economic incentives. Federal, state, and local
governmental bodies in many countries have provided subsidies in the form of feed-in-tariff structures, rebates, tax incentives, and
other incentives to end users, distributors, system integrators,DC
19
Table of Contents
and manufacturers of PV solar products. Many of these support programs expire, phase down over time, require renewal by the
applicable authority, or may be amended. A summary of certain recent developments in the major government support programs
that may impact our business appears under Item 1. “Business – Support Programs.” To the extent these support programs are
reduced earlier than previously expected, are changed retroactively, or are not renewed, such changes could negatively impact
demand and/or price levels for our solar modules, lead to a reduction in our net sales, and adversely impact our operating results.
Current regulatory policies, or any future changes or threatened changes to such policies, may subject us to significant risks,
including the following:
•a reduction or removal of clean energy programs and initiatives and the incentives they provide may diminish the market
for future solar energy off-take agreements, slow the retirement of aging fossil fuel plants, including the retirements of
coal generation plants, and reduce the ability for solar project developers to compete for off-take agreements, which may
reduce PV solar module sales;
•any limitations on the value or availability to manufacturers or potential investors of tax incentives that benefit solar
energy production, sales, or projects, such as the Section 45X advanced manufacturing production credit, ITC, and PTC,
could result in reducing such manufacturers’ or investors’ economic returns and could cause a reduction in the availability
of financing, thereby reducing demand for PV solar modules;
•any incentives contingent upon domestic production of modules, such as tax incentives set forth under the IRA, could limit
our ability to sell modules manufactured in certain foreign jurisdictions, which may adversely impact our module average
selling prices and could require us to record significant charges to earnings should we determine that the manufacturing
equipment in such foreign jurisdictions is impaired; and
•any effort to overturn federal and state laws, regulations, or policies that are supportive of solar energy generation or that
remove costs or other limitations on other types of electricity generation that compete with solar energy projects could
negatively impact our ability to compete with traditional forms of electricity generation and materially and adversely
affect our business.
Application of trade laws may also impact, either directly or indirectly, our operating results. In some instances, the application of
trade laws is currently beneficial to the Company, and changes in their application could have an adverse impact. Recent
developments include the following:
•United States — Tariffs on certain imported crystalline silicon PV cells and modules. The United States currently imposes
different types of tariffs and/or other trade remedies on certain imported crystalline silicon PV cells and modules from
various countries. In February 2022, the U.S. President proclaimed a four-year extension of a global safeguard measure
imposed pursuant to Section 201 of the Trade Act of 1974 that provides for tariffs on imported crystalline silicon solar
modules and a tariff-rate quota on imported crystalline silicon solar cells. Thin film solar cell products, such as our CdTe
technology, are specifically excluded from the tariffs. Moreover, the extension measure does not apply tariffs to imports of
bifacial modules. The extension measure’s tariff rate was originally set at 14.75%, with annual reductions of
0.25 percentage points over the remainder of its four-year term. The current rate is 14.5%. The extension measure also
provides an annual tariff-rate quota, whereby tariffs apply to imported crystalline silicon solar cells above the first
5.0 GW of imports.
•United States — Antidumping and countervailing duties on certain imported crystalline silicon PV cells and modules. The
United States currently imposes antidumping and countervailing duties on certain imported crystalline silicon PV cells and
modules from China and Taiwan. Such antidumping and countervailing duties can change over time pursuant to annual
reviews conducted by the U.S. DepartmentDC
20
Table of Contents
of Commerce (“USDOC”), and a decline in duty rates or USDOC failure to fully enforce U.S. antidumping and
countervailing duty laws could have an adverse impact on our operating results. In March 2022, the USDOC initiated
inquiries concerning alleged circumvention of antidumping and countervailing duties on Chinese imports by crystalline
silicon PV cells and module imports assembled and completed in Cambodia, Malaysia, Thailand, and Vietnam. In June
2022, the U.S. President declared an emergency with respect to threats to electricity generation capacity and authorized the
U.S. Secretary of Commerce to consider permitting the importation of crystalline silicon PV products from those four
countries free of antidumping and countervailing duties for 24 months, or until the emergency has terminated. The
USDOC has issued regulations implementing that moratorium on antidumping and countervailing duties in the event that
it finds circumvention with respect to crystalline silicon PV products assembled and completed in those four countries. In
December 2022, the USDOC issued affirmative preliminary determinations finding “country-wide” circumvention with
respect to those four countries, but it also found that certain companies were not circumventing the antidumping and
countervailing duties. The USDOC is scheduled to issue its final circumvention determinations in May 2023, subject to
possible extension. We cannot predict what further actions the USDOC will take with respect to these circumvention
inquiries. Our operating results could be adversely impacted if the USDOC makes negative circumvention determinations
or refrains from imposing antidumping and countervailing duties on imports covered by affirmative circumvention
determinations. Conversely, affirmative final circumvention determinations could positively impact our operating results.
•United States — Tariffs on certain Chinese imports. The United States currently imposes tariffs on various articles
imported from China at a rate of 25%, including crystalline silicon solar cells and modules, based on an investigation
under Section 301 of the Trade Act of 1974. In May 2022, the Office of the United States Trade Representative initiated a
statutory four-year review of those tariff actions, which could result in the termination or modification of the tariffs. The
review remains pending, and we cannot predict its outcome. Our operating results could be adversely impacted if the
review results in a termination or reduction in tariffs on crystalline silicon solar cells and modules from China.
•United States — Tariffs on certain foreign-imported aluminum and steel. The United States currently imposes tariffs on
certain imported aluminum and steel articles from certain foreign jurisdictions, generally at rates of 10% and 25%,
respectively, under Section 232 of the Trade Expansion Act of 1962. Such tariffs and policies, or any other U.S. or global
trade remedies or other trade barriers, may directly or indirectly affect U.S. or global markets for solar energy and our
business, financial condition, and results of operations.
•India — Domestic and foreign imports. India maintains an Approved List of Module Manufacturers (“ALMM”), which is
set by the MNRE. Only PV modules and module manufacturers listed on the ALMM can be used for certain solar projects
in India, including government projects or government-assisted projects. Our ability to sell modules in the Indian market
depends on the inclusion of our modules on the ALMM, and we currently expect that we will be included in the ALMM
once we begin manufacturing solar panels in India. However, our operating results could be adversely impacted if the
ALMM restriction is significantly relaxed to allow modules to be imported from countries that are part of the Association
of Southeast Asian Nations.
•European Union — Foreign subsidies. In January 2023, the EU adopted the Foreign Subsidies Regulation (“FSR”), which
was established to provide the European Commission with authority to investigate financial contributions granted by
foreign governments to businesses operating within the EU. Because the FSR is not effective until July 2023 and the
European Commission has not yet issued any application guidance, it is not currently clear whether, and to what extent,
the FSR could impact our business, financial condition, or results of operations.
These examples show that established markets for PV solar development face uncertainties arising from policy, regulatory, and
governmental actions. While the expected potential of the markets we are targeting is significant,
21
Table of Contents
policy promulgation and market development are especially vulnerable to governmental inertia, political instability, the imposition
or lowering of trade remedies and other trade barriers, geopolitical risk, fossil fuel subsidization, potentially stringent localization
requirements, and limited available infrastructure.
The loss of any of our large customers, or the inability of our customers and counterparties to perform under their contracts
with us, could significantly reduce our net sales and negatively impact our results of operations.
Our customers include developers and operators of systems, utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial
companies, and other system owners, who may experience intense competition at the system level, thereby constraining the ability
for such customers to sustain meaningful and consistent profitability. The loss of any of our large customers, their inability to
perform under their contracts, or their default in payment could significantly reduce our net sales and/or adversely impact our
operating results. While our contracts with customers typically have certain firm purchase commitments and may include
provisions for the payment of amounts to us in certain events of contract termination, these contracts may be subject to
amendments made by us or requested by our customers. These amendments may reduce the volume of modules to be sold under the
contract, adjust delivery schedules, or otherwise decrease the expected revenue under these contracts. Although we believe that we
can mitigate this risk, in part, by reallocating modules to other customers if the need arises, we may be unable, in whole or in part,
to do so on similar terms or at all. We may also mitigate this risk by requiring some form of payment security from our customers,
such as cash deposits, parent guarantees, bank guarantees, surety bonds, or commercial letters of credit. However, in the event the
providers of such payment security fail to perform their obligations, our operating results could be adversely impacted.
An increase in interest rates or tightening of the supply of capital in the global financial markets (including a reduction in total
tax equity availability) could make it difficult for customers to finance the cost of a PV solar power system and could reduce the
demand for our modules and/or lead to a reduction in the average selling price for our modules.
Many of our customers depend on debt and/or equity financing to fund the initial capital expenditure required to develop, build,
and/or purchase a PV solar power system. As a result, an increase in interest rates, or a reduction in the supply of project debt
financing or tax equity investments, could reduce the number of solar projects that receive financing or otherwise make it difficult
for our customers to secure the financing necessary to develop, build, purchase, or install a PV solar power system on favorable
terms, or at all, and thus lower demand for our solar modules, which could limit our growth or reduce our net sales. For additional
information, see the Risk Factor entitled, “The reduction, elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives,
tax incentives, renewable energy targets, and other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or the impact of other public
policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price
levels for our solar modules and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely
impacting our operating results.” In addition, we believe that a significant percentage of our customers install systems as an
investment, funding the initial capital expenditure through a combination of equity and debt. An increase in interest rates could
lower an investor’s return on investment in a system, increase equity return requirements, or make alternative investments more
attractive relative to PV solar power systems and, in each case, could cause these customers to seek alternative investments.
22
Table of Contents
We may be unable to fully execute on our long-term strategic plans, which could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition, or results of operations.
We face numerous difficulties in executing on our long-term strategic plans, particularly in new foreign jurisdictions, including the
following:
•difficulty in competing against companies who may have greater financial resources and/or a more effective or established
localized business presence and/or an ability to operate with minimal or negative operating margins for sustained periods
of time;
•difficulty in competing successfully with other technologies, such as hybrid perovskites, tandem solar cells, or other thin
films;
•difficulty in accurately prioritizing geographic markets that we can most effectively and profitably serve with our solar
module offerings, including miscalculations in overestimating or underestimating addressable market demand;
•adverse public policies in countries we operate in and/or are pursuing, including local content requirements, the imposition
of trade remedies, the removal of trade barriers, or capital investment requirements;
•business climates, such as that in China, that may have the effect of putting foreign companies at a disadvantage relative to
domestic companies;
•unstable or adverse economic, social, and/or operating environments, including social unrest, currency, inflation, and
interest rate uncertainties;
•the possibility of applying an ineffective commercial approach to targeted markets, including product offerings that may
not meet market needs;
•difficulty in generating sufficient sales volumes at economically sustainable profitability levels;
•difficulty in timely identifying, attracting, training, and retaining qualified sales, technical, and other talent in geographies
targeted for expansion;
•difficulty in maintaining proper controls and procedures as we expand our business operations in terms of geographical
reach, including transitioning certain business functions to low-cost geographies, with any material control failure
potentially leading to reputational damage and loss of confidence in our financial reporting;
•difficulty in competing successfully for market share in overall solar markets as a result of the success of companies
participating in other solar segments in which we do not have significant historical experience, such as residential;
•difficulty in establishing and implementing a commercial and operational approach adequate to address the specific needs
of the markets we are pursuing;
•difficulty in identifying effective local partners and developing any necessary partnerships with local businesses on
commercially acceptable terms; and
•difficulty in balancing market demand and manufacturing production in an efficient and timely manner, potentially
causing our manufacturing capacity to be constrained in some future periods or over-supplied in others.
23
Table of Contents
Refer also to the Risk Factors entitled, “Our substantial international operations subject us to a number of risks, including
unfavorable political, regulatory, labor, and tax conditions in the United States and/or foreign countries,” “The reduction,
elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy targets, and other
support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or the impact of other public policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies
imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and limit our growth
or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our operating results,” and “We may be
unable to generate sufficient cash flows or have access to the sources of external financing necessary to fund planned capital
investments in manufacturing capacity and product development.”
Risks Related to Our Operations, Manufacturing, and Technology
We face intense competition from manufacturers of crystalline silicon solar modules; if global supply exceeds global demand, it
could lead to a further reduction in the average selling price for PV solar modules, which could reduce our net sales and
adversely affect our results of operations.
The solar and renewable energy industries are highly competitive and are continually evolving as participants strive to distinguish
themselves within their markets and compete with the larger electric power industry. Within the global PV solar industry, we face
intense competition from crystalline silicon module manufacturers. Existing or future module manufacturers might be acquired by
larger companies with significant capital resources, thereby further intensifying competition with us. In addition, the introduction of
a low-cost disruptive technology could adversely affect our ability to compete, which could reduce our net sales and adversely
affect our results of operations.
We expect to compete with future entrants into the PV solar industry and existing market participants that offer new or
differentiated technological solutions. For example, while conventional solar modules are monofacial, meaning their ability to
produce energy is a function of direct and diffuse irradiance on their front side, most module manufacturers offer bifacial modules
that also capture diffuse irradiance on the back side of a module. Such technology can improve the overall energy production of a
module relative to nameplate efficiency when applied in certain applications, which could potentially lower the overall LCOE of a
system when compared to systems using conventional solar modules, including the modules we currently produce. Additionally,
certain module manufacturers have introduced n-type mono-crystalline modules, such as tunnel oxide passivated contact
(“TOPCon”) modules, which are expected to provide certain improvements to module efficiency, temperature coefficient, and
bifacial performance, and claim to provide certain degradation advantages compared to other mono-crystalline modules. Finally,
many of our competitors are promoting modules with larger overall area based on the use of larger silicon wafers. While the
transition to such larger wafers would increase nameplate wattage, we believe the associated production cost would not improve
significantly.
Even if demand for solar modules continues to grow, the rapid manufacturing capacity expansion undertaken by many module
manufacturers in China and certain parts of Southeast Asia, particularly manufacturers of crystalline silicon wafers, cells, and
modules, has created and may continue to cause periods of structural imbalances between supply and demand. For additional
information, see the Risk Factor entitled, “Competition in solar markets globally and across the solar value chain is intense and
could remain that way for an extended period of time. The solar industry may experience periods of structural imbalance between
global PV module supply and demand that result in periods of pricing volatility, which could have a material adverse effect on our
business, financial condition, and results of operations.” In addition, we believe any significant decrease in the cost of silicon
feedstock or polysilicon would reduce the manufacturing cost of crystalline silicon modules and lead to further pricing pressure for
solar modules and potentially an oversupply of solar modules.
Our competitors could decide to reduce their sales prices in response to competition, even below their manufacturing costs, in order
to generate sales, and may do so for a sustained period. Certain competitors, including many in China, may have direct or indirect
access to sovereign capital or other forms of state support, which could enable such competitors to operate at minimal or negative
operating margins for sustained periods of time. As a result, we may
24
Table of Contents
be unable to sell our solar modules at attractive prices, or for a profit, during any period of excess supply of solar modules, which
would reduce our net sales and adversely affect our results of operations. Additionally, we may decide to lower our average selling
prices to customers in certain markets in response to competition, which could also reduce our net sales and adversely affect our
results of operations.
Problems with product quality or performance may cause us to incur significant and/or unexpected contractual damages and/or
warranty and related expenses, damage our market reputation, and prevent us from maintaining or increasing our market
share.
We perform a variety of module quality and life tests under different environmental conditions upon which we base our
assessments of future module performance over the duration of the warranty. However, if our thin film solar modules perform
below expectations, we could experience significant warranty and related expenses, damage to our market reputation, and erosion
of our market share. With respect to our modules, we provide a limited warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship
under normal use and service conditions for up to 12.5 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with
agreed-upon specifications will produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty
coverage reducing by a degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30
years. Among other things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking. As an
alternative form of our standard limited module power output warranty, we have also offered an aggregated or system-level limited
module performance warranty. This system-level limited module performance warranty is designed for utility-scale systems and
provides 25-year system-level energy degradation protection. This warranty represents a practical expedient to address the
challenge of identifying, from the potential millions of modules installed in a utility-scale system, individual modules that may be
performing below warranty thresholds by focusing on the aggregate energy generated by the system rather than the power output of
individual modules. The system-level limited module performance warranty is typically calculated as a percentage of a system’s
expected energy production, adjusted for certain actual site conditions, with the warranted level of performance declining each year
in a linear fashion, but never falling below 80% during the term of the warranty. As a result of these warranty programs, we bear
the risk of product warranty claims long after we have sold our solar modules and recognized net sales.
If any of the assumptions used in estimating our module warranties prove incorrect, we could be required to accrue additional
expenses, which could adversely impact our financial position, operating results, and cash flows. Although we have taken
significant precautions to avoid a manufacturing excursion from occurring, any manufacturing excursions, including any
commitments made by us to take remediation actions in respect of affected modules beyond the stated remedies in our warranties,
could adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
Although our module performance warranties extend for up to 30 years, our oldest solar modules manufactured during the
qualification of our pilot production line have only been in use since 2001. Accordingly, our warranties are based on a variety of
quality and life tests that enable predictions of durability and future performance. These predictions, however, could prove to be
materially different from the actual performance during the warranty period, causing us to incur substantial expense to repair or
replace defective solar modules or provide financial remuneration in the future. For example, our solar modules could suffer
various failures, including breakage, delamination, corrosion, or performance degradation in excess of expectations, and our
manufacturing operations or supply chain could be subject to materials or process variations that could cause affected modules to
fail or underperform compared to our expectations. These risks could be amplified as we implement design and process changes in
connection with our efforts to improve our products and accelerate module wattage as part of our long-term strategic plans. In
addition, if we increase the number of installations in extreme climates, we may experience increased failure rates due to
deployment into such field conditions. Any widespread product failures may damage our market reputation, cause our net sales to
decline, require us to repair or replace the defective modules or provide financial remuneration, and result in us taking voluntary
remedial measures beyond those required by our standard warranty terms to enhance customer satisfaction, which could have a
material adverse effect on our operating results.
25
Table of Contents
In resolving claims under both the limited defect and power output warranties, we typically have the option of either repairing or
replacing the covered modules or, under the limited power output warranty, providing additional modules to remedy the power
shortfall or making certain cash payments; however, historical versions of our module warranty did not provide a refund remedy.
Consequently, we may be obligated to repair or replace the covered modules under such historical programs. As our manufacturing
process may change from time-to-time in accordance with our technology roadmap, we may elect to stop production of older
versions of our modules that would constitute compatible replacement modules. In some jurisdictions, our inability to provide
compatible replacement modules could potentially expose us to liabilities beyond the limitations of our module warranties, which
could adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
In addition to our limited solar module warranties described above, for PV solar power systems we have constructed for customers
in prior periods, we have provided limited warranties for defects in engineering design, installation, and balance of systems
(“BoS”) part workmanship for a period of one to two years following the substantial completion of a system or a block within the
system. BoS parts represent mounting, electrical, and other parts used in PV solar power systems. In resolving claims under such
BoS warranties, we have the option of remedying the defect through repair or replacement. As with our modules, these warranties
are based on a variety of quality and life tests that enable predictions of durability and future performance. Any failures in BoS
equipment beyond our expectations may also adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
In addition, our contracts with customers may include provisions with particular product specifications, minimum wattage
requirements, and specified delivery schedules. These contracts may be terminated, or we may incur significant liquidated damages
or other damages, if we fail to perform our contractual obligations. In addition, our costs to perform under these contracts may
exceed our estimates, which could adversely impact our profitability. Any failures to comply with our contracts for the sale of our
modules could adversely impact our reputation, financial position, operating results, and cash flows.
Our failure to further refine our technology and develop and introduce improved PV products, including as a result of delays in
implementing planned advancements, could render our solar modules uncompetitive and reduce our net sales, profitability,
and/or market share.
We need to continue to invest significant financial resources in R&D to continue to improve our module conversion efficiencies
and otherwise keep pace with technological advances in the solar industry. However, R&D activities are inherently uncertain, and
we could encounter difficulties in commercializing our research results. We seek to continuously improve our products and
processes, including, for example, certain planned improvements to our CdTe module technology and manufacturing capabilities,
such as the increase to our module form factor (which we refer to as Series 7), and the resulting changes carry potential risks in the
form of delays, performance, additional costs, or other unintended contingencies. For example, the successful launch of our Series
7 module technology, which we began producing at our third manufacturing facility in the U.S. and we expect to produce at our
first manufacturing facility in India, is sensitive to changes in the final product size and module mounting structure, among others.
While we believe that we will be able to manage these uncertainties, we may encounter unanticipated challenges as we implement
design and process changes in connection with this new module series.
We may expand our portfolio of offerings to include solutions that build upon our core competencies but for which we have not had
significant historical experience, including variations in our traditional product offerings or other offerings related to certain
markets. There can be no guarantee that our significant R&D expenditures will produce corresponding benefits. Other companies
are developing a variety of competing PV technologies, including advanced mono-crystalline silicon cells, advanced p-type
crystalline silicon cells, high-efficiency n-type crystalline silicon cells, and new emerging technologies such as hybrid perovskites,
tandem solar cells, or other thin films, which could result in solar modules that prove to be more cost-effective or have better
performance than our solar modules. If we are unable to achieve the necessary technology improvements to remain competitive,
our overall growth and financial performance may be limited relative to our competitors and our operating results could be
adversely impacted.
26
Table of Contents
We often forward price our products in anticipation of future technology improvements. Furthermore, certain of our contracts with
customers may include transaction price adjustments associated with future module technology improvements, including new
product designs and enhancements to certain energy related attributes. Accordingly, an inability to further refine our technology and
execute our module technology roadmap, or changes to the expected timing such technology improvements are incorporated into
our manufacturing process, could adversely affect our operating results.
Some of our manufacturing equipment is customized and sole sourced. If our manufacturing equipment fails or if our
equipment suppliers fail to perform under their contracts, we could experience production disruptions and be unable to satisfy
our contractual requirements.
Some of our manufacturing equipment is customized to our production lines based on designs or specifications that we provide to
equipment manufacturers, which then undertake a specialized process to manufacture the custom equipment. As a result, the
equipment is not readily available from multiple vendors and would be difficult to repair or replace if it were to become delayed,
damaged, or stop working. If any piece of equipment fails, production along the entire production line could be interrupted. In
addition, the failure of our equipment manufacturers to supply equipment in a timely manner or on commercially reasonable terms
could delay our expansion or conversion plans, otherwise disrupt our production schedule, and/or increase our manufacturing costs,
all of which would adversely impact our operating results.
Several of our key raw materials and components are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of suppliers, and
their failure to perform could cause manufacturing delays and impair our ability to deliver solar modules to customers in the
required quality and quantities and at a price that is profitable to us.
Our failure to obtain raw materials and components that meet our quality, quantity, and cost requirements in a timely manner could
interrupt or impair our ability to manufacture our solar modules, or increase our manufacturing costs. Several of our key raw
materials and components, in particular CdTe and substrate glass, are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of
suppliers. As a result, the failure of any of our suppliers to perform could disrupt our supply chain and adversely impact our
operations. In addition, some of our suppliers are smaller companies that may be unable to supply our increasing demand for raw
materials and components as we expand or seek to expand our business. We may be unable to identify new suppliers or qualify
their products for use on our production lines in a timely manner and on commercially reasonable terms. A constraint on our
production may result in our inability to meet our capacity plans and/or our obligations under our customer contracts, which would
have an adverse impact on our business. Additionally, reductions in our production volume may put pressure on suppliers, resulting
in increased material and component costs.
A disruption in our supply chain for CdTe, other key raw materials, or equipment could interrupt or impair our ability to
manufacture solar modules and could adversely impact our profitability and long-term growth prospects.
A key raw material used in our module production process is a CdTe compound. Tellurium, one of the main components of CdTe, is
mainly produced as a by-product of copper refining, and therefore, its supply is largely dependent upon demand for copper. If our
competitors begin to use or increase their demand for tellurium, our requirements for tellurium increase, new applications for
tellurium emerge, or adverse trade laws or policies restrict our ability to obtain tellurium from foreign vendors or make doing so
cost prohibitive, the supply of tellurium and related CdTe compounds could be reduced and prices could increase.
Furthermore, our supply chain could be limited if any of our current or future suppliers fail to perform or are unable to acquire an
adequate supply in a timely manner or at commercially reasonable prices. If our current or future suppliers cannot obtain sufficient
raw materials or key equipment, they could substantially increase prices or be unable to perform under their contracts. Additionally,
we may also be unable to effectively manage fluctuations in the availability and cost of logistics services associated with the
procurement of raw materials or equipment used in our manufacturing process. If we are unable to pass such cost increases to our
customers, a substantial increase in
27
Table of Contents
prices or any limitations or disruptions in our supply chain could adversely impact our profitability and long-term growth
objectives.
Our failure to effectively manage module manufacturing production and selling costs, including costs related to raw materials
and logistics services, could render our solar modules uncompetitive and reduce our net sales, profitability, and/or market
share.
Certain of our key raw material purchase contracts include variable pricing terms, which are driven by underlying indices for
certain commodities, including aluminum, steel, and natural gas, among others. Fluctuations in such underlying commodity indices
may increase our raw material costs. Additionally, an increase in price levels generally, such as inflation related to the cost of raw
materials, key manufacturing equipment, labor, and logistics services, could adversely impact our profitability. From time to time,
we may utilize derivative hedging instruments to mitigate price changes related to our raw materials or key manufacturing
equipment. Our profitability could be adversely impacted if we are unable to effectively hedge such prices or pass these cost
increases through to our customers. We often forward price our products in anticipation of future cost reductions, and thus, an
inability to execute our cost reduction roadmap could adversely affect our operating results.
Our future success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing production with market demand, effectively
manage our cost per watt, and, when necessary, continue to build new manufacturing plants over time in response to market
demand, all of which are subject to risks and uncertainties.
Our future success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing production with market demand, effectively manage
our cost per watt, and increase our manufacturing capacity in a cost-effective and efficient manner. If we cannot do so, we may
incur damages under our contracts with our customers or be unable to decrease our cost per watt, maintain our competitive position,
sustain profitability, expand our business, or create long-term shareholder value. Our ability to effectively manage our cost per watt
or successfully expand production capacity is subject to significant risks and uncertainties, including the following:
•failure to reduce manufacturing material, labor, or overhead costs;
•an inability to increase production throughput or the average power output per module, or minimize manufacturing yield
losses;
•failure to effectively manage the availability and cost of logistics services associated with the procurement of raw
materials or equipment used in our manufacturing process and the shipping, handling, storage, and distribution of our
modules;
•delays and cost overruns as a result of a number of factors, many of which may be beyond our control, such as our
inability to secure economical contracts with equipment vendors;
•our custom-built equipment taking longer and costing more to manufacture than expected and not operating as designed;
•delays or denial of required approvals by relevant government authorities;
•an inability to hire qualified staff;
•capital expenditures exceeding our initial estimates with respect to expanding and building our manufacturing and R&D
facilities;
28
Table of Contents
•difficulty in balancing market demand and manufacturing production in an efficient and timely manner, potentially
causing our manufacturing capacity to be constrained in some future periods or over-supplied in others; and
•incurring manufacturing asset write-downs, write-offs, and other charges and costs, which may be significant, during those
periods in which we idle, slow down, shut down, or otherwise adjust our manufacturing capacity.
We may be unable to generate sufficient cash flows or have access to the sources of external financing necessary to fund
planned capital investments in manufacturing capacity and product development.
Our business and our future plans for expansion are capital-intensive, and we anticipate that our operating and capital expenditure
requirements may increase. To develop new products, support future growth, and maintain product quality, we may need to make
significant capital investments in manufacturing technology, facilities and capital equipment, and research and development.
Consequently, we may seek to raise additional funds through the issuance of equity, equity-related, or debt securities or through
obtaining credit from financial institutions to fund, together with our traditional sources of liquidity, the costs of developing and
manufacturing our current or future products. We cannot be certain that we will be able to generate sufficient cash flows, or that
additional funds will be available to us on favorable terms when required, or at all. If we cannot fund the required investments from
our operating cash flows or raise additional funds when we need them, we may be unable to fully execute our business plan and our
financial condition, results of operations, and business prospects could be materially and adversely affected.
If our estimates regarding the future costs of collecting and recycling CdTe solar modules covered by our solar module
collection and recycling program are incorrect, we could be required to accrue additional expenses and face a significant
unplanned cash burden.
As necessary, we fund any incremental amounts for our estimated collection and recycling obligations on an annual basis based on
the estimated costs of collecting and recycling covered modules, estimated rates of return on our restricted marketable securities,
and an estimated solar module life of 25 years less amounts already funded in prior years. We estimate the cost of our collection
and recycling obligations based on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting and recycling the solar modules,
which includes estimates for the cost of packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar module installation sites to a
recycling center; material, labor, and capital costs; by-product credits for certain materials recovered during the recycling process;
the estimated useful lives of modules covered by the program; and the number of modules expected to be recycled. We base these
estimates on our experience collecting and recycling solar modules and certain assumptions regarding costs at the time the solar
modules will be collected and recycled. If our estimates prove incorrect, we could be required to accrue additional expenses and
could also face a significant unplanned cash burden at the time we realize our estimates are incorrect or end users return their
modules, which could adversely affect our operating results. Participating end users can return their modules covered under the
collection and recycling program at any time. As a result, we could be required to collect and recycle covered CdTe solar modules
earlier than we expect.
Our failure to protect or successfully commercialize our intellectual property rights may undermine our competitive position,
and litigation to protect our intellectual property rights or defend against third-party allegations of infringement may be costly.
Protection of our proprietary processes, methods, and other technology is critical to our business. Failure to protect and monitor the
use of our existing intellectual property rights or to successfully commercialize future intellectual property rights could result in the
loss of valuable technologies. We rely primarily on patents, trademarks, trade secrets, copyrights, and contractual restrictions to
protect our intellectual property. We regularly file patent applications to protect certain inventions arising from our R&D and are
currently pursuing such patent applications in various countries in accordance with our strategy for intellectual property in that
jurisdiction. Our existing patents
29
Table of Contents
and future patents could be challenged, invalidated, circumvented, or rendered unenforceable. Our pending patent applications may
not result in issued patents, or if patents are issued to us, such patents may not be sufficient to provide meaningful protection
against competitors or against competitive technologies.
We also rely on unpatented proprietary manufacturing expertise, continuing technological innovation, and other trade secrets to
develop and maintain our competitive position. Although we generally enter into confidentiality agreements with our associates and
third parties to protect our intellectual property, such confidentiality agreements are limited in duration and could be breached and
may not provide meaningful protection for our trade secrets or proprietary manufacturing expertise. Adequate remedies may not be
available in the event of unauthorized use or disclosure of our trade secrets and manufacturing expertise. In addition, others may
obtain knowledge of our trade secrets through independent development or legal means. The failure of our patents or
confidentiality agreements to protect our processes, equipment, technology, trade secrets, and proprietary manufacturing expertise,
methods, and compounds could have a material adverse effect on our business. In addition, effective patent, trademark, copyright,
and trade secret protection may be unavailable or limited in some foreign countries, especially any developing countries into which
we may expand our operations. In some countries, we have not applied for patent, trademark, or copyright protection.
Third parties may infringe or misappropriate our proprietary technologies or other intellectual property rights, which could have a
material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and operating results. Policing unauthorized use of proprietary
technology can be difficult and expensive. Additionally, litigation may be necessary to enforce our intellectual property rights,
protect our trade secrets, or determine the validity and scope of the proprietary rights of others. We cannot ensure that the outcome
of such potential litigation will be in our favor, and such litigation may be costly and may divert management attention and other
resources away from our business. An adverse determination in any such litigation may impair our intellectual property rights and
may harm our business, prospects, and reputation. In addition, we have no insurance coverage against such litigation costs and
would have to bear all costs arising from such litigation to the extent we are unable to recover them from other parties.
If any future production lines are not built in line with committed schedules, it may adversely affect our future growth plans. If
any future production lines do not achieve operating metrics similar to our existing production lines, our solar modules could
perform below expectations and cause us to lose customers.
If we are unable to systematically replicate our production lines over time and achieve operating metrics similar to our existing
production lines, our manufacturing capacity could be substantially constrained, our manufacturing costs per watt could increase,
our growth could be limited, and we may be in breach of our contracts with customers for failure to deliver modules. Such factors
may result in lower net sales, and/or lower net income than we anticipate. Future production lines could produce solar modules that
have lower conversion efficiencies, higher failure rates, and/or higher rates of degradation than solar modules from our existing
production lines, and we could be unable to determine the cause of the lower operating metrics or develop and implement solutions
to improve performance.
We are in the process of expanding our manufacturing capacity by approximately 11 GW including the construction of our third
manufacturing facility in the United States, which commenced commercial production of modules in early 2023; our first
manufacturing facility in India, which is expected to commence operations in the second half of 2023; our fourth manufacturing
facility in the United States, which is expected to commence operations in late 2024; and the expansion of our manufacturing
footprint at our existing facilities in Ohio. If we cannot successfully execute on our current capacity expansion plans, we may incur
significant costs in excess of our current plans to invest approximately $2.7 billion in the aggregate for these new facilities. If we
are not able to effectively manage current or future expansion activities or realize their anticipated benefits, it may adversely impact
our results of operations.DC
30
Table of Contents
Our substantial international operations subject us to a number of risks, including unfavorable political, regulatory, labor, and
tax conditions in the United States and/or foreign countries.
We have significant manufacturing, sales, and marketing operations both within and outside the United States and expect to
continue to expand our operations worldwide. Our global business requires us to respond to rapid changes in market conditions
worldwide. Our overall success depends, in part, on our ability to succeed in differing legal, regulatory, economic, social, and
political conditions. We may not be able to timely develop and implement policies and strategies that will be effective in each
location where we do business. Risks inherent to international operations include, but are not limited to, the following:
•difficulty in enforcing agreements in foreign legal systems;
•varying degrees of protection afforded to foreign investments in the countries in which we operate and irregular
interpretations and enforcement of laws and regulations in such jurisdictions;
•foreign countries may impose additional income and withholding taxes or otherwise tax our foreign operations, impose
tariffs, or adopt other restrictions on foreign trade and investment, including currency exchange controls;
•fluctuations in exchange rates may affect demand for our products and services and may adversely affect our profitability
and cash flows in U.S. dollars to the extent that our net sales or our costs are denominated in a foreign currency and the
cost associated with hedging the U.S. dollar equivalent of such exposures is prohibitive; the longer the duration of such
foreign currency exposure, the greater the risk;
•anti-corruption compliance issues, including the costs related to the mitigation of such risk;
•risk of nationalization or other expropriation of private enterprises;
•changes in general economic and political conditions in the countries in which we operate, including changes in
government incentive provisions;
•unexpected adverse changes in U.S. or foreign laws or regulatory requirements, including those with respect to
environmental protection, import or export duties, and quotas;
•opaque approval processes in which the lack of transparency may cause delays and increase the uncertainty of project
approvals;
•difficulty in staffing and managing widespread operations;
•difficulty in repatriating earnings;
•difficulty in negotiating a successful collective bargaining agreement in applicable foreign jurisdictions;
•trade barriers such as export requirements, tariffs, taxes, local content requirements, anti-dumping regulations and
requirements, and other restrictions and expenses, which could increase the effective price of our solar modules and make
us less competitive in some countries or increase the costs to perform under our existing contracts; and
•difficulty of, and costs relating to, compliance with the different commercial and legal requirements of the overseas
countries in which we offer and sell our solar modules.
31
Table of Contents
Risks Related to Regulations
We expect certain financial benefits as a result of tax incentives provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. If these
expected financial benefits vary significantly from our assumptions, our business, financial condition, and results of operations
could be adversely affected.
In August 2022, the U.S. President signed the IRA into law, which is intended to accelerate the country’s ongoing transition to clean
energy. The provisions of the IRA are generally effective for tax years beginning after 2022. We continue to evaluate the extent of
benefits available to us, which we expect will favorably impact our results of operations in future periods. For example, we
currently expect to qualify for the advanced manufacturing production credit under Section 45X of the IRC, which provides certain
specified benefits for solar modules and solar module components manufactured in the United States and sold to third parties. For
eligible components, the credit is equal to (i) $12 per square meter for a PV wafer, (ii) 4 cents multiplied by the capacity of a PV
cell, and (iii) 7 cents multiplied by the capacity of a PV module. Based on the current form factor of our modules, we expect to
qualify for a credit of approximately 17 cents per watt for each module produced in the United States and sold to a third party. Such
credit may be refundable or transferable to a third party and is available from 2023 to 2032, subject to phase down beginning in
2030.
There are currently several critical and complex aspects of the IRA pending technical guidance and regulations from the Internal
Revenue Service (“IRS”) and U.S. Treasury Department, including, but not limited to, the following:
•Total credit under Section 45X. The guidance is expected to confirm that a vertically-integrated solar module manufacturer
is entitled to the sum of the credit amounts for each eligible component that is integrated into the solar module, including
the credit amounts for the PV wafer, cell, and module, provided such components are produced in the United States. This
clarification may impact to what extent we qualify for a credit of approximately 17 cents per watt based on the current
form factor of our modules.
•Standardization of per-watt measurements. The guidance is expected to confirm and/or clarify the method by which
wattage is calculated to determine the applicable credit amounts for PV cells and modules. Our current evaluation of the
benefits available to us is based on the use of industry-wide standard test conditions to determine the nameplate capacity
of PV cells and modules. The guidance is expected to create meaningful consistency for credit calculation by
standardizing the process for determining solar module nameplate capacity. These clarifications may impact the extent of
the credit available to us for eligible PV cells and modules.
•Direct payment and transfer elections. The guidance is expected to clarify whether a taxpayer’s direct payment election
with respect to the Section 45X credit applies only to a single 5-year period or whether the taxpayer is entitled to make a
second direct payment election for a subsequent 5-year period during the 10-year credit period. This clarification will
impact whether we can monetize the credit in the form of cash payments directly from the government throughout the 10-
year credit period, or whether we would be required to monetize the credit through a sale to another taxpayer or taxpayers
during the subsequent 5-year period. The guidance is also expected to clarify whether the taxpayer is entitled to make the
direct payment election on a facility-by-facility basis, especially with respect to new manufacturing facilities that
commence production after the taxpayer has made the initial direct payment election. Such clarification may impact the
extent to which we will be able to make additional direct payment elections across multiple years for multiple
manufacturing facilities. Furthermore, the guidance is expected to address (i) how and when the credit is claimed by the
taxpayer, including the type of information necessary to verify the credit amount, (ii) whether the credit must be applied as
a reduction to any quarterly estimated tax payments or as an offset to any taxes that are reported on the taxpayer’s income
tax return for any taxable year in which a direct payment election is made, and (iii) the degree of review or examination by
the IRS or any other agency, including whether such review or examination would be a condition to receiving any direct
payment. These clarifications may impact the timing and extent of cash benefits available to us and, if the
32
Table of Contents
direct payment election cannot be made a second time, our ability to transfer the tax credits to another taxpayer or
taxpayers, which depends on the future demand for such credits.
•Domestic content requirements. The guidance is expected to confirm that domestic content rules are applied separately
with respect to steel and iron as compared to manufactured products, which would require that only a certain percentage of
the total costs of such manufactured product components are of U.S. origin. These clarifications may impact whether our
modules meet domestic content requirements, which is a key value proposition for current and future customers.
Alternatively, if the domestic content rules as defined by the final guidance are defined broadly, we may face significant
additional competition for module sales within the U.S. If our modules manufactured in the U.S. do not meet the domestic
content requirements as defined by the final guidance or if the guidance definition is defined broadly, this may adversely
impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and future expansion plans within the United States.
Any modifications to the law or its effects arising, for example, through (i) technical guidance and regulations from the IRS and
U.S. Treasury Department, including the certain aspects disclosed above, (ii) subsequent amendments to or interpretations of the
law, and/or (iii) future laws or regulations rendering certain provisions of the IRA less effective or ineffective, in whole or in part,
could result in changes to the expected and/or actual benefits in the future, which could have a material adverse effect on demand
and/or price levels for our solar modules, our net sales, and future expansion plans within the United States, and/or otherwise
adversely impact our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Existing regulations and policies, changes thereto, and new regulations and policies may present technical, regulatory, and
economic barriers to the purchase and use of PV solar products, which may significantly reduce demand for our modules.
The market for electricity generation products is heavily influenced by federal, state, local, and foreign government regulations and
policies concerning the electric utility industry, as well as policies promulgated by electric utilities. These regulations and policies
often relate to electricity pricing and interconnection of customer-owned electricity generation. In the United States and certain
other countries, these regulations and policies have been modified in the past and may be modified again in the future, which could
deter end-user purchases of PV solar products. For example, without a mandated regulatory exception for PV solar power systems,
system owners are often charged interconnection or standby fees for putting distributed power generation on the electric utility grid.
To the extent these interconnection standby fees are applicable to PV solar power systems, it is likely that they would increase the
cost of such systems, which could make the systems less desirable, thereby adversely affecting our business, financial condition,
and results of operations. Another example is the effect of governmental land-use planning policies and environmental policies on
utility-scale PV solar development. The adoption of restrictive land-use designations or environmental regulations that proscribe or
restrict the siting of utility-scale solar facilities could adversely affect the marginal cost of such development.
Our modules are often subject to oversight and regulation in accordance with national and local ordinances relating to building
codes, safety, environmental protection, and other matters, and tracking the requirements of individual jurisdictions is complex.
Any new government regulations or utility policies pertaining to our modules may result in significant additional expenses to us or
our customers and, as a result, could cause a significant reduction in demand for our products. In addition, any regulatory
compliance failure could result in significant management distraction, unplanned costs, and/or reputational damage.
We could be adversely affected by any violations of the FCPA, the U.K. Bribery Act, and other foreign anti-bribery laws.
The FCPA generally prohibits companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non-U.S. government
officials for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Other countries in which we operate also have anti-bribery laws, some
of which prohibit improper payments to government and non-government persons and
33
Table of Contents
entities, and others (e.g., the FCPA and the U.K. Bribery Act) extend their application to activities outside their country of origin.
Our policies mandate compliance with all applicable anti-bribery laws. We currently operate in, and may further expand into, key
parts of the world that have experienced governmental corruption to some degree and, in certain circumstances, strict compliance
with anti-bribery laws may conflict with local customs and practices. In addition, due to the level of regulation in our industry, our
operations in certain jurisdictions where norms can differ from U.S. standards, including China, India, South America, and the
Middle East, require substantial government contact, either directly by us or through intermediaries over whom we have less direct
control, such as subcontractors, agents, and partners (such as joint venture partners). Although we have implemented policies,
procedures, and, in certain cases, contractual arrangements designed to facilitate compliance with these anti-bribery laws, our
officers, directors, associates, subcontractors, agents, and partners may take actions in violation of our policies, procedures,
contractual arrangements, and anti-bribery laws. Any such violation, even if prohibited by our policies, could subject us and such
persons to criminal and/or civil penalties or other sanctions potentially by government prosecutors from more than one country,
which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, cash flows, and reputation.
Environmental obligations and liabilities could have a substantial negative impact on our business, financial condition, and
results of operations.
Our operations involve the use, handling, generation, processing, storage, transportation, and disposal of hazardous materials and
are subject to extensive environmental laws and regulations at the national, state, local, and international levels. These
environmental laws and regulations include those governing the discharge of pollutants into the air and water, the use, management,
and disposal of hazardous materials and wastes, the cleanup of contaminated sites, and occupational health and safety. As we
expand our business into foreign jurisdictions worldwide, our environmental compliance burden may continue to increase both in
terms of magnitude and complexity. We have incurred and may continue to incur significant costs in complying with these laws and
regulations. In addition, violations of, or liabilities under, environmental laws or permits may result in restrictions being imposed
on our operating activities or in our being subject to substantial fines, penalties, criminal proceedings, third-party property damage
or personal injury claims, cleanup costs, or other costs. While we believe we are currently in substantial compliance with applicable
environmental requirements, future developments such as more aggressive enforcement policies, the implementation of new, more
stringent laws and regulations, or the discovery of presently unknown environmental conditions may require expenditures that
could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Our solar modules contain CdTe and other semiconductor materials. Elemental cadmium and certain of its compounds are regulated
as hazardous materials due to the adverse health effects that may arise from human exposure. Based on existing research, the risks
of exposure to CdTe are not believed to be as serious as those relating to exposure to elemental cadmium due to CdTe’s limited
bioavailability. In our manufacturing operations, we maintain engineering controls to minimize our associates’ exposure to
cadmium compounds and require our associates who handle cadmium compounds to follow certain safety procedures, including the
use of personal protective equipment such as respirators, chemical goggles, and protective clothing. Relevant studies and third-
party peer reviews of our technology have concluded that the risk of exposure to cadmium or cadmium compounds from our end-
products is negligible. In addition, the risk of exposure is further minimized by the encapsulated nature of these materials in our
products, the physical properties of cadmium compounds used in our products, and the recycling or responsible disposal of our
modules. While we believe that these factors and procedures are sufficient to protect our associates, end users, and the general
public from adverse health effects that may arise from cadmium exposure, we cannot ensure that human or environmental exposure
to cadmium or cadmium compounds used in our products will not occur. Any such exposure could result in future third-party
claims against us, damage to our reputation, and heightened regulatory scrutiny, which could limit or impair our ability to sell and
distribute our products. The occurrence of future events such as these could have a material adverse effect on our business,
financial condition, and results of operations.
34
Table of Contents
The use of cadmium or cadmium compounds in various products is also coming under increasingly stringent governmental
regulation. Future regulation in this area could impact the manufacturing, sale, collection, and recycling of solar modules and could
require us to make unforeseen environmental expenditures or limit our ability to sell and distribute our products. Examples of such
regulations include the following:
•European Union Directive 2011/65/EU on the Restriction of the Use of Hazardous Substances (“RoHS”) in electrical and
electronic equipment (the “RoHS Directive”) restricts the use of certain hazardous substances, including cadmium and its
compounds, in all electronic equipment sold into the European market, unless excluded from the law. Currently, PV solar
modules are explicitly excluded from the scope of RoHS (Article 2), as adopted in June 2011. Other jurisdictions have
adopted similar legislation or are considering doing so. The next revision of the RoHS Directive is expected in 2025. If PV
modules were to be included in the scope of future RoHS revisions without an exemption, we would be required to
redesign our solar modules to reduce cadmium and other affected hazardous substances to the maximum allowable
concentration thresholds in the RoHS Directive in order to continue to offer them for sale within the EU. As such actions
would be impractical, this type of regulatory development would effectively close the EU market to us, which could have
a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
•In November 2022, the government of India, through its Ministry of Environment, Forest and Climate Change and MNRE,
introduced legislation intended to expand the scope of existing electronic waste (“e-waste”) regulations, including PV
solar modules. This regulation, as subsequently amended in January 2023, will also create extended producer obligations
for mandatory recycling of PV solar waste at the end of its useful life. These regulations are expected to come into effect
on April 1, 2023. At this time, the recycling targets, monitoring mechanism, and determination of who finances the
recycling costs are unclear, and, depending on the final procedures and rules, such regulations could negatively impact our
financial condition and results of operations in India.
General Risk Factors
Cyber-attacks or other breaches of our information systems, or those of third parties with which we do business, could have a
material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
Our operations rely on our computer systems, hardware, software, and networks, as well as those of third parties with which we do
business, to securely process, store, and transmit proprietary, confidential, and other information, including intellectual property
and personally identifiable information. We also rely heavily on these information systems to operate our manufacturing lines.
These information systems may be compromised by cyber-attacks, computer viruses, and other events that could be materially
disruptive to our business operations and could put the security of our information, and that of the third parties with which we do
business, at risk of misappropriation or destruction. In recent years, such cyber incidents have become increasingly frequent and
sophisticated, targeting or otherwise affecting a wide range of companies. While we have instituted security measures and procured
insurance to mitigate the likelihood and impact of a cyber incident, there is no assurance that these measures, or those of the third
parties with which we do business, will be adequate in the future. If these measures fail, valuable information may be lost; our
operations may be disrupted; we may be unable to fulfill our customer obligations; and our reputation may suffer. Additionally, any
cyber incident affecting our automated manufacturing lines could adversely affect our ability to produce solar modules or otherwise
affect the quality and performance of the modules produced. We may also be subject to litigation, regulatory action, remedial
expenses, and financial losses beyond the scope or limits of our insurance coverage. These consequences of a failure of security
measures could, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of
operations.
35
Table of Contents
The severity and duration of public health threats (including pandemics such as COVID-19 or similarly infectious diseases)
could materially impact our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to impact various countries throughout the world, including those in which we do business or
have operations, though the scope and severity of COVID-19 continues to evolve. With the exception of certain manufacturing
charges incurred in 2020 and 2021, the COVID-19 pandemic and its effects on the economy did not materially impact our business,
financial condition, and/or results of operations. However, the extent to which public health threats (including pandemics such as
COVID-19 or similarly infectious diseases) could impact us in the future is highly uncertain and cannot be predicted, and will
depend largely on subsequent developments, including but not limited to (i) the severity and duration of any public health threat,
(ii) measures taken to contain the spread of any public health threat, such as restrictions on travel and gatherings of people and
temporary closures of or limitations on businesses and other commercial activities, (iii) the timing and nature of policies
implemented by governmental authorities, and (iv) any future variants of any public health threat, which may surge over time.
As a result of any public health threat and any related containment measures and reopening policies, we may be subject to
significant risks, which have the potential to materially and adversely impact our business, financial condition, and results of
operations, including the following:
•we may at any time be ordered by governmental authorities, or we may determine, based on our understanding of the
recommendations or orders of governmental authorities, that we have to curtail or cease business operations or activities,
including manufacturing and R&D activities; and
•the failure of our suppliers or vendors to supply materials or equipment, or the failure of our vendors to install, repair, or
replace our specialized equipment, due to any public health threat and related containment measures, may idle, slowdown,
shutdown, or otherwise cause us to adjust our manufacturing capacity, and the availability and cost of logistics services
associated with the procurement of raw materials or equipment used in our manufacturing process and the shipping,
handling, storage, and distribution of our modules may require us to adjust our module manufacturing plans or module
delivery commitments, which may result in additional unplanned charges.
If we are unable to attract, train, retain, and successfully integrate key talent into our management team, our business may be
materially and adversely affected.
Our future success depends, to a significant extent, on our ability to attract, train, and retain management, operations, sales, and
technical talent, including associates in foreign jurisdictions. Recruiting and retaining capable individuals, particularly those with
expertise in the PV solar industry across a variety of technologies, are vital to our success. We are also dependent on the services of
our executive officers and other members of our senior management team. The loss of one or more of these key associates or any
other member of our senior management team could have a material adverse effect on our business. Although we have a succession
planning process in place, we may not be able to retain or replace these key associates in a timely manner. Several of our current
key associates, including our executive officers, are subject to employment conditions or arrangements that contain post-
employment non-competition provisions. However, these arrangements permit the associates to terminate their employment with us
upon little or no notice. In addition, on January 5, 2023, the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (“FTC”) voted to issue a notice of
proposed rulemaking that, if adopted, would ban non-competition provisions. The proposed rule would make it illegal for an
employer to enter into, attempt to enter into, or maintain a non-competition provision. It would also require an employer to rescind
any existing non-competition provisions. The proposed rule is subject to a public comment period through March 10, 2023, after
which the FTC may vote to implement the proposed rule or may update or revise it based on the comments received and the FTC’s
further analysis of the issue. Although it is uncertain if the rule will be adopted or what the final language of the rule, if adopted,
will be, the implementation of a ban on non-competition provisions could make it more difficult for us to retain qualified
associates.
36
Table of Contents
There is substantial competition for qualified technical and manufacturing personnel, and while we continue to benchmark our
organization against a broad spectrum of businesses in our market space to remain economically competitive, there can be no
assurances that we will be able to attract and retain technical personnel. As we continue to expand domestically and internationally,
we may encounter regional laws that mandate union representation or associates who desire union representation or a collective
bargaining agreement. If we are unable to attract and retain qualified associates, or otherwise experience unexpected labor
disruptions within our business, we may be materially and adversely affected.
We may be exposed to infringement or misappropriation claims by third parties, which, if determined adversely to us, could
cause us to pay significant damage awards or prohibit us from the manufacture and sale of our solar modules or the use of our
technology.
Our success depends largely on our ability to use and develop our technology and know-how without infringing or
misappropriating the intellectual property rights of third parties. The validity and scope of claims relating to PV solar technology
patents involve complex scientific, legal, and factual considerations and analysis and, therefore, may be highly uncertain. We may
be subject to litigation involving claims of patent infringement or violation of intellectual property rights of third parties. For
example, during 2022, we received various indemnification demands from certain customers, for whom we provided EPC services,
regarding claims that such customers’ PV tracker systems infringe, in part, on patents owned by Rovshan Sade (“Sade”), the owner
of a company called Trabant Solar, Inc. See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies – Legal Proceedings” to our consolidated
financial statements for more information on our legal proceedings. The defense and prosecution of intellectual property suits,
patent opposition proceedings, and related legal and administrative proceedings can be both costly and time consuming and may
significantly divert the efforts and resources of our technical and management personnel. An adverse determination in any such
litigation or proceedings to which we may become a party could subject us to significant liability to third parties, require us to seek
licenses from third parties, which may not be available on reasonable terms, or at all, or pay ongoing royalties, require us to
redesign our solar modules, or subject us to injunctions prohibiting the manufacture and sale of our solar modules or the use of our
technologies. Protracted litigation could also result in our customers or potential customers deferring or limiting their purchase or
use of our solar modules until the resolution of such litigation.
Currency translation and transaction risk may negatively affect our results of operations.
Although our reporting currency is the U.S. dollar, we conduct certain business and incur costs in the local currency of most
countries in which we operate. As a result, we are subject to currency translation and transaction risk. For example, certain of our
net sales in 2022 were denominated in foreign currencies, such as Japanese yen and Euro, and we expect to continue to have net
sales denominated in foreign currencies in the future, such as Indian rupee. Certain business arrangements outside the United States
have involved and may involve significant investments denominated in local currencies. Changes in exchange rates between
foreign currencies and the U.S. dollar could affect our results of operations and result in exchange gains or losses. We cannot
accurately predict the impact of future exchange rate fluctuations on our results of operations.
We could also expand our business into emerging markets, many of which have an uncertain regulatory environment relating to
currency policy. Conducting business in such emerging markets could cause our exposure to changes in exchange rates to increase,
due to the relatively high volatility associated with emerging market currencies and potentially longer payment terms for our
proceeds.
Our ability to hedge foreign currency exposure is dependent on our credit profile with the banks that are willing and able to do
business with us. Deterioration in our credit position or a significant tightening of the credit market conditions could limit our
ability to hedge our foreign currency exposures; and therefore, result in exchange gains or losses.
37
Table of Contents
Unanticipated changes in our tax provision, the enactment of new tax legislation, or exposure to additional income tax
liabilities could affect our profitability.
We are subject to income taxes in the various jurisdictions in which we operate. Accordingly, we are subject to a variety of tax laws
and interpretations of such laws by local tax authorities. For example, in January 2022, the U.S. government published new
regulations in the U.S. Federal Register to address various aspects of foreign tax credit regimes, including, among other things,
guidance related to the disallowance of credits or deductions for foreign income taxes. These regulations, which became effective
in March 2022, contain certain provisions that are applicable for periods prior to the effective date, and the final effects could result
in material income tax expense in future periods. Furthermore, longstanding international tax laws that determine each country’s
jurisdictional tax rights in cross-border international trade continue to evolve as a result of the base erosion and profit shifting
reporting requirements and the introduction of the global minimum tax recommended by the Organization for Economic Co-
operation and Development. Additionally, in August 2022, the U.S. President signed into law the IRA, which revised U.S. tax law
by, among other things, including a new corporate alternative minimum tax (the “CAMT”) of 15% on certain large corporations,
imposing a 1% excise tax on stock buybacks, and providing various incentives to address climate change, including the
introduction of the advanced manufacturing production credit. The provisions of the IRA are generally effective for tax years
beginning after 2022. Given the complexities of the IRA, which is pending technical guidance and regulations from the IRS and
U.S. Treasury Department, we will continue to monitor these developments and evaluate the potential future impact to our results
of operations. For further information, see the Risk Factor entitled, “We expect certain financial benefits as a result of tax incentives
provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. If these expected financial benefits vary significantly from our assumptions, our
business, financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.” Changes to these and other tax laws and
regulations could have a material adverse impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations.
We are subject to potential tax examinations in various jurisdictions, and taxing authorities may disagree with our interpretations of
U.S. and foreign tax laws and may assess additional taxes. We regularly assess the likely outcomes of these examinations in order
to determine the appropriateness of our tax provision; however, the outcome of tax examinations cannot be predicted with certainty.
Therefore, the amounts ultimately paid upon resolution of such examinations could be materially different from the amounts
previously included in our income tax provision, which could have a material adverse impact on our business, financial condition,
and results of operations.
In addition, our future effective tax rate could be adversely affected by changes to our operating structure, losses of tax holidays,
changes in the jurisdictional mix of earnings among countries with tax holidays or differing statutory tax rates, changes in the
valuation of deferred tax assets and liabilities, changes in tax laws, and the discovery of new information in the course of our tax
return preparation process. Any changes in our effective tax rate may have a material adverse impact on our business, financial
conditions, and results of operations.
We have been and may be subject to or involved in litigation or threatened litigation, the outcome of which may be difficult to
predict, and which may be costly to defend, divert management attention, require us to pay damages, or restrict the operation of
our business.
From time to time, we have been and may be subject to disputes and litigation, with and without merit, that may be costly and
which may divert the attention of our management and our resources in general, whether or not any dispute actually proceeds to
litigation. The results of complex legal proceedings are difficult to predict. Moreover, complaints filed against us may not specify
the amount of damages that plaintiffs seek, and we therefore may be unable to estimate the possible range of damages that might be
incurred should these lawsuits be resolved against us. Even if we are able to estimate losses related to these actions, the ultimate
amount of loss may be materially higher than our estimates. Any resolution of litigation, or threatened litigation, could involve the
payment of damages or expenses by us, which may be significant or involve an agreement with terms that restrict the operation of
our business. Even if any future lawsuits are not resolved against us, the costs of defending such lawsuits may be significant. These
costs may exceed the dollar limits of our insurance policies or may not be covered at all by our
38
Table of Contents
insurance policies. Because the price of our common stock has been, and may continue to be, volatile, we can provide no assurance
that additional securities or other litigation will not be filed against us in the future. See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies
– Legal Proceedings” to our consolidated financial statements for more information on our legal proceedings.
Changes in, or any failure to comply with, privacy laws, regulations, and standards may adversely affect our business.
Personal privacy and data security have become significant issues in the United States, India, Europe, and in many other
jurisdictions in which we operate. The regulatory framework for privacy and security issues worldwide is rapidly evolving and is
likely to remain uncertain for the foreseeable future. Furthermore, federal, state, or foreign government bodies or agencies have in
the past adopted, and may in the future adopt, laws and regulations affecting data privacy, all of which may be subject to
invalidation by relevant foreign judicial bodies. Industry organizations also regularly adopt and advocate for new standards in this
area.
In the United States, these include rules and regulations promulgated or pending under the authority of federal agencies, state
attorneys general, legislatures, and consumer protection agencies. Internationally, many jurisdictions in which we operate have
established their own data security and privacy legal framework with which we, relevant suppliers, and customers must comply.
For example, the General Data Protection Regulation, a broad-based data privacy regime enacted by the European Parliament,
which became effective in May 2018, imposed new requirements on how we collect, process, transfer, and store personal data, and
also imposed additional obligations, potential penalties, and risk upon our business. Additionally, the California Consumer Privacy
Act, which became effective in January 2020, imposed similar data privacy requirements. In many jurisdictions, enforcement
actions and consequences for noncompliance are also rising. In addition to government regulation, privacy advocates and industry
groups may propose new and different self-regulatory standards that either legally or contractually apply to us. Although we have
implemented policies, procedures, and, in certain cases, contractual arrangements designed to facilitate compliance with applicable
privacy and data security laws and standards, any inability or perceived inability to adequately address privacy and security
concerns, even if unfounded, or comply with applicable privacy and data security laws, regulations, and policies, could result in
additional fines, costs, and liabilities to us, damage our reputation, inhibit sales, and adversely affect our business.
Our Amended and Restated Bylaws designate a state or federal court located within the State of Delaware as the exclusive
forum for substantially all disputes between us and our stockholders, and the federal district courts of the United States as the
exclusive forum for the resolution of any complaint asserting a cause of action under the Securities Act of 1933, which could
limit our stockholders’ ability to choose the judicial forum for disputes with us or our directors, officers, employees, agents or
stockholders.
Our Amended and Restated Bylaws (“Bylaws”) provide that, unless we consent in writing to the selection of an alternative forum,
the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware (or, if the Court of Chancery of the State of Delaware lacks subject matter
jurisdiction, the federal district court for the District of Delaware) is the sole and exclusive forum for (i) any derivative action or
proceeding brought on our behalf, (ii) any action or proceeding asserting a claim of breach of a fiduciary duty owed by any of our
directors, officers, other employees, agents or stockholders to us or our stockholders, (iii) any action or proceeding against us or
any of our directors, officers, other employees, agents or stockholders arising pursuant to any provision of the Delaware General
Corporation Law (“DGCL”), our Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation or our Bylaws, (iv) any action or proceeding
against us or any of our directors, officers or other employees asserting a claim that is governed by the internal affairs doctrine, or
(v) any action or proceeding asserting an “internal corporate claim,” as defined in the DGCL. Our Bylaws also provide that, unless
we consent in writing to the selection of an alternative forum, the federal district courts of the United States are the exclusive forum
for resolving any complaint asserting a cause of action under the Securities Act. Nothing in our Bylaws precludes stockholders that
assert claims under the Exchange Act from bringing such claims in any court, subject to applicable law.
39
Table of Contents
Any person or entity holding, owning or otherwise acquiring any interest in any of our securities shall be deemed to have notice of
and consented to these provisions. These exclusive forum provisions may limit a stockholder’s ability to bring a claim in a judicial
forum of its choosing for disputes with us or our directors, officers, other employees, agents or stockholders, which may discourage
lawsuits against us and our directors, officers, other employees, agents or stockholders. The enforceability of similar choice of
forum provisions in other companies’ governing documents has been challenged in legal proceedings, and it is possible that a court
could find these types of provisions to be inapplicable or unenforceable. For example, in December 2018, the Court of Chancery of
the State of Delaware determined that a provision stating that federal district courts of the United States are the exclusive forum for
resolving any complaint asserting a cause of action arising under the Securities Act is not enforceable. Although this decision was
reversed by the Delaware Supreme Court in March 2020, courts in other states may still find these provisions to be inapplicable or
unenforceable. If a court were to find the exclusive forum provisions in our Bylaws to be inapplicable or unenforceable in an
action, we may incur additional costs associated with resolving the dispute in other jurisdictions, which could adversely affect our
results of operations.
Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
Item 2. Properties
As of December 31, 2022, our principal properties consisted of the following:
NaturePrimary Segment(s)
Using Property Location Held
Corporate headquarters Modules & Other Tempe, Arizona, United States Lease
Manufacturing plants, R&D facilities, and
administrative of ficesModules Perrysbur g and Lake Township, Ohio, United
StatesOwn
R&D facility Modules Santa Clara, California, United States Lease
Manufacturing plant and administrative of fices Modules Kulim, Kedah, Malaysia Lease land, own
buildings
Administrative of fices Modules & Other Geor getown, Penang, Malaysia Lease
Manufacturing plant Modules Ho Chi Minh City , Vietnam Lease land, own
buildings
Manufacturing plant (1) Modules Tamil Nadu, India Lease land, own
buildings
Manufacturing plant (2) Modules Frankfurt/Oder , Germany Own
Manufacturing plant (3) Modules Trinity , Alabama, United States Own
——————————
(1) Manufacturing plant currently under construction; operations are expected to commence in the second half of 2023.
(2) In December  2012, we ceased manufacturing at our German plant. Since its closure, we have, from time to time, marketed such
property for sale.
(3) Manufacturing plant currently under construction; operations are expected to commence in late 2024.
Item 3. Legal Proceedings
See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies – Legal Proceedings” to our consolidated financial statements for information
regarding legal proceedings and related matters.
Item 4. Mine Safety Disclosures
None.
40
Table of Contents
PART II
Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
Market Information
Our common stock is listed on The Nasdaq Stock Market LLC under the symbol FSLR.
Holders
As of February 24, 2023, there were 44 record holders of our common stock, which does not reflect beneficial owners of our
shares.
Dividend Policy
We have never paid and do not expect to pay dividends on our common stock for the foreseeable future. The declaration and
payment of dividends is subject to the discretion of our board of directors and depends on various factors, including our net income,
financial condition, cash requirements, future prospects, and other factors considered relevant by our board of directors. We expect
to prioritize our working capital requirements, capacity expansion and other capital expenditure needs, R&D and technology
investments, and merger and acquisition opportunities prior to returning capital to our shareholders.
Stock Price Performance Graph
The following graph compares the five-year cumulative total return on our common stock relative to the cumulative total returns of
the S&P 500 Index and the Invesco Solar ETF, which represents a peer group of solar companies. For purposes of the graph, an
investment of $100 (with reinvestment of all dividends) is assumed to have been made in our common stock, the S&P 500 Index,
and the Invesco Solar ETF on December 31, 2017, and its relative performance is tracked through December 31, 2022. This graph
is not “soliciting material,” is not deemed filed with the SEC, and is not to be incorporated by reference in any filing by us under
the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, whether made before or after the date hereof, and irrespective of any general incorporation
language in any such filing. The stock price performance shown in the graph represents past performance and is not necessarily
indicative of future stock price performance.
41
Table of Contents
Recent Sales of Unregistered Securities
None.
Purchases of Equity Securities by the Issuer and Affiliate Purchases
None.
Item 6. Reserved
None.
Item 7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations should be read in conjunction with our
consolidated financial statements and the related notes thereto included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K. In addition to
historical financial information, the following discussion and analysis contains forward-looking statements that involve risks,
uncertainties, and assumptions as described under the “Note Regarding Forward-Looking Statements” that appears earlier in this
Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our actual results could differ materially from those anticipated by these forward-looking statements
as a result of many factors, including those discussed under Item 1A. “Risk Factors,” and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form
10-K. This discussion and analysis does not address certain items in respect of the year ended December 31, 2020. See Item 7.
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in our Annual Report on Form 10-K
for the year ended December 31, 2021 for comparative discussions of our results of operations and liquidity and capital resources
for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.
Executive Overview
We are a leading American solar technology company and global provider of PV solar energy solutions. Developed at our R&D
labs in California and Ohio, we manufacture and sell PV solar modules with an advanced thin film semiconductor technology that
provide a high-performance, lower-carbon alternative to conventional crystalline silicon PV solar modules. From raw material
sourcing through end-of-life module recycling, we are committed to reducing the environmental impacts and enhancing the social
and economic benefits of our products across their life cycle. We are the world’s largest thin film PV solar module manufacturer
and the largest PV solar module manufacturer in the Western Hemisphere.
Certain of our financial results and other key operational developments for the year ended December 31, 2022 include the
following:
•Net sales for 2022 decreased by 10% to $2.6 billion compared to $2.9 billion in 2021. The decrease in net sales was
primarily attributable to sales of certain projects in the United States and Japan in the prior period, the prior period
settlement of an outstanding indemnification arrangement associated with the sale of one of our projects, and a decrease in
the average selling price per watt, partially offset by an increase in the volume of modules sold to third parties.
•Gross profit decreased 22.3 percentage points to 2.7% in 2022 from 25.0% in 2021 primarily due to a decrease in the
average selling price per watt of our modules, the volume of higher gross profit projects sold during the prior period, an
increase in sales freight, demurrage, and detention charges, an impairment loss for our Luz del Norte PV solar power
plant, and the prior period settlement of the indemnification matter mentioned above. These decreases to gross profit were
partially offset by the higher volume of modules sold and continued module cost reductions.
42
Table of Contents
•As of December 31, 2022, we had approximately 9.8 GW of total installed nameplate module production capacity
across all our facilities. We produced 9.1 GW of solar modules during 2022, which represented a 15% increase in
module production from 2021. The increase in production was primarily driven by higher throughput at our manufacturing
facilities. We expect to produce between 11.5 GW and 12.2 GW of solar modules during 2023.
•During 2022, we announced plans to expand our manufacturing capacity by an additional 4.4 GW by constructing our
fourth manufacturing facility in the United States and increasing our manufacturing footprint at our existing facilities in
Ohio. Such expansion plans, in combination with our previously announced expansion plans, are expected to increase our
manufacturing capacity by approximately 11 GW by 2025.
•In May 2022, we entered into various agreements with certain subsidiaries of PAG Real Assets (“PAG”), a private
investment firm, for the sale of our Japan project development business. In June 2022, we completed the sale and,
following certain customary post-closing adjustments, received total consideration of ¥66.4 billion ($490.8 million) and
transferred cash and restricted cash of ¥8.4 billion ($61.9 million) to PAG. As a result of this transaction, we recognized a
gain of $245.2 million, net of transaction costs, which was included in “Gain on sales of businesses, net” in our
consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2022. In September 2022, we also completed the
sale of our Japanese O&M operations to a subsidiary of PAG and, following certain customary post-closing adjustments,
received total consideration of ¥692.7 million ($4.8 million). As a result of this transaction, we recognized a gain of
$1.4 million, net of transaction costs and post-closing adjustments, which was included in “Gain on sales of businesses,
net” in our consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31, 2022.
Market Overview
Solar energy is one of the fastest growing forms of renewable energy with numerous economic and environmental benefits that
make it an attractive complement to and/or substitute for traditional forms of energy generation. In recent years, the cost of
producing electricity from PV solar power systems has decreased to levels that are competitive with or below the wholesale price of
electricity in many markets. This price decline has opened new possibilities to develop systems in many locations with limited or
no financial incentives, thereby promoting the widespread adoption of solar energy. Additionally, recently enacted government
support programs, such as the IRA discussed above, have contributed to this momentum by providing solar module manufacturers,
project developers, and project owners with various incentives to accelerate the ongoing transition to clean energy. For more
information about these support programs, see Item 1. “Business - Support Programs.”
Supply and demand. As a result of the market opportunities described above, we are in the process of expanding our manufacturing
capacity by approximately 11 GW, including the construction of our third manufacturing facility in the United States, which
commenced commercial production of modules in early 2023; our first manufacturing facility in India, which is expected to
commence operations in the second half of 2023; our fourth manufacturing facility in the United States, which is expected to
commence operations in late 2024; and the expansion of our manufacturing footprint at our existing facilities in Ohio. In the
aggregate, we believe manufacturers of solar cells and modules, particularly those in China, have significant installed production
capacity, relative to global demand, and the ability for additional capacity expansion. Accordingly, we believe the solar industry
may experience periods of structural imbalance between supply and demand, which could lead to periods of pricing volatility. In
light of such market realities, we continue to focus on our strategies and points of differentiation, which include our advanced
module technology, our manufacturing process, our R&D capabilities, the sustainability advantage of our modules, and our
financial stability.DC
DC
DC DC
DC
DC 
DC
43
Table of Contents
Pricing competition. The solar industry has been characterized by intense pricing competition, both at the module and system
levels. This competition may result in an environment in which pricing falls rapidly, thereby potentially increasing demand for solar
energy solutions but constraining the ability for project developers and module manufacturers to sustain meaningful and consistent
profitability. Our results of operations could be adversely affected if competitors reduce pricing to levels below their costs, bid
aggressively low prices for module sale agreements, or are able to operate at minimal or negative operating margins for sustained
periods of time. For certain of our competitors, including many in China, these practices may be enabled by their direct or indirect
access to sovereign capital or other forms of state support. Although module average selling prices in many global markets have
declined for several years, recent module spot pricing has increased, in part, due to trade measures and policies, government
regulations, raw material availability, and supply chain disruptions. For example, module spot pricing in the United States has
increased, in part, due to elevated commodity and logistics costs and, more recently, due to the rising demand for modules
manufactured in the United States as a result of the IRA. The duration of this elevated period of pricing is uncertain.
Diverse offerings. We face intense competition from manufacturers of crystalline silicon solar modules and other emerging
technologies. Solar module manufacturers compete with one another on sales price per watt, which may be influenced by several
module value attributes, including wattage (through a larger form factor or an improved conversion efficiency), energy yield,
degradation, sustainability, and reliability. Sales price per watt may also be influenced by warranty terms and customer payment
terms. While conventional solar modules are monofacial, meaning their ability to produce energy is a function of direct and diffuse
irradiance on their front side, most module manufacturers offer bifacial modules that also capture diffuse irradiance on the back
side of a module. We currently produce monofacial solar modules and, based on recent R&D activities, expect to produce bifacial
solar modules in the near term. Bifaciality compromises nameplate efficiency, but by converting both front and rear side irradiance,
such technology may improve the overall energy production of a module relative to nameplate efficiency when applied in certain
applications, which could potentially lower the overall LCOE of a system when compared to systems using conventional solar
modules, including the modules we currently produce. Additionally, certain module manufacturers have introduced n-type mono-
crystalline modules, such as TOPCon modules, which are expected to provide certain improvements to module efficiency,
temperature coefficient, and bifacial performance, and claim to provide certain degradation advantages compared to other mono-
crystalline modules.
Product efficiencies. We believe we are among the lowest cost module manufacturers in the solar industry on a module cost per
watt basis, based on publicly available information. This cost competitiveness allows us to compete favorably in markets where
pricing for modules and systems is highly competitive. Our cost competitiveness is based in large part on our advanced thin film
semiconductor technology, module wattage (or conversion efficiency), proprietary manufacturing process (which enables us to
produce a CdTe module in a matter of hours using a continuous and highly automated industrial manufacturing process, as opposed
to a batch process), and our focus on operational excellence. In addition, our CdTe modules use approximately 2% to 3% of the
amount of semiconductor material that is used to manufacture conventional crystalline silicon solar modules. The cost of
polysilicon is a significant driver of the manufacturing cost of crystalline silicon solar modules, and the timing and rate of change in
the cost of silicon feedstock and polysilicon could lead to changes in solar module pricing levels. In recent years, polysilicon
consumption per cell has been reduced through various initiatives, which have contributed to declines in our relative manufacturing
cost competitiveness over conventional crystalline silicon module manufacturers.
Energy performance. In many climates our solar modules provide certain energy production advantages relative to competing
crystalline silicon solar modules. As a result, our solar modules can produce more annual energy in real world operating conditions
than conventional crystalline silicon modules with the same nameplate capacity. For more information about these advantages, see
Item 1. “Business – Business Strategy.” Additionally, we warrant that our solar modules will produce at least 98% of their labeled
power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage reducing by a degradation factor between 0.3% and 0.5%,
depending on the module series, every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years.
44
Table of Contents
While our modules are generally competitive in cost, reliability, and performance attributes, there can be no guarantee such
competitiveness will continue to exist in the future to the same extent or at all. Any declines in the competitiveness of our products
could result in further declines in the average selling prices of our modules and additional margin compression. We continue to
focus on enhancing the competitiveness of our solar modules through our module technology and cost reduction roadmaps.
Certain Trends and Uncertainties
We believe that our business, financial condition, and results of operations may be favorably or unfavorably impacted by the
following trends and uncertainties. See Item 1A. “Risk Factors” and elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K for discussions
of other risks that may affect us.
Our business is evolving worldwide and is shaped by the varying ways in which our offerings can be compelling and economically
viable solutions to energy needs in various markets. In addressing electricity demands, we are focused on providing utility-scale
module offerings in key geographic markets that we believe have a significant need for mass-scale PV solar electricity, including
markets throughout the United States, India, and Europe. We closely evaluate and monitor the appropriate level of resources
required to support such markets and their associated sales opportunities. When deployed in utility-scale applications, our modules
provide energy at a lower LCOE compared to traditional forms of energy generation, making them an attractive alternative to or
replacement for aging fossil fuel-based generation resources. Accordingly, future retirements of aging energy generation resources
represent a significant increase in the potential market for solar energy.
This focus on utility-scale module offerings exists within a current market environment that includes rooftop and distributed
generation solar. We believe that utility-scale solar will continue to be a compelling offering for companies with technology and
cost leadership and will continue to represent an increasing portion of the overall electricity generation mix. However, our module
offerings in certain markets may be driven, in part, by future demand for rooftop and distributed generation solar solutions. For
example, we continue to evaluate opportunities to develop and leverage other solar cell technologies in multi-junction applications
that utilize our thin film PV technology. We believe such applications have the potential to enable our module conversion efficiency
to reach 28% by 2030.
Demand for our PV solar module offerings depends, in part, on market factors outside our control. For example, many governments
have proposed or enacted policies or support programs intended to encourage renewable energy investments to achieve
decarbonization objectives and/or establish greater energy independence. While we compete in markets that do not require solar-
specific government subsidies or support programs, our net sales and profits remain subject to variability based on the availability
and size of government subsidies and economic incentives. Adverse changes in these factors could increase the cost of utility-scale
systems, which could reduce demand for our solar modules. Recent developments to government support programs include the
following:
•United States. In August 2022, the U.S. President signed the IRA into law, which is intended to accelerate the country’s
ongoing transition to clean energy. The provisions of the IRA are generally effective for tax years beginning after 2022.
Among other things, the financial incentives provided by the IRA are expected to significantly increase demand for
modules manufactured in the United States. Accordingly, the demand for these solar modules is expected to increase
domestic manufacturing in the near term, which may result in localized supply chain constraints and periods of
inflationary pricing for certain of our key raw materials, including substrate glass and cover glass. The financial incentives
provided by the IRA are also expected to significantly increase demand for solar modules in general due to the incremental
tax credit available for the qualified production of clean hydrogen that is powered by renewable resources. Given the
complexities of the IRA, which is pending technical guidance and regulations from the IRS and U.S. Treasury
Department, we continue to evaluate the extent of benefits available to us, which we expect will favorably impact our
results of operations in future periods. For example, we currently expect to qualify for the advanced manufacturing
production credit under Section 45X of the IRC, which provides certain specified
45
Table of Contents
benefits for solar modules and solar module components manufactured in the United States and sold to third parties. Such
credit, which may be refundable to us or transferable to a third party, is available through 2032, subject to phase down
beginning in 2030. For more information about certain risks associated with the benefits available to us under the IRA, see
Item 1A. “Risk Factors – We expect certain financial benefits as a result of tax incentives provided by the Inflation
Reduction Act of 2022. If these expected financial benefits vary significantly from our assumptions, our business,
financial condition, and results of operations could be adversely affected.”
•India. In September 2022, the government of India approved an expansion to its PLI scheme to INR 195 billion ($2.5
billion), which is intended to promote the manufacturing of high efficiency solar modules in India and to reduce India’s
dependency on foreign imports of solar modules. Under the PLI scheme, manufacturers are selected through a competitive
bid process and receive certain cash incentives over a five-year period following the commissioning of their
manufacturing facilities. Among other things, such incentives are based on the efficiency and temperature coefficient of
the modules produced, the proportion of raw materials sourced from the domestic market, the extent to which the
manufacturer’s operations are fully integrated within India, and the quantity of modules sold from such manufacturing
operations. At this time, it is uncertain whether and to what extent we may qualify for such incentives.
Demand for our solar energy solutions also depends on domestic or international trade policies and government regulations, which
may be proposed, revised, and/or enacted across short- and long-term time horizons with varying degrees of impact to our net sales,
profit, and manufacturing operations. Changes in these policies and regulations could adversely impact the competitive landscape
of solar markets, which could reduce demand for our solar modules. Recent revisions or proposed changes to trade policy and
government regulations include the following:
•United States. In June 2022, the U.S. President authorized the U.S. Secretary of Commerce to provide a 24-month
antidumping and countervailing duty tariff exemption for imported solar panels from certain Southeast Asian countries.
For more information about this development, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – The reduction, elimination, or expiration of
government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy targets, and other support for on-grid solar
electricity applications, or the impact of other public policies, such as tariffs or other trade remedies imposed on solar cells
and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar modules and limit our growth or lead to a
reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our operating results.” Separately, the U.S.
President also authorized the use of the Defense Production Act to expand domestic production of clean energy
technologies. At this time, it is uncertain what impact, if any, these developments will have on future investments in solar
module manufacturing in the United States.
•United States. In June 2022, the U.S. Supreme Court issued a ruling in West Virginia, et al. v. Environmental Protection
Agency, et al., which limited the Environmental Protection Agency’s (“EPA”) ability to regulate greenhouse gas (“GHG”)
emissions under the Clean Air Act using a “generation shifting” approach from coal-fired power plants to renewable
energy sources over time. At this time, it is unclear what effect this ruling will have on future EPA regulation of GHG
emissions, the U.S. President’s climate change initiatives, internationally agreed-upon climate goals, the extent and timing
of future coal plant retirements in the United States, and/or future investments in renewable energy.
•India. The ALMM was introduced in 2021 as a non-tariff barrier to incentivize domestic manufacturing of PV modules by
approving the list of models and manufacturers who can participate in certain solar development projects. The ALMM is
approved by the MNRE, and any modifications to the ALMM and its application may affect future investments in solar
module manufacturing in India. For more information about the ALMM, see Item 1A. “Risk Factors – The reduction,
elimination, or expiration of government subsidies, economic incentives, tax incentives, renewable energy targets, and
other support for on-grid solar electricity applications, or the impact of other public policies, such as tariffs or other trade
remedies imposed on solar cells and modules, could negatively impact demand and/or price levels for our solar
46
Table of Contents
modules and limit our growth or lead to a reduction in our net sales or increase our costs, thereby adversely impacting our
operating results.”
Our ability to provide solar modules on economically attractive terms is also affected by the availability and cost of logistics
services associated with the procurement of raw materials or equipment used in our manufacturing process and the shipping,
handling, storage, and distribution of our modules. For example, although the cost of ocean freight throughout many parts of the
world has recently decreased, such costs remain at elevated levels relative to pre-COVID-19 pandemic rates. Such factors may
disrupt our supply chain and adversely impact our manufacturing operations as several of our key raw materials and components
are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of international suppliers. We may also incur additional logistics costs,
such as demurrage and detention, to the extent we are unable to retrieve or return our shipping containers in a timely manner. To
mitigate such costs and better meet our customer commitments, we may adjust our shipping plans to include additional lead times
for module deliveries and/or utilize our network of U.S. distribution centers. We are also employing module contract structures that
provide additional consideration to us if the cost of logistics services, excluding demurrage and detention, exceeds a defined
threshold. Additionally, our manufacturing capacity expansions in the U.S. and India are expected to bring manufacturing activities
closer to customer demand, further mitigating our exposure to the cost of ocean freight. While it is currently unclear how long these
issues will persist, they may be further exacerbated by the disruption of major shipping routes or other economic disruptions.
We generally price and sell our solar modules on a per watt basis. As of December 31, 2022, we had entered into contracts with
customers for the future sale of 61.4 GW of solar modules for an aggregate transaction price of $17.7 billion, which we expect to
recognize as revenue through 2029 as we transfer control of the modules to the customers. Such volume includes contracts for the
sale of 31.5 GW of solar modules that include transaction price adjustments associated with future module technology
improvements, including new product designs and enhancements to certain energy related attributes. Based on these potential
technology improvements, the contracted module volumes as of December 31, 2022, the expected timing such technology
improvements are incorporated into our manufacturing process, and the expected timing of module deliveries, such adjustments, if
realized, could result in additional revenue of up to $0.5 billion, the majority of which would be recognized in 2025, 2026, and
2027. In addition to these price adjustments, certain of our contracts with customers may include favorable price adjustments
associated with the extension of the ITC and/or sales freight in excess of a defined threshold. Certain of our contracts with
customers may also include favorable or unfavorable price adjustments associated with changes to certain commodity prices and/or
the module wattage committed for delivery. As a result, the revenue recognized from such contracts may increase or decrease in
future periods relative to the original transaction price.
We continue to increase the nameplate production capacity of our existing manufacturing facilities by improving our production
throughput, increasing module wattage (or conversion efficiency), and reducing manufacturing yield losses. Additionally, we are in
the process of expanding our manufacturing capacity by approximately 11 GW, including the construction of our third
manufacturing facility in the United States, which commenced commercial production of modules in early 2023; our first
manufacturing facility in India, which is expected to commence operations in the second half of 2023; our fourth manufacturing
facility in the United States, which is expected to commence operations in late 2024; and the expansion of our manufacturing
footprint at our existing facilities in Ohio. This additional capacity, and any other potential investments to add to or otherwise
modify our existing manufacturing capacity in response to market demand and competition, may require significant internal and
possibly external sources of capital, and may be subject to certain risks and uncertainties described in Item 1A. “Risk Factors,”
including those described under the headings “Our future success depends on our ability to effectively balance manufacturing
production with market demand, effectively manage our cost per watt, and, when necessary, continue to build new manufacturing
plants over time in response to market demand, all of which are subject to risks and uncertainties” and “If any future production
lines are not built in line with committed schedules, it may adversely affect our future growth plans. If any future production lines
do not achieve operating metrics similar to our existing production lines, our solar modules could perform below expectations and
cause us to lose customers.”DC
DC
DC
47
Table of Contents
Results of Operations
The following table sets forth our consolidated statements of operations as a percentage of net sales for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
Net sales 100.0 % 100.0 % 100.0 %
Cost of sales 97.3 % 75.0 % 74.9 %
Gross profit 2.7 % 25.0 % 25.1 %
Selling, general and administrative 6.3 % 5.8 % 8.2 %
Research and development 4.3 % 3.4 % 3.5 %
Production start-up 2.8 % 0.7 % 1.5 %
Litigation loss — % — % 0.2 %
Gain on sales of businesses, net 9.7 % 5.0 % — %
Operating (loss) income (1.0) % 20.1 % 11.7 %
Foreign currency loss, net (0.6) % (0.3) % (0.2) %
Interest income 1.3 % 0.2 % 0.6 %
Interest expense, net (0.5) % (0.4) % (0.9) %
Other income (expense), net 1.2 % — % (0.4) %
Income tax (expense) benefit (2.0) % (3.5) % 4.0 %
Net (loss) income (1.7) % 16.0 % 14.7 %
Segment Overview
Our primary segment is our modules business, which involves the design, manufacture, and sale of CdTe solar modules, which
convert sunlight into electricity. Third-party customers of our modules segment include developers and operators of systems,
utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial companies, and other system owners. Our residual business
operations include certain project development activities, O&M services, the results of operations from PV solar power systems we
owned and operated in certain international regions, and the sale of such systems to third-party customers.
Net sales
We generally price and sell our solar modules on a per watt basis. During 2022, Intersect Power, Lightsource BP, and NextEra
Energy each accounted for more than 10% of our modules business net sales, and the majority of our solar modules were sold to
developers and operators of systems in the United States. Substantially all of our modules business net sales during 2022 were
denominated in U.S. dollars. We recognize revenue for module sales at a point in time following the transfer of control of the
modules to the customer, which typically occurs upon shipment or delivery depending on the terms of the underlying contracts. The
revenue recognition policies for module sales are further described in Note 2. “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” to our
consolidated financial statements. Net sales from our residual business operations primarily consists of revenue recognized for sales
of development projects or completed systems, including any modules installed in such systems and any revenue from energy
generated by such systems. In certain prior periods, our residual business operations also included O&M services we provided to
third parties.
48
Table of Contents
The following table shows net sales by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Modules $ 2,428,278 $ 2,331,380 $ 1,736,060 $ 96,898 4 %$ 595,320 34 %
Other 191,041 591,997 975,272 (400,956) (68)% (383,275) (39)%
Net sales $ 2,619,319 $ 2,923,377 $ 2,711,332 $ (304,058) (10)%$ 212,045 8 %
Net sales from our modules segment increased by $96.9 million in 2022 primarily due to a 20% increase in the volume of watts
sold, partially offset by a 13% decrease in the average selling price per watt. Net sales from our residual business operations
decreased by $401.0 million in 2022 primarily due to sales of certain projects in the United States and Japan in the prior period and
the settlement of an outstanding indemnification arrangement associated with the sale of one of our projects. Under the terms of the
indemnification arrangement, we received $65.1 million for our portion of the settlement payment, which we recorded as revenue
in the prior period. These decreases in net sales from our residual business operations were partially offset by the sale of our Luz
del Norte PV solar power plant in the current period. See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial
statements for discussion of our indemnification arrangements.
Cost of sales
Our modules business cost of sales includes the cost of raw materials and components for manufacturing solar modules, such as
glass, transparent conductive coatings, CdTe and other thin film semiconductors, laminate materials, connector assemblies, edge
seal materials, and frames. In addition, our cost of sales includes direct labor for the manufacturing of solar modules and
manufacturing overhead, such as engineering, equipment maintenance, quality and production control, and information technology.
Our cost of sales also includes depreciation of manufacturing plant and equipment, facility-related expenses, environmental health
and safety costs, and costs associated with shipping, warranties, and solar module collection and recycling (excluding accretion).
Cost of sales for our residual business operations primarily consists of project-related costs, such as development costs (legal,
consulting, transmission upgrade, interconnection, permitting, and other similar costs), engineering, procurement, and construction
(“EPC”) costs (consisting primarily of solar modules, inverters, electrical and mounting hardware, project management and
engineering, and construction labor), and site specific costs.
The following table shows cost of sales by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Modules $ 2,312,881 $ 1,858,454 $ 1,306,929 $ 454,427 24 %$ 551,525 42 %
Other 236,580 334,969 723,730 (98,389) (29)% (388,761) (54)%
Cost of sales $ 2,549,461 $ 2,193,423 $ 2,030,659 $ 356,038 16 %$ 162,764 8 %
% of net sales 97.3 % 75.0 % 74.9 %  
Cost of sales increased $356.0 million, or 16%, and increased 22.3 percentage points as a percent of net sales when comparing
2022 with 2021. The increase in cost of sales was driven by a $454.4 million increase in our modules segment cost of sales
primarily as a result of the following:
•higher costs of $350.9 million from an increase in the volume of modules sold;
•higher sales freight, demurrage, and detention charges of $167.2 million; and
•a reduction to our product warranty liability of $33.1 million in 2021 due to reductions to our projected module return
rates; partially offset by
•continued module cost reductions, which decreased cost of sales by $60.9 million;
•manufacturing charges of $15.7 million in the prior period associated with the COVID-19 pandemic;
49
Table of Contents
•an increase to our module collection and recycling liability of $10.8 million in 2021 due to lower estimated by-product
credits for certain semiconductor materials recovered during the recycling process and updates to certain valuation
assumptions;
•a reduction to our product warranty liability of $10.2 million in 2022 due to reductions to our projected module return
rates; and
•a reduction to our module collection and recycling liability of $7.5 million in 2022 due to lower estimated capital and
chemical costs resulting from improvements to our module recycling technology.
Such increase in our modules segment cost of sales was partially offset by a $98.4 million decrease in our residual business
operations cost of sales primarily due to the sales of certain projects in the United States and Japan in the prior period, partially
offset by the impairment loss in the current period for our Luz del Norte PV solar power plant. See Note 7. “Consolidated Balance
Sheet Details” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of the impairment of our Luz del Norte project.
Gross profit
Gross profit may be affected by numerous factors, including the selling prices of our modules and the selling prices of projects and
services included in our residual business operations, our manufacturing costs, the capacity utilization of our manufacturing
facilities, and foreign exchange rates. Gross profit may also be affected by the mix of net sales from our modules business and
residual business operations.
The following table shows gross profit for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Gross profit $ 69,858 $ 729,954 $ 680,673 $ (660,096) (90)%$ 49,281 7 %
% of net sales 2.7 % 25.0 % 25.1 %   
Gross profit decreased 22.3 percentage points to 2.7% in 2022 from 25.0% in 2021 primarily due to a decrease in the average
selling price per watt of our modules, the volume of higher gross profit projects sold during the prior period, an increase in sales
freight, demurrage, and detention charges, the impairment loss in the current period for our Luz del Norte PV solar power plant
described above, and the prior period indemnification matter descried above. These decreases to gross profit were partially offset
by the higher volume of modules sold and continued module cost reductions.
Selling, general and administrative
Selling, general and administrative expense consists primarily of salaries and other personnel-related costs, professional fees,
insurance costs, and other business development and selling expenses.
The following table shows selling, general and administrative expense for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Selling, general and
administrative $ 164,724 $ 170,320 $ 222,918 $ (5,596) (3)%$ (52,598) (24)%
% of net sales 6.3 % 5.8 % 8.2 %   
50
Table of Contents
Selling, general and administrative expense in 2022 decreased compared to 2021 primarily due to higher charges for impairments
of certain project assets in the prior period, a decrease in employee compensation expense primarily driven by reductions in
headcount from the sales of our North American O&M operations and U.S. project development business in the prior period, and
lower professional fees, partially offset by an increase in employee compensation expense driven by higher share-based
compensation and employee bonus expenses.
Research and development
Research and development expense consists primarily of salaries and other personnel-related costs; the cost of products, materials,
and outside services used in our R&D activities; and depreciation and amortization expense associated with R&D specific facilities
and equipment. We maintain a number of programs and activities to improve our technology and processes in order to enhance the
performance and reduce the costs of our solar modules.
The following table shows research and development expense for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Research and development $ 112,804 $ 99,115 $ 93,738 $ 13,689 14 %$ 5,377 6 %
% of net sales 4.3 % 3.4 % 3.5 %   
Research and development expense in 2022 increased compared to 2021 primarily due to higher employee compensation expense
resulting from an increase in headcount, lower share-based compensation expense in the prior period driven by the forfeiture of
unvested shares by our former Chief Technology Officer, who retired in March 2021, increased freight costs, and increased material
and module testing costs.
Production start-up
Production start-up expense consists of costs associated with operating a production line before it is qualified for commercial
production, including the cost of raw materials for solar modules run through the production line during the qualification phase,
employee compensation for individuals supporting production start-up activities, and applicable facility related costs. Production
start-up expense also includes costs related to the selection of a new site and implementation costs for manufacturing process
improvements to the extent we cannot capitalize these expenditures.
The following table shows production start-up expense for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Production start-up $ 73,077 $ 21,052 $ 40,528 $ 52,025 247 %$ (19,476) (48)%
% of net sales 2.8 % 0.7 % 1.5 %   
During 2022, we incurred production start-up expense primarily for our third manufacturing facility in the U.S. and for certain
manufacturing upgrades at our Malaysian facilities. During 2021, we incurred production start-up expense primarily for the
transition to Series 6 module manufacturing at our second facility in Kulim, Malaysia, which commenced commercial production
in early 2021, and for certain manufacturing upgrades at our Malaysian facilities.
51
Table of Contents
Gain on sales of businesses, net
The following table shows gain on sales of businesses, net for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Gain on sales of businesses, net $ 253,511 $ 147,284 $ — $ 106,227 72 %$ 147,284 100 %
% of net sales 9.7 % 5.0 % — %   
In 2022, we completed the sales of our Japan project development business and our Japan O&M operations to PAG and the sales of
certain other international O&M operations to a subsidiary of Clairvest Group, Inc. (“Clairvest”). During 2021, we completed the
sales of our North American O&M operations to a subsidiary of Clairvest and our U.S. project development business to Leeward
Renewable Energy Development, LLC (“Leeward”). See Note 3. “Sales of Businesses” to our consolidated financial statements for
further information related to these transactions.
Foreign currency loss, net
Foreign currency loss, net consists of the net effect of gains and losses resulting from holding assets and liabilities and conducting
transactions denominated in currencies other than our subsidiaries’ functional currencies.
The following table shows foreign currency loss, net for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Foreign currency loss, net $ (16,414)$ (7,975)$ (4,890)$ (8,439) 106 %$ (3,085) 63 %
Foreign currency loss increased in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to the differences between our economic hedge positions
and the underlying exposures and higher costs associated with hedging activities related to our subsidiaries in India.
Interest income
Interest income is earned on our cash, cash equivalents, marketable securities, restricted cash, and restricted marketable securities.
Interest income also includes interest earned from late customer payments.
The following table shows interest income for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Interest income $ 33,284 $ 6,179 $ 16,559 $ 27,105 439 %$ (10,380) (63)%
Interest income during 2022 increased compared to 2021 primarily due to higher interest rates on cash, marketable securities, and
restricted marketable securities.
Interest expense, net
Interest expense, net is primarily comprised of interest incurred on long-term debt, settlements of interest rate swap contracts, and
changes in the fair value of interest rate swap contracts that do not qualify for hedge accounting in accordance with Accounting
Standards Codification (“ASC”) 815. We may capitalize interest expense to our project assets or property, plant and equipment
when such costs qualify for interest capitalization, which reduces the amount of net interest expense reported in any given period.
52
Table of Contents
The following table shows interest expense, net for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Interest expense, net $ (12,225)$ (13,107)$ (24,036)$ 882 (7)%$ 10,929 (45)%
Interest expense, net in 2022 was consistent with 2021.
Other income (expense), net
Other income (expense), net is primarily comprised of miscellaneous items and realized gains and losses on the sale of marketable
securities and restricted marketable securities.
The following table shows other income (expense), net for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Other income (expense), net $ 31,189 $ 314 $ (11,932)$ 30,875 >100%$ 12,246 103 %
Other income, net increased in 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to the partial loan forgiveness of the Luz del Norte Credit
Facilities in connection with the sale of our Luz del Norte PV solar power plant. See Note 11. “Debt” to our consolidated financial
statements for further information related to this transaction.
Income tax (expense) benefit
Income tax expense or benefit, deferred tax assets and liabilities, and liabilities for unrecognized tax benefits reflect our best
estimate of current and future taxes to be paid. We are subject to income taxes in both the United States and numerous foreign
jurisdictions in which we operate, principally Singapore, Malaysia, and Vietnam. Significant judgments and estimates are required
to determine our consolidated income tax expense. The statutory federal corporate income tax rate in the United States is 21%, and
the tax rates in Singapore, Malaysia, and Vietnam are 17%, 24%, and 20%, respectively. In Malaysia, we have been granted a long-
term tax holiday, scheduled to expire in 2027, pursuant to which substantially all of our income earned in Malaysia is exempt from
income tax, conditional upon our continued compliance with certain employment and investment thresholds. In Vietnam, we have
been granted a long-term tax incentive, scheduled to expire at the end of 2036, pursuant to which income earned in Vietnam is
subject to reduced annual tax rates, conditional upon our continued compliance with certain revenue and R&D spending thresholds.
The following table shows income tax (expense) benefit for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 Years Ended Change
(Dollars in thousands) 2022 2021 2020 2022 over 2021 2021 over 2020
Income tax (expense) benefit $ (52,764) $ (103,469) $ 107,294 $ 50,705 49 %$ (210,763) (196)%
Effective tax rate 613.7 % 18.1 % (36.6)%   
Our tax rate is affected by recurring items, such as tax rates in foreign jurisdictions and the relative amounts of income we earn in
those jurisdictions. The rate is also affected by discrete items that may occur in any given period, but are not consistent from period
to period. Income tax expense decreased by $50.7 million during 2022 compared to 2021 primarily due to lower pretax income in
the current year, partially offset by higher tax expense of $37.3 million associated with the sale of our Luz del Norte PV solar
power plant during 2022.
53
Table of Contents
Liquidity and Capital Resources
As of December 31, 2022, we believe that our cash, cash equivalents, marketable securities, cash flows from operating activities,
and contracts with customers for the future sale of solar modules will be sufficient to meet our working capital and capital
expenditure needs for at least the next 12 months. As necessary, we also believe we will have adequate access to the capital
markets. We monitor our working capital to ensure we have adequate liquidity, both domestically and internationally. We intend to
maintain appropriate debt levels based upon cash flow expectations, our overall cost of capital, and expected cash requirements for
operations, including near-term construction activities and purchases of manufacturing equipment for our newest manufacturing
and R&D facilities in India and the United States. However, our ability to raise capital on terms commercially acceptable to us
could be constrained if there is insufficient lender or investor interest due to company-specific, industry-wide, or broader market
concerns. Any incremental debt financings could result in increased debt service expenses and/or restrictive covenants, which could
limit our ability to pursue our strategic plans.
As of December 31, 2022, we had $2.6 billion in cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities compared to $1.8 billion as of
December 31, 2021. The increase in cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities was primarily driven by cash receipts from
module sales, including advance payments for future sales, proceeds from the sales of our Japan project development business and
certain international O&M operations, and proceeds from borrowings, partially offset by purchases of property, plant and
equipment, expenditures for the construction of certain projects in Japan, and other operating expenditures. As of December 31,
2022 and 2021, $1.2 billion and $0.8 billion, respectively, of our cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities was held by our
foreign subsidiaries and was primarily based in U.S. dollar, Japanese yen, Indian rupee, and Euro denominated holdings.
We utilize a variety of tax planning and financing strategies in an effort to ensure that our worldwide cash is available in the
locations in which it is needed. If certain international funds were needed for our operations in the United States, we may be
required to accrue and pay certain U.S. and foreign taxes to repatriate such funds. We maintain the intent and ability to permanently
reinvest our accumulated earnings outside the United States, with the exception of our subsidiaries in Canada and Germany. In
addition, changes to foreign government banking regulations may restrict our ability to move funds among various jurisdictions
under certain circumstances, which could negatively impact our access to capital, resulting in an adverse effect on our liquidity and
capital resources.
Although we compete in markets that do not require solar-specific government subsidies or support programs, such incentives
continue to influence the demand for PV solar energy around the world. For example, the financial incentives provided by the IRA
are expected to increase both the demand for and the domestic manufacturing of solar modules in the United States. We continue to
evaluate the extent of benefits available to us by the IRA, which are expected to favorably impact our liquidity and capital
resources in future periods. For example, we currently expect to qualify for the advanced manufacturing production credit under
Section 45X of the IRC, which provides certain specified benefits for solar modules and solar module components manufactured in
the United States and sold to third parties. Such credit may be refundable or transferable to a third party and is available from 2023
to 2032, subject to phase down beginning in 2030. Based on the current form factor of our modules, we expect to qualify for a
credit of approximately 17 cents per watt for each module produced in the United States and sold to a third party. Accordingly, we
expect the advanced manufacturing production credit will provide us with a significant source of funding throughout its 10-year
period. For more information about certain risks associated with the benefits available to us under the IRA, see Item 1A. “Risk
Factors – “We expect certain financial benefits as a result of tax incentives provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022. If these
expected financial benefits vary significantly from our assumptions, our business, financial condition, and results of operations
could be adversely affected.”
54
Table of Contents
As a result of such market opportunities and increased demand for our products, we are in the process of expanding our capacity by
approximately 11 GW, including the construction of our third manufacturing facility in the United States, which commenced
commercial production of modules in early 2023; our first manufacturing facility in India, which is expected to commence
operations in the second half of 2023; our fourth manufacturing facility in the United States, which is expected to commence
operations in late 2024; and the expansion of our manufacturing footprint at our existing facilities in Ohio. Our newest factory in
the United States began producing and our newest factory in India is expected to produce our next generation Series 7 modules,
which combine our thin film CdTe technology with a larger form factor and an innovative steel back rail mounting structure that
reduces module installation time. In aggregate, we currently expect to invest approximately $2.7 billion for these facilities and
upgrades. As we expand our manufacturing capacity, we expect to continue to receive advance payments from customers for the
future sale of modules. Such advance payments are reflected as deferred revenue in our consolidated balance sheets. As of
December 31, 2022, our deferred revenue was approximately $1.2 billion. Accordingly, the capital expenditures necessary to
expand our capacity in the near term are expected to be financed, in part, by advance payments for module sales in future periods
and by the advanced manufacturing production credit described above.
In addition to the expansion plans described above, we continue to increase the nameplate production capacity of our existing
manufacturing facilities by improving our production throughput, increasing module wattage (or conversion efficiency), and
reducing manufacturing yield losses. We have a demonstrated history of innovation, continuous improvement, and manufacturing
success driven by our significant investments in various R&D initiatives. We continue to invest significant financial resources in
such initiatives, including approximately $0.3 billion for a dedicated R&D facility in the United States to support the
implementation of our technology roadmap. We expect such R&D facility to feature a high-tech pilot manufacturing line, allowing
for the production of full-sized prototypes of thin film and tandem PV modules. Such R&D facility is expected to be completed in
2024. During 2023, we expect to spend $1.9 billion to $2.1 billion for capital expenditures, including the new facilities mentioned
above and upgrades to machinery and equipment that we believe will further increase our module wattage and expand capacity and
throughput at our manufacturing facilities.
We have also committed and expect to continue committing significant working capital to purchase various raw materials used in
our module manufacturing process. Our failure to obtain raw materials and components that meet our quality, quantity, and cost
requirements in a timely manner could interrupt or impair our ability to manufacture our solar modules, or increase our
manufacturing costs. Accordingly, we may enter into long-term supply agreements to mitigate potential risks related to the
procurement of key raw materials and components, and such agreements may be noncancelable or cancelable with a significant
penalty. For example, we have entered into long-term supply agreements for the purchase of certain specified minimum volumes of
substrate glass and cover glass for our PV solar modules. Our remaining purchases under these supply agreements are expected to
be approximately $3.7 billion of substrate glass and approximately $301 million of cover glass. We have the right to terminate these
agreements upon payment of specified termination penalties (which, in aggregate, are up to $251 million as of December 31, 2022
and decline over the remaining supply periods). Additionally, for certain strategic suppliers, we have made, and may in the future
be required to make, certain advance payments to secure the raw materials necessary for our module manufacturing.
We have also committed certain financial resources to fulfill our solar module collection and recycling obligations and have
established a trust under which these funds are put into custodial accounts with an established and reputable bank. As of
December 31, 2022, such funds were comprised of restricted marketable securities of $182.1 million and restricted cash and cash
equivalents balances of $6.7 million. As of December 31, 2022, our module collection and recycling liability was $128.1 million.
Trust funds may be disbursed for qualified module collection and recycling costs (including capital and facility related recycling
costs), payments to customers for assuming collection and recycling obligations, and reimbursements of any overfunded amounts.
Investments in the trust must meet certain investment quality criteria comparable to highly rated government or agency bonds. As
necessary, we adjust the funded amounts for our estimated collection and recycling obligations based on theDC
55
Table of Contents
estimated costs of collecting and recycling covered modules, estimated rates of return on our restricted marketable securities, and
an estimated solar module life of 25 years, less amounts already funded in prior years.
As of December 31, 2022, we had no off-balance sheet debt or similar obligations, other than financial assurance related
instruments, which are not classified as debt. We do not guarantee any third-party debt. See Note 12. “Commitments and
Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for further information about our financial assurance related instruments.
Cash Flows
The following table summarizes key cash flow activity for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 873,369 $ 237,559 $ 37,120 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,192,574) (99,040) (131,227)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities 309,392 40,550 (82,587)
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted
cash equivalents 47,438 3,174 3,778 
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash
equivalents $ 37,625 $ 182,243 $ (172,916)
Operating Activities
The increase in net cash provided by operating activities during 2022 was primarily driven by higher cash receipts from module
sales, including advance payments for future sales, partially offset by higher expenditures for the construction of certain projects in
Japan and certain advance payments for raw materials in the current year.
Investing Activities
The increase in net cash used in investing activities during 2022 was primarily due to higher net purchases of marketable securities,
higher purchases of property, plant and equipment, and proceeds from the sales of our North American O&M operations and U.S.
project development business in the prior year, partially offset by proceeds from the sales of our Japan project development
business and certain international O&M operations in the current year.
Financing Activities
The increase in net cash provided by financing activities during 2022 was primarily due to higher net borrowings under project
specific debt financings for the construction of certain projects in Japan. Such project specific debt financings were assumed by
PAG when we completed the sale of our Japan project development business in June 2022. The increase is also due to borrowings
under the India Credit Facility in the current year for the development and construction of our first manufacturing facility in India.
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
None.
56
Table of Contents
Critical Accounting Estimates
In preparing our consolidated financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles in the United States
(“U.S. GAAP”), we make estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts of reported assets, liabilities, revenues, and expenses,
as well as the disclosure of contingent liabilities. Some of our accounting policies require the application of significant judgment in
the selection of the appropriate assumptions for making these estimates. By their nature, these judgments are subject to an inherent
degree of uncertainty. We base our judgments and estimates on our historical experience, our forecasts, and other available
information as appropriate. The actual results experienced by us may differ materially and adversely from our estimates. To the
extent there are material differences between our estimates and the actual results, our future results of operations will be affected.
Our significant accounting policies are described in Note 2. “Summary of Significant Accounting Policies” to our consolidated
financial statements. The accounting policies that require the most significant judgment and estimates include the following:
Accrued Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability. We previously established a module collection and recycling program,
which has since been discontinued, to collect and recycle modules sold and covered under such program once the modules reach
the end of their service lives. For legacy customer sales contracts that were covered under this program, we recognized expense at
the time of sale for the estimated cost of our obligations to collect and recycle such modules. We estimate the cost of our collection
and recycling obligations based on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting and recycling the solar modules,
which includes estimates for the cost of packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar module installation sites to a
recycling center; material, labor, and capital costs; and by-product credits for certain materials recovered during the recycling
process. We base these estimates on our experience collecting and recycling solar modules and certain assumptions regarding the
estimated useful lives of modules covered by the program and the number of modules expected to be recycled. In the periods
between the time of sale and the related settlement of the collection and recycling obligation, we accrete the carrying amount of the
associated liability and classify the corresponding expense within “Selling, general and administrative” expense on our
consolidated statements of operations.
We periodically review our estimates of expected future recycling costs and may adjust our liability accordingly. Such adjustments
are presented within “Cost of Sales” on our consolidated statements of operations. During the year ended December 31, 2022, we
completed our annual cost study of obligations under our module collection and recycling program and reduced the associated
liability by $7.5 million primarily due to lower estimated capital and chemical costs resulting from improvements to our module
recycling technology. As of December 31, 2022, a 10% increase in the expected future recycling costs would increase the liability
by $13.7 million.
Product Warranties. We provide a limited PV solar module warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship under normal
use and service conditions for up to 12.5 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with agreed-upon
specifications will produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage
reducing by a degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years.
Among other things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking.
As an alternative form of our standard limited module power output warranty, we have also offered an aggregated or system-level
limited module performance warranty. This system-level limited module performance warranty is designed for utility-scale systems
and provides 25-year system-level energy degradation protection. This warranty represents a practical expedient to address the
challenge of identifying, from the potential millions of modules installed in a utility-scale system, individual modules that may be
performing below warranty thresholds by focusing on the aggregate energy generated by the system rather than the power output of
individual modules. The system-level limited module performance warranty is typically calculated as a percentage of a system’s
expected energy production, adjusted for certain actual site conditions, with the warranted level of performance declining each year
in a linear fashion, but never falling below 80% during the term of the warranty.
57
Table of Contents
When we recognize revenue for sales of modules or projects, we accrue liabilities for the estimated future costs of meeting our
limited warranty obligations. We make and revise these estimates based primarily on the number of solar modules under warranty
installed at customer locations, our historical experience with and projections of warranty claims, and our estimated per-module
replacement costs. We also monitor our expected future module performance through certain quality and reliability testing and
actual performance in certain field installation sites. During the year ended December 31, 2022, we revised this estimate based on
updated information regarding our warranty claims, which reduced our product warranty liability by $10.2 million. This updated
information reflected lower-than-expected warranty claims for our older series of module technology as well as the evolving claims
profile of our newest series of module technology, resulting in reductions to our projected module return rates. In general, we
expect the return rates for our Series 6 modules to be lower than our older series, and we estimate that the return rate for such newer
series of module technology will be less than 1%. As of December 31, 2022, a 1% increase in the return rate across all series of
module technology would increase our product warranty liability by $147.0 million.
Income Taxes. We are subject to the income tax laws of the United States, its states and municipalities, and those of the foreign
jurisdictions in which we have significant business operations. Such tax laws are complex and subject to different interpretations by
the taxpayer and the relevant taxing authorities. We make judgments and interpretations regarding the application of these
inherently complex tax laws when determining our provision for income taxes and also make estimates about when in the future
certain items are expected to affect taxable income in the various tax jurisdictions. Disputes over interpretations of tax laws may be
settled with the relevant taxing authority upon examination or audit. We regularly evaluate the likelihood of assessments in each of
our taxing jurisdictions resulting from current and future examinations, and we record tax liabilities as appropriate.
In preparing our consolidated financial statements, we calculate our income tax provision based on our interpretation of the tax
laws and regulations in the various jurisdictions where we conduct business. This requires us to estimate our current tax
obligations, evaluate our ability and intent to permanently reinvest our accumulated earnings in jurisdictions outside the United
States, assess uncertain tax positions, and assess temporary differences between the financial statement carrying amounts and the
tax basis of assets and liabilities. These temporary differences result in deferred tax assets and liabilities. We must also assess the
likelihood that each of our deferred tax assets will be realized. To the extent we believe that realization of any of our deferred tax
assets is not more likely than not, we establish a valuation allowance. When we establish a valuation allowance or increase this
allowance in a reporting period, we generally record a corresponding tax expense. Conversely, to the extent circumstances indicate
that a valuation allowance is no longer necessary, that portion of the valuation allowance is reversed, which generally reduces our
overall income tax expense.
We establish liabilities for potential additional taxes based on our assessment of the outcome of our tax positions. Once established,
we adjust these liabilities when additional information becomes available or when an event occurs requiring an adjustment.
Significant judgment is required in making these estimates and the actual cost of a tax assessment, fine, or penalty may ultimately
be materially different from our recorded liabilities, if any.
We continually explore initiatives to better align our tax and legal entity structure with the footprint of our global operations and
recognize the tax impact of these initiatives, including changes in the assessment of uncertain tax positions, indefinite reinvestment
exception assertions, and the realizability of deferred tax assets, in the period when we believe all necessary internal and external
approvals associated with such initiatives have been obtained, or when the initiatives are materially complete.
Asset Impairments. We assess long-lived assets classified as “held and used,” including our property, plant and equipment;
operating lease assets; intangible assets; project assets; and PV solar power systems, for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances arise, including consideration of technological obsolescence, that may indicate that the carrying amount of such
assets may not be recoverable, and these assessments require significant judgment in determining whether such events or changes
have occurred. These events or changes in circumstances may include a significant decrease in the market price of a long-lived
asset; a significant adverse change in the
58
Table of Contents
extent or manner in which a long-lived asset is being used or in its physical condition; a significant adverse change in the business
climate that could affect the value of a long-lived asset; an accumulation of costs significantly in excess of the amount originally
expected for the acquisition or construction of a long-lived asset; a current-period operating or cash flow loss combined with a
history of such losses or a projection of future losses associated with the use of a long-lived asset; or a current expectation that,
more likely than not, a long-lived asset will be sold or otherwise disposed of significantly before the end of its previously estimated
useful life. For purposes of recognition and measurement of an impairment loss, long-lived assets are grouped with other assets and
liabilities at the lowest level for which identifiable cash flows are largely independent of the cash flows of other assets and
liabilities, and we must also exercise judgment in assessing such groupings and levels.
When impairment indicators are present, we compare undiscounted future cash flows, including the eventual disposition of the
asset group at market value, to the asset group’s carrying value to determine if the asset group is recoverable. If the carrying value
of the asset group exceeds the undiscounted future cash flows, we measure any impairment by comparing the fair value of the asset
group to its carrying value. Fair value is generally determined by considering (i) internally developed discounted cash flows for the
asset group, (ii) third-party valuations, and/or (iii) information available regarding the current market value for such assets. If the
fair value of an asset group is determined to be less than its carrying value, an impairment in the amount of the difference is
recorded in the period that the impairment indicator occurs. Estimating future cash flows requires significant judgment, and such
projections may vary from the cash flows eventually realized.
Item 7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk
Foreign Currency Exchange Risk
Cash Flow Exposure. We expect certain of our subsidiaries to have future cash flows that will be denominated in currencies other
than the subsidiaries’ functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and
the other currencies in which they transact will cause fluctuations in the cash flows we expect to receive or pay when these cash
flows are realized or settled. Accordingly, we enter into foreign exchange forward contracts to hedge a portion of these forecasted
cash flows. These foreign exchange forward contracts qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in accordance with ASC 815 and
we designated them as such. We initially report unrealized gains or losses for such contracts in “Accumulated other comprehensive
loss” and subsequently reclassify amounts into earnings when the hedged transaction occurs and impacts earnings. For additional
details on our derivative hedging instruments and activities, see Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated
financial statements.
Certain of our international operations, such as our manufacturing facilities in Malaysia and Vietnam, pay a portion of their
operating expenses, including associate wages and utilities, in local currencies, which exposes us to foreign currency exchange risk
for such expenses. Our manufacturing facilities are also exposed to foreign currency exchange risk for purchases of certain
equipment and raw materials from international vendors. To the extent we expand into new markets, particularly emerging markets,
our total foreign currency exchange risk, in terms of both size and exchange rate volatility, and the number of foreign currencies we
are exposed to could increase significantly.
For the year ended December 31, 2022, 5% of our net sales were denominated in foreign currencies, including Japanese yen and
Euro. As a result, we may, from time to time, have exposure to foreign currencies with respect to our net sales, which has
historically represented one of our primary foreign currency exchange risks. A 10% change in the U.S. dollar to Japanese yen and
Euro exchange rates would have had an aggregate impact on our net sales of $9.1 million, excluding the effect of our hedging
activities.
Transaction Exposure. Many of our subsidiaries have assets and liabilities (primarily cash, receivables, deferred taxes, payables,
accrued expenses, long-term debt, and solar module collection and recycling liabilities) that are denominated in currencies other
than the subsidiaries’ functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between
59
Table of Contents
the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and the other currencies in which these assets and liabilities are denominated will
create fluctuations in our reported consolidated statements of operations and cash flows. We may enter into foreign exchange
forward contracts or other financial instruments to economically hedge assets and liabilities against the effects of currency
exchange rate fluctuations. The gains and losses on such foreign exchange forward contracts will economically offset all or part of
the transaction gains and losses that we recognize in earnings on the related foreign currency denominated assets and liabilities. For
additional details on our economic hedging instruments and activities, see Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our
consolidated financial statements.
As of December 31, 2022, a 10% change in the U.S. dollar relative to our primary foreign currency exposures would not have had a
significant impact to our net foreign currency income or loss, including the effect of our hedging activities.
Interest Rate Risk
Customer Financing Exposure. We are also indirectly exposed to interest rate risk because many of our customers depend on debt
financings to purchase modules. An increase in interest rates could make it challenging for our customers to obtain the capital
necessary to make such purchases on favorable terms, or at all. Such factors could reduce demand or lower the price we can charge
for our modules, thereby reducing our net sales and gross profit.
Marketable Securities and Restricted Marketable Securities Exposure. We invest in various debt securities, which exposes us to
interest rate risk. The primary objectives of our investment activities are to preserve principal and provide liquidity, while at the
same time maximizing the return on our investments. Many of the securities in which we invest may be subject to market risk.
Accordingly, a change in prevailing interest rates may cause the market value of such investments to fluctuate. For example, if we
hold a security that was issued with an interest rate fixed at the then-prevailing rate and the prevailing interest rate subsequently
rises, the market value of our investment may decline.
For the year ended December 31, 2022, our marketable securities earned a return of 2%, including the impact of fluctuations in the
price of the underlying securities, and had a weighted-average maturity of 6 months as of the end of the period. Based on our
investment positions as of December 31, 2022, a hypothetical 100 basis point change in interest rates would have resulted in a $0.5
million change in the market value of our marketable securities investment portfolio. For the year ended December 31, 2022, our
restricted marketable securities incurred a loss of 22%, including the impact of fluctuations in the price of the underlying securities,
and had a weighted-average maturity of approximately 12 years as of the end of the period. Based on our restricted marketable
securities positions as of December 31, 2022, a hypothetical 100 basis point change in interest rates would have resulted in a $17.6
million change in the market value of our restricted marketable securities portfolio.
Commodity and Component Risk
Some of our raw materials and components are sourced from a limited number of suppliers or a single supplier. Although we may
enter into long-term supply contracts for certain raw materials and components, we may be exposed to price changes for certain
raw materials and components used to manufacture our solar modules for which we are unable to secure long-term supply contracts
or if our demand exceeds our committed supply. From time to time, we may utilize derivative hedging instruments to mitigate such
raw material price changes. In addition, the failure of a key supplier could disrupt our supply chain, which could result in higher
prices and/or a disruption in our manufacturing process. As a result, we may be in default of our delivery obligations if we
experience a manufacturing disruption. In addition to price changes in the raw materials and components used in our manufacturing
process, we are also exposed to price changes associated with the shipping, handling, storage, and distribution of our modules. To
mitigate such price changes, we have used and expect to continue using module contract structures that provide additional
consideration to us if the cost of certain raw materials or logistics services
60
Table of Contents
exceeds a defined threshold. However, we may be unable to pass along the full amount of cost increases we experience for such
raw materials, components, and logistics services to our customers.
Credit Risk
We have certain financial and derivative instruments that subject us to credit risk. These consist primarily of cash, cash equivalents,
marketable securities, accounts receivable, restricted cash, restricted cash equivalents, restricted marketable securities, foreign
exchange forward contracts, and commodity swap contracts. We are exposed to credit losses in the event of nonperformance by the
counterparties to our financial and derivative instruments. We place these instruments with various high-quality financial
institutions and limit the amount of credit risk from any one counterparty. We monitor the credit standing of our counterparty
financial institutions. Our net sales are primarily concentrated among a limited number of customers. We monitor the financial
condition of our customers and perform credit evaluations whenever considered necessary. We typically require some form of
payment security from our customers, including, but not limited to, advance payments, parent guarantees, letters of credit, bank
guarantees, or surety bonds.
Item 8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Consolidated Financial Statements
Our consolidated financial statements as required by this item are included in Item 15. “Exhibits and Financial Statement
Schedules.” See Item 15(a) for a list of our consolidated financial statements.
Item 9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A. Controls and Procedures
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of management, including our Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of our “disclosure controls and procedures” as defined in Exchange Act
Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e). Based on that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that as
of December 31, 2022 our disclosure controls and procedures were effective to ensure that information required to be disclosed by
us in reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized, and reported within the time
periods specified in SEC rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our management,
including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow timely decisions regarding required
disclosure.
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate “internal control over financial reporting,” as defined in
Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f). We also carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of
management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of our internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2022 based on the criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013)
issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”). Our internal control over financial
reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of
financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. GAAP. Based on such evaluation, our management concluded
that our internal control over financial reporting was effective as of December 31, 2022. The
61
Table of Contents
effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2022 has also been audited by
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, an independent registered public accounting firm, as stated in its report which appears herein.
Changes in Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We also carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of management, including our Chief Executive
Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of our “internal control over financial reporting” to determine whether any changes in our
internal control over financial reporting occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2022 that materially affected, or are
reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting. Based on that evaluation, there were no such
changes in our internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the quarter ended December 31, 2022.
Limitations on the Effectiveness of Controls
Control systems, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide only reasonable, not absolute, assurance that the control
systems’ objectives are being met. Further, the design of any system of controls must reflect the fact that there are resource
constraints, and the benefits of all controls must be considered relative to their costs. Because of the inherent limitations in all
control systems, no evaluation of controls can provide absolute assurance that all control issues and instances of fraud, if any,
within our company have been detected. These inherent limitations include the realities that judgments in decision-making can be
faulty and that breakdowns can occur because of error or mistake. Control systems can also be circumvented by the individual acts
of some persons, by collusion of two or more people, or by management override of the controls. The design of any system of
controls is also based in part upon certain assumptions about the likelihood of future events, and there can be no assurance that any
design will succeed in achieving its stated goals under all potential future conditions. Over time, controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions or deterioration in the degree of compliance with policies or procedures.
Item 9B. Other Information
None.
Item 9C. Disclosure Regarding Foreign Jurisdictions that Prevent Inspections
Not applicable.
62
Table of Contents
PART III
Item 10. Directors, Executive Officers, and Corporate Governance
For information with respect to our executive officers, see Item 1. “Business – Information about Our Executive Officers.”
Information concerning our board of directors and audit committee of our board of directors will appear in our 2023 Proxy
Statement, under the sections “Directors” and “Corporate Governance,” and information concerning Section 16(a) beneficial
ownership reporting compliance will appear in our 2023 Proxy Statement under the section “Section 16(a) Beneficial Ownership
Reporting Compliance.” We have adopted a code of business conduct and ethics that applies to all directors, officers, and associates
of First Solar. Information concerning this code will appear in our 2023 Proxy Statement under the section “Corporate
Governance.” The information in such sections of the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on
Form 10-K.
Item 11. Executive Compensation
Information concerning executive compensation and related information will appear in our 2023 Proxy Statement under the section
“Executive Compensation,” and information concerning the compensation committee of our board of directors (the “compensation
committee”) will appear under the sections “Corporate Governance” and “Compensation Committee Report.” The information in
such sections of the 2023 Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
Information concerning the security ownership of certain beneficial owners and management and related stockholder matters,
including certain information regarding our equity compensation plans, will appear in our 2023 Proxy Statement under the section
“Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters.” The information in such
section of the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Equity Compensation Plans
The following table sets forth certain information as of December 31, 2022 concerning securities authorized for issuance under our
equity compensation plans:
Plan CategoryNumber of Securities to
be Issued Upon
Exercise of Outstanding
Options and Rights
(a)(1)Weighted-Average
Exercise Price of
Outstanding Options
and Rights
(b)(2)Number of Securities
Remaining Available for
Future Issuance Under
Equity Compensation
Plans (Excluding
Securities Reflected in
Column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by stockholders 1,310,887 $ — 6,500,832
Equity compensation plans not approved by stockholders — — — 
Total 1,310,887 $ — 6,500,832
——————————
(1) Includes 1,310,887 shares issuable upon vesting of restricted stock units (“RSUs”) granted under our 2020 Omnibus Incentive
Compensation Plan (“2020 Omnibus Plan”). These RSUs include the maximum amount of performance units available for issuance
under our long-term incentive program for key executive of ficers and associates.
(2) The weighted-average exercise price does not take into account the shares issuable upon vesting of outstanding RSUs, which have no
exercise price.
63
Table of Contents
See Note 15. “Share-Based Compensation” to our consolidated financial statements for further discussion on our equity
compensation plans.
Item 13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence
Information concerning certain relationships and related party transactions will appear in our 2023 Proxy Statement under the
section “Certain Relationships and Related Party Transactions,” and information concerning director independence will appear in
our 2023 Proxy Statement under the section “Corporate Governance.” The information in such sections of the Proxy Statement is
incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Item 14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services
Information concerning principal accounting fees and services and the audit committee of our board of directors’ pre-approval
policies and procedures for these items will appear in our 2023 Proxy Statement under the section “Principal Accountant Fees and
Services.” The information in such section of the Proxy Statement is incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-
K.
64
Table of Contents
PART IV
Item 15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
(a)Documents. The following documents are filed as part of this Annual Report on Form 10-K:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID No. 238)
Consolidated Balance Sheets
Consolidated Statements of Operations
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
Consolidated Statements of Stockholders’ Equity
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(b)Exhibits. Unless otherwise noted, the exhibits listed on the accompanying Index to Exhibits are filed with or incorporated by
reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
(c)Financial Statement Schedules. All financial statement schedules have been omitted as the required information is not
applicable or is not material to require presentation of the schedule, or because the information required is included in the
consolidated financial statements and notes thereto of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
65
Table of Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of First Solar, Inc.
Opinions on the Financial Statements and Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of First Solar, Inc. and its subsidiaries (“the Company”) as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the related consolidated statements of operations, comprehensive income, stockholders’ equity
and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2022, including the related notes (collectively referred
to as the “consolidated financial statements”). We also have audited the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of
Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (“COSO”).
In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position
of the Company as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in
the period ended December 31, 2022 in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
Also in our opinion, the Company maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2022, based on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the COSO.
Basis for Opinions
The Company’s management is responsible for these consolidated financial statements, for maintaining effective internal control
over financial reporting, and for its assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting, included in
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting appearing under Item 9A. Our responsibility is to express
opinions on the Company’s consolidated financial statements and on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based
on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(“PCAOB”) and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”) and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the
audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud, and whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audits of the consolidated financial statements included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of
the consolidated financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such
procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the consolidated financial
statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as
well as evaluating the overall presentation of the consolidated financial statements. Our audit of internal control over financial
reporting included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material
weakness exists, and testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk.
Our audits also included performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinions.
66
Table of Contents
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain
to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of
the company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are
being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (iii) provide reasonable
assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that
could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because
of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the consolidated financial
statements that was communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that (i) relates to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the consolidated financial statements and (ii) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or
complex judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated
financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate
opinion on the critical audit matter or on the accounts or disclosures to which it relates.
Product Warranty Liability
As described in Notes 2 and 12 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company provides a limited PV solar module warranty
which covers defects in materials and workmanship for up to 12.5 years and warrants that modules will produce at least a specified
minimum percentage of their labeled power output rating, on either an individual module or system-level basis, for up to 30 years.
The Company’s product warranty liability was $33.8 million as of December 31, 2022. Product warranty estimates are based
primarily on the number of solar modules under warranty installed at customer locations, historical experience with and projections
of warranty claims, and estimated per-module replacement costs.
The principal considerations for our determination that performing procedures relating to the product warranty liability is a critical
audit matter are (i) the significant judgment by management in estimating the projections of warranty claims and (ii) a high degree
of auditor judgment, subjectivity, and effort in performing procedures to evaluate the projections of warranty claims and related
audit evidence.
67
Table of Contents
Addressing the matter involved performing procedures and evaluating audit evidence in connection with forming our overall
opinion on the consolidated financial statements. These procedures included testing the effectiveness of controls relating to
valuation of the product warranty liability. These procedures also included, among others, testing the appropriateness of the
methodology used and the reasonableness of the significant assumptions used by management in developing these estimates related
to projections of warranty claims. Evaluating whether the significant assumptions relating to the product warranty liability were
reasonable involved (i) testing historical warranty claims and settlements, (ii) evaluating the reasonableness and appropriateness of
factors considered by management in estimating the final settlement of open customer claims, and (iii) evaluating the
reasonableness and appropriateness of the methodology used by management to determine return rates used in the valuation of the
product warranty liability.
/s/ PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP
Phoenix, Arizona
February 28, 2023
We have served as the Company’s or its predecessor’s auditor since 2000, which includes periods before the Company became
subject to SEC reporting requirements.
68
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED BALANCE SHEETS
(In thousands, except share data)
December 31,
2022 2021
ASSETS
Current assets:   
Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,481,269  $ 1,450,654  
Marketable securities 1,096,712  375,389  
Accounts receivable trade, net 324,337  429,436  
Accounts receivable unbilled, net 30,654  25,273  
Inventories 621,376  666,299  
Other current assets 237,073  244,192  
Total current assets 3,791,421  3,191,243  
Property , plant and equipment, net 3,536,902  2,649,587  
PV solar power systems, net 6,242  217,293  
Project assets 30,108  315,488  
Deferred tax assets, net 78,680  59,162  
Restricted marketable securities 182,070  244,726  
Goodwill 14,462  14,462  
Intangible assets, net 31,106  45,509  
Inventories 260,395  237,512  
Other assets 319,842  438,764  
Total assets $ 8,251,228  $ 7,413,746  
LIABILITIES AND ST OCKHOLDERS’  EQUITY
Current liabilities:   
Accounts payable $ 341,409  $ 193,374  
Income taxes payable 29,397  4,543  
Accrued expenses 382,782  288,450  
Current portion of long-term debt — 3,896  
Deferred revenue 263,215  201,868  
Other current liabilities 21,245  34,747  
Total current liabilities 1,038,048  726,878  
Accrued solar module collection and recycling liability 128,1 14 139,145  
Long-term debt 184,349  236,005  
Deferred revenue 944,725  95,943  
Other liabilities 119,937  256,224  
Total liabilities 2,415,173  1,454,195  
Commitments and contingencies
Stockholders’  equity:
Common stock, $0.001 par value per share; 500,000,000 shares authorized; 106,609,094 and
106,332,315 shares issued and outstanding at December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively 107 106 
Additional paid-in capital 2,887,476  2,871,352  
Accumulated earnings 3,140,289  3,184,455  
Accumulated other comprehensive loss (191,817 ) (96,362 )
Total stockholders’  equity 5,836,055  5,959,551  
Total liabilities and stockholders’  equity $ 8,251,228  $ 7,413,746  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
69
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
(In thousands, except per share amounts)
 Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
Net sales $ 2,619,319  $ 2,923,377  $ 2,711,332  
Cost of sales 2,549,461  2,193,423  2,030,659  
Gross profit 69,858  729,954  680,673  
Operating expenses:
Selling, general and administrative 164,724  170,320  222,918  
Research and development 112,804  99,115 93,738  
Production start-up 73,077  21,052  40,528  
Litigation loss — — 6,000  
Total operating expenses 350,605  290,487  363,184  
Gain on sales of businesses, net 253,51 1 147,284  — 
Operating (loss) income (27,236 ) 586,751  317,489  
Foreign currency loss, net (16,414 ) (7,975 ) (4,890 )
Interest income 33,284  6,179  16,559  
Interest expense, net (12,225 ) (13,107 ) (24,036 )
Other income (expense), net 31,189  314 (11,932 )
Income before taxes and equity in earnings 8,598  572,162  293,190  
Income tax (expense) benefit (52,764 ) (103,469 ) 107,294  
Equity in earnings, net of tax — — (2,129 )
Net (loss) income $ (44,166 )$ 468,693  $ 398,355  
Net (loss) income per share:
Basic $ (0.41)$ 4.41 $ 3.76 
Diluted $ (0.41)$ 4.38 $ 3.73 
Weighted-average number of shares used in per share calculations:
Basic 106,551  106,263  105,867  
Diluted 106,551  106,924  106,686  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
70
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
(In thousands)
Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
Net (loss) income $ (44,166 )$ 468,693  $ 398,355  
Other comprehensive (loss) income:
Foreign currency translation adjustments (32,021 ) (13,213 ) (2,810 )
Unrealized (loss) gain on marketable securities and restricted marketable securities,
net of tax of $2,639, $1,497, and $(1,231) (56,744 ) (24,666 ) 21,659  
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative instruments, net of tax of $1,678, $(55), and
$(31) (6,690 ) 3,243  (1,241 )
Other comprehensive (loss) income (95,455 ) (34,636 ) 17,608  
Comprehensive (loss) income $ (139,621 )$ 434,057  $ 415,963  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
71
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
(In thousands)
 Common StockAdditional
Paid-In
CapitalAccumulated
EarningsAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
(Loss) IncomeTotal
Stockholders’
Equity  Shares Amount
Balance at December 31, 2019 105,449  $ 105 $ 2,849,376  $ 2,326,620  $ (79,334 )$ 5,096,767  
Cumulative-ef fect adjustment for the
adoption of ASU 2016-13 — — — (9,213 ) — (9,213 )
Net income — — — 398,355  — 398,355  
Other comprehensive income — — — — 17,608  17,608  
Common stock issued for share-
based compensation 814 1 1,362  — — 1,363  
Tax withholding related to vesting of
restricted stock (283) — (13,118) — — (13,118)
Share-based compensation expense — — 29,166  — — 29,166  
Balance at December 31, 2020 105,980  106 2,866,786  2,715,762  (61,726 ) 5,520,928  
Net income — — — 468,693  — 468,693  
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (34,636 ) (34,636 )
Common stock issued for share-
based compensation 561 — — — — — 
Tax withholding related to vesting of
restricted stock (209) — (15,989 ) — — (15,989 )
Share-based compensation expense — — 20,555  — — 20,555  
Balance at December 31, 2021 106,332  106 2,871,352  3,184,455  (96,362 ) 5,959,551  
Net loss — — — (44,166 ) — (44,166 )
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (95,455 ) (95,455 )
Common stock issued for share-
based compensation 444 1 — — — 1 
Tax withholding related to vesting of
restricted stock (167) — (12,092 ) — — (12,092 )
Share-based compensation expense — — 28,216  — — 28,216  
Balance at December 31, 2022 106,609  $ 107 $ 2,887,476  $ 3,140,289  $ (191,817 )$ 5,836,055  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
72
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
CONSOLIDATED STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS
(In thousands)
 Years Ended December 31,
2022 2021 2020
Cash flows fr om operating activities:    
Net (loss) income $ (44,166 )$ 468,693  $ 398,355  
Adjustments to reconcile net (loss) income to cash provided by operating
activities:
Depreciation, amortization and accretion 269,724  259,900  232,925  
Impairments and net losses on disposal of long-lived assets 63,338  22,876  35,806  
Share-based compensation 28,656  20,902  29,267  
Deferred income taxes (12,799 ) 49,847  36,013  
Gain on sales of businesses, net (253,51 1) (147,284 ) — 
Gains on sales of marketable securities and restricted marketable securities — (11,696 ) (15,346 )
Liabilities assumed by customers for the sale of systems (145,281 ) (85,490 ) (136,745 )
Gain on debt for giveness (30,201 ) — — 
Other , net (1,029 ) (3,484 ) 19,297  
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Accounts receivable, trade and unbilled 118,724  (96,951 ) 345,150  
Inventories 16,693  (136,365 ) (145,396 )
Project assets and PV  solar power systems (14,336 ) 23,402  106,867  
Other assets (72,602 ) (69,942 ) (33,065 )
Income tax receivable and payable 43,592  (13,062 ) (177,431 )
Accounts payable and accrued expenses 5,569  48,968  (109,583 )
Deferred revenue 912,946  47,062  (157,284 )
Other liabilities (11,948 ) (139,817 ) (391,710 )
Net cash provided by operating activities 873,369  237,559  37,120  
Cash flows fr om investing activities:
Purchases of property , plant and equipment (903,605 ) (540,291 ) (416,635 )
Purchases of marketable securities and restricted marketable securities (3,375,008 ) (2,147,136 ) (901,924 )
Proceeds from sales and maturities of marketable securities and restricted
marketable securities 2,646,787  2,294,595  1,192,832  
Proceeds from sales of businesses, net of cash and restricted cash sold 442,302  300,499  — 
Other investing activities (3,050 ) (6,707 ) (5,500 )
Net cash used in investing activities (1,192,574 ) (99,040 ) (131,227 )
Cash flows fr om financing activities:
Repayment of long-term debt (75,896 ) (72,676 ) (225,344 )
Proceeds from borrowings under long-term debt, net of discounts and issuance
costs 397,380  129,215  156,679  
Payments of tax withholdings for restricted shares (12,092 ) (15,989 ) (13,118)
Other financing activities — — (804)
Net cash provided by (used in) financing activities 309,392  40,550  (82,587 )
Effect of exchange rate changes on cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and
restricted cash equivalents 47,438  3,174  3,778  
Net increase (decrease) in cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted
cash equivalents 37,625  182,243  (172,916 )
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents, beginning
of the period 1,455,837  1,273,594  1,446,510  
Cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents, end of the
period $ 1,493,462  $ 1,455,837  $ 1,273,594  
Supplemental disclosur e of noncash investing and financing activities:    
Property , plant and equipment acquisitions funded by liabilities $ 315,961  $ 61,598  $ 110,576  
See accompanying notes to these consolidated financial statements.
73
Table of Contents
FIRST SOLAR, INC. AND SUBSIDIARIES
NOTES TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
1. First Solar and Its Business
We are a leading American solar technology company and global provider of PV solar energy solutions. Developed at our R&D
labs in California and Ohio, we manufacture and sell PV solar modules with an advanced thin film semiconductor technology that
provide a high-performance, lower-carbon alternative to conventional crystalline silicon PV solar modules. From raw material
sourcing through end-of-life module recycling, we are committed to reducing the environmental impacts and enhancing the social
and economic benefits of our products across their life cycle. We are the world’s largest thin film PV solar module manufacturer
and the largest PV solar module manufacturer in the Western Hemisphere.
2. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation. These consolidated financial statements include the accounts of First Solar, Inc. and its subsidiaries and are
prepared in accordance with U.S. GAAP. We eliminated all intercompany transactions and balances during consolidation. Certain
prior year balances were reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates. The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with U.S. GAAP requires us to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and the accompanying notes.
On an ongoing basis, we evaluate our estimates, including those related to accrued solar module collection and recycling liabilities,
product warranties, accounting for income taxes, and long-lived asset impairments. Despite our intention to establish accurate
estimates and reasonable assumptions, actual results could differ materially from such estimates and assumptions.
Fair Value Measurements. We measure certain assets and liabilities at fair value, which is defined as the price that would be
received from the sale of an asset or paid to transfer a liability (i.e., an exit price) on the measurement date in an orderly transaction
between market participants in the principal or most advantageous market for the asset or liability. Our fair value measurements use
the following hierarchy, which prioritizes valuation inputs based on the extent to which the inputs are observable in the market.
•Level 1 – Valuation techniques in which all significant inputs are unadjusted quoted prices from active markets for assets
or liabilities that are identical to the assets or liabilities being measured.
•Level 2 – Valuation techniques in which significant inputs include quoted prices from active markets for assets or
liabilities that are similar to the assets or liabilities being measured and/or quoted prices for assets or liabilities that are
identical or similar to the assets or liabilities being measured from markets that are not active. Also, model-derived
valuations in which all significant inputs are observable in active markets are Level 2 valuation techniques.
•Level 3 – Valuation techniques in which one or more significant inputs are unobservable. Such inputs reflect our estimate
of assumptions that market participants would use to price an asset or liability.
Cash and Cash Equivalents. We consider highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or less at the time of
purchase to be cash equivalents with the exception of time deposits, which are presented as marketable securities.
74
Table of Contents
Restricted Cash and Restricted Cash Equivalents. Restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents consist of deposits held by
various banks to secure certain of our letters of credit, as well as deposits held in custodial accounts to fund the estimated future
costs of our solar module collection and recycling obligations. Restricted cash for our letters of credit is classified as current or
noncurrent based on the maturity date of the corresponding letter of credit. Restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents held in
custodial accounts are classified as noncurrent to align with the nature of the corresponding module collection and recycling
liabilities.
Marketable Securities and Restricted Marketable Securities. We determine the classification of our marketable securities and
restricted marketable securities at the time of purchase and reevaluate such designation at each balance sheet date. As of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, all of our marketable securities and restricted marketable securities were classified as available-for-
sale debt securities. Accordingly, we record them at fair value and account for the net unrealized gains and losses as part of
“Accumulated other comprehensive loss” until realized. We record realized gains and losses on the sale of our marketable securities
and restricted marketable securities in “Other income (expense), net” computed using the specific identification method.
We may sell marketable securities prior to their stated maturities after consideration of our liquidity requirements. We view
unrestricted securities with maturities beyond 12 months as available to support our current operations and, accordingly, classify
such securities as current assets under “Marketable securities” in our consolidated balance sheets. Restricted marketable securities
consist of long-term duration marketable securities that we hold in custodial accounts to fund the estimated future costs of our solar
module collection and recycling obligations. Accordingly, we classify restricted marketable securities as noncurrent assets under
“Restricted marketable securities” in our consolidated balance sheets.
Accounts Receivable Trade. We record trade accounts receivable for our unconditional rights to consideration arising from our
performance under contracts with customers. The carrying value of such receivables, net of the allowance for credit losses,
represents their estimated net realizable value. Our module sales generally include up to 45-day payment terms following the
transfer of control of the products to the customer. In addition, certain module sales agreements require a down payment for a
portion of the transaction price upon or shortly after entering into the agreement or related purchase order. As a practical expedient,
we do not adjust the promised amount of consideration for the effects of a significant financing component when we expect, at
contract inception, that the period between our transfer of a promised product to a customer and when the customer pays for that
product will be one year or less.
Accounts Receivable Unbilled. Accounts receivable unbilled represents a contract asset for revenue that has been recognized in
advance of billing the customer, which was common for our project-related sales contracts. Revenue may be recognized in advance
of billing the customer, resulting in an amount recorded to “Accounts receivable unbilled, net” or “Other assets” depending on the
expected timing of payment for such unbilled receivables. Once we have an unconditional right to consideration, we typically bill
our customer and reclassify the “Accounts receivable unbilled, net” to “Accounts receivable trade, net.” Billing requirements vary
by contract but are generally structured around the completion of certain development, construction, or other specified milestones.
Allowance for Credit Losses. The allowance for credit losses is a valuation account that is deducted from a financial asset’s
amortized cost to present the net amount we expect to collect from such asset. We estimate allowances for credit losses using
relevant available information from both internal and external sources. We monitor the estimated credit losses associated with our
trade accounts receivable and unbilled accounts receivable based primarily on our collection history, which we review annually,
and the delinquency status of amounts owed to us, which we determine based on the aging of such receivables. We estimate credit
losses associated with our marketable securities and restricted marketable securities based on the external credit ratings for such
investments and the historical loss rates associated with such credit ratings, which we obtain from third parties. Such methods and
estimates are adjusted, as appropriate, for relevant past events, current conditions, and reasonable and supportable forecasts. We
recognize writeoffs within the allowance for credit losses when cash receipts associated with our financial assets are deemed
uncollectible.
75
Table of Contents
Inventories – Current and Noncurrent. We report our inventories at the lower of cost or net realizable value. We determine cost on a
first-in, first-out basis and include both the costs of acquisition and manufacturing in our inventory costs. These costs include direct
materials, direct labor, and indirect manufacturing costs, including depreciation and amortization. Our capitalization of indirect
costs is based on the normal utilization of our plants. If our plant utilization is abnormally low, the portion of our indirect
manufacturing costs related to the abnormal utilization level is expensed as incurred. Other abnormal manufacturing costs, such as
wasted materials or excess yield losses, are also expensed as incurred.
As needed, we may purchase critical raw materials that are used in our core production process in quantities that exceed anticipated
consumption within our normal operating cycle, which is 12 months. We classify such raw materials that we do not expect to
consume within our normal operating cycle as noncurrent.
We regularly review the cost of inventories, including noncurrent inventories, against their estimated net realizable value and record
write-downs if any inventories have costs in excess of their net realizable values. We also regularly evaluate the quantities and
values of our inventories, including noncurrent inventories, in light of current market conditions and trends, among other factors,
and record write-downs for any quantities in excess of demand or for any obsolescence. This evaluation considers the use of
modules in our product warranties, module selling prices, product obsolescence, strategic raw material requirements, and other
factors.
Property, Plant and Equipment. We report our property, plant and equipment at cost, less accumulated depreciation. Cost includes
the price paid to acquire or construct the assets, required installation costs, interest capitalized during the construction period, and
any expenditures that substantially add to the value of or substantially extend the useful life of the assets. We capitalize costs
related to computer software obtained or developed for internal use, which generally includes enterprise-level business and finance
software that we customize to meet our specific operational requirements. We expense repair and maintenance costs at the time we
incur them.
We begin depreciation for our property, plant and equipment when the assets are placed in service. We consider such assets to be
placed in service when they are both in the location and condition for their intended use. We compute depreciation expense using
the straight-line method over the estimated useful lives of assets, as presented in the table below. We depreciate leasehold
improvements over the shorter of their estimated useful lives or the remaining term of the lease. The estimated useful life of an
asset is reassessed whenever applicable facts and circumstances indicate a change in the estimated useful life of such asset has
occurred.
 
 Useful Lives
in Years
Buildings and building improvements 25 – 40
Manufacturing machinery and equipment 5 – 15
Furniture, fixtures, computer hardware, and computer software 3 – 7
Leasehold improvements up to 15
PV Solar Power Systems. PV solar power systems represent project assets that we may temporarily own and operate after being
placed in service. We report our PV solar power systems at cost, less accumulated depreciation. We begin depreciation for PV solar
power systems when they are placed in service. We compute depreciation expense for the systems using the straight-line method
over the shorter of the term of the related PPA or 25 years.
76
Table of Contents
Project Assets. Project assets primarily consist of costs related to solar power projects in various stages of development that are
capitalized prior to the completion of the sale of the projects. These project related costs include costs for land, development, and
construction of a PV solar power system. Development costs may include legal, consulting, permitting, transmission upgrade,
interconnection, and other similar costs. We typically classify project assets as noncurrent due to the nature of solar power projects
(as long-lived assets) and the time required to complete all activities to develop, construct, and sell projects, which is typically
longer than 12 months. We present all expenditures related to the development and construction of project assets as a component of
cash flows from operating activities.
Asset Impairments. We assess long-lived assets classified as “held and used,” including our property, plant and equipment; PV solar
power systems; project assets; operating lease assets; and intangible assets, for impairment whenever events or changes in
circumstances arise, including consideration of technological obsolescence, that may indicate that the carrying amount of such
assets may not be recoverable. These events and changes in circumstances may include a significant decrease in the market price of
a long-lived asset; a significant adverse change in the extent or manner in which a long-lived asset is being used or in its physical
condition; a significant adverse change in the business climate that could affect the value of a long-lived asset; an accumulation of
costs significantly in excess of the amount originally expected for the acquisition or construction of a long-lived asset; a current-
period operating or cash flow loss combined with a history of such losses or a projection of future losses associated with the use of
a long-lived asset; or a current expectation that, more likely than not, a long-lived asset will be sold or otherwise disposed of
significantly before the end of its previously estimated useful life. For purposes of recognition and measurement of an impairment
loss, long-lived assets are grouped with other assets and liabilities at the lowest level for which identifiable cash flows are largely
independent of the cash flows of other assets and liabilities.
When impairment indicators are present, we compare undiscounted future cash flows, including the eventual disposition of the
asset group at market value, to the asset group’s carrying value to determine if the asset group is recoverable. If the carrying value
of the asset group exceeds the undiscounted future cash flows, we measure any impairment by comparing the fair value of the asset
group to its carrying value. Fair value is generally determined by considering (i) internally developed discounted cash flows for the
asset group, (ii) third-party valuations, and/or (iii) information available regarding the current market value for such assets. If the
fair value of an asset group is determined to be less than its carrying value, an impairment in the amount of the difference is
recorded in the period that the impairment indicator occurs. Estimating future cash flows requires significant judgment, and such
projections may vary from the cash flows eventually realized.
We consider a long-lived asset to be abandoned after we have ceased use of the asset and we have no intent to use or repurpose it in
the future. Abandoned long-lived assets are recorded at their salvage value, if any.
We classify long-lived assets or asset groups we plan to sell, excluding project assets and PV solar power systems to be sold as part
of our ongoing operations, as held for sale on our consolidated balance sheets only after certain criteria have been met, including:
(i) management has the authority and commits to a plan to sell the asset, (ii) the asset is available for immediate sale in its present
condition, (iii) an active program to locate a buyer and the plan to sell the asset have been initiated, (iv) the sale of the asset is
probable within 12 months, (v) the asset is being actively marketed at a reasonable sales price relative to its current fair value, and
(vi) it is unlikely that the plan to sell will be withdrawn or that significant changes to the plan will be made. We record assets or
asset groups held for sale at the lower of their carrying value or fair value less costs to sell. If, due to unanticipated circumstances,
such assets or asset groups are not sold in the 12 months after being classified as held for sale, then held for sale classification
would continue as long as the above criteria are still met.
Goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the purchase price of acquired businesses over the estimated fair value assigned to the
individual assets acquired and liabilities assumed. We do not amortize goodwill, but instead test goodwill for impairment at least
annually. We perform impairment tests between the scheduled annual test in the fourth quarter if facts and circumstances indicate
that it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit that has goodwill is less than its carrying value.
77
Table of Contents
We may first make a qualitative assessment of whether it is more likely than not that a reporting unit’s fair value is less than its
carrying value to determine whether it is necessary to perform a quantitative goodwill impairment test. Such qualitative impairment
test considers various factors, including macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, cost factors, the overall
financial performance of a reporting unit, and any other relevant events affecting our company or a reporting unit. If we determine
through the qualitative assessment that a reporting unit’s fair value is more likely than not greater than its carrying value, the
quantitative impairment test is not required. If the qualitative assessment indicates it is more likely than not that a reporting unit’s
fair value is less than its carrying value, we perform a quantitative impairment test. We may also elect to proceed directly to the
quantitative impairment test without considering qualitative factors.
The quantitative impairment test is the comparison of the fair value of a reporting unit with its carrying amount, including goodwill.
Our modules business represents our only reporting unit. We define the fair value of a reporting unit as the price that would be
received to sell the unit as a whole in an orderly transaction between market participants at the measurement date. We primarily use
an income approach to estimate the fair value of our reporting unit. Significant judgment is required when estimating the fair value
of a reporting unit, including the forecasting of future operating results and the selection of discount and expected future growth
rates used to determine projected cash flows. If the estimated fair value of a reporting unit exceeds its carrying value, goodwill is
not impaired, and no further analysis is required. Conversely, if the carrying value of a reporting unit exceeds its estimated fair
value, we record an impairment loss equal to the excess, not to exceed the total amount of goodwill allocated to the reporting unit.
Intangible Assets. Intangible assets primarily include developed technologies and our internally-generated intangible assets,
substantially all of which are patents on technologies related to our products and production processes. We record an asset for
patents after the patent has been issued based on the legal, filing, and other costs incurred to secure it. We amortize intangible assets
on a straight-line basis over their estimated useful lives, which generally range from 5 to 20 years.
Leases. Upon commencement of a lease, we recognize a lease liability for the present value of the lease payments not yet paid,
discounted using an interest rate that represents our ability to borrow on a collateralized basis over a period that approximates the
lease term. We also recognize a lease asset, which represents our right to control the use of the underlying property, plant or
equipment, at an amount equal to the lease liability, adjusted for prepayments and initial direct costs.
We subsequently recognize the cost of operating leases on a straight-line basis over the lease term, and any variable lease costs,
which represent amounts owed to the lessor that are not fixed per the terms of the contract, are recognized in the period in which
they are incurred. Any costs included in our lease arrangements that are not directly related to the leased assets, such as
maintenance charges, are included as part of the lease costs. Leases with an initial term of one year or less are considered short-
term leases and are not recognized as lease assets and liabilities. We also recognize the cost of such short-term leases on a straight-
line basis over the term of the underlying agreement.
Many of our leases contain renewal or termination options that are exercisable at our discretion. At the commencement date of a
lease, we include in the lease term any periods covered by a renewal option, and exclude from the lease term any periods covered
by a termination option, to the extent we are reasonably certain to exercise such options. In making this determination, we seek to
align the lease term with the expected economic life of the underlying asset.
78
Table of Contents
Deferred Revenue. When we receive consideration, or such consideration is unconditionally due, from a customer prior to
transferring goods to the customer under the terms of a sales contract, we record deferred revenue, which represents a contract
liability. Such deferred revenue results from advance payments received on sales of solar modules. Deferred revenue is classified as
current or noncurrent based on the expected date that module shipments commence for each sales contract. As a practical
expedient, we do not adjust the consideration in a contract for the effects of a significant financing component when we expect, at
contract inception, that the period between a customer’s advance payment and our transfer of a promised product or service to the
customer will be one year or less. Additionally, we do not adjust the consideration in a contract for the effects of a significant
financing component when the consideration is received as a form of performance security.
Product Warranties. We provide a limited PV solar module warranty covering defects in materials and workmanship under normal
use and service conditions for up to 12.5 years. We also typically warrant that modules installed in accordance with agreed-upon
specifications will produce at least 98% of their labeled power output rating during the first year, with the warranty coverage
reducing by a degradation factor every year thereafter throughout the limited power output warranty period of up to 30 years.
Among other things, our solar module warranty also covers the resulting power output loss from cell cracking. In resolving claims
under both the limited defect and power output warranties, we typically have the option of either repairing or replacing the covered
modules or, under the limited power output warranty, providing additional modules to remedy the power shortfall. Our limited
module warranties also include an option for us to remedy claims under such warranties, generally exercisable only after the second
year of the warranty period, by making certain cash payments. Under the limited workmanship warranty, the optional cash payment
will be equal to the prevailing market price of the module, reduced by a degradation factor, and under the limited power output
warranty, the cash payment will be equal to the shortfall in power output. Such limited module warranties are standard for module
sales and may be transferred from the original purchasers of the solar modules to subsequent purchasers upon resale.
As an alternative form of our standard limited module power output warranty, we have also offered an aggregated or system-level
limited module performance warranty. This system-level limited module performance warranty is designed for utility-scale systems
and provides 25-year system-level energy degradation protection. This warranty represents a practical expedient to address the
challenge of identifying, from the potential millions of modules installed in a utility-scale system, individual modules that may be
performing below warranty thresholds by focusing on the aggregate energy generated by the system rather than the power output of
individual modules. The system-level limited module performance warranty is typically calculated as a percentage of a system’s
expected energy production, adjusted for certain actual site conditions, with the warranted level of performance declining each year
in a linear fashion, but never falling below 80% during the term of the warranty. In resolving claims under the system-level limited
module performance warranty to restore the system to warranted performance levels, we first must validate that the root cause of
the issue is due to module performance; we then have the option of either repairing or replacing the covered modules, providing
supplemental modules, or making a cash payment. Consistent with our limited module power output warranty, when we elect to
satisfy a warranty claim by providing replacement or supplemental modules under the system-level module performance warranty,
we do not have any obligation to pay for the labor to remove or install modules.
In addition to our limited solar module warranties described above, for PV solar power systems we have constructed, we have
provided limited warranties for defects in engineering design, installation, and BoS part workmanship for a period of one to two
years following the substantial completion of a system. In resolving claims under such BoS warranties, we have the option of
remedying the defect through repair or replacement.
When we recognize revenue for sales of modules or projects, we accrue liabilities for the estimated future costs of meeting our
limited warranty obligations. We make and revise these estimates based primarily on the number of solar modules under warranty
installed at customer locations, our historical experience with and projections of warranty claims, and our estimated per-module
replacement costs. We also monitor our expected future module performance through certain quality and reliability testing and
actual performance in certain field installation sites.
79
Table of Contents
Accrued Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability. Historically, we recognized expense at the time of sale for the estimated
cost of our future obligations for collecting and recycling solar modules covered by our solar module collection and recycling
program. See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for further information.
Derivative Instruments. We recognize derivative instruments on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value. On the date that we
enter into a derivative contract, we designate the derivative instrument as a fair value hedge, a cash flow hedge, a hedge of a net
investment in a foreign operation, or a derivative instrument that will not be accounted for using hedge accounting methods. As of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, all of our derivative instruments were designated either as cash flow hedges or as derivative
instruments not accounted for using hedge accounting methods.
We record changes in the fair value of a derivative instrument that is highly effective and that is designated and qualifies as a cash
flow hedge in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” until our earnings are affected by the variability of the cash flows from the
underlying hedged item. We record any amounts excluded from effectiveness testing in current period earnings in the same income
statement line item in which the earnings effect of the hedged item is reported. We report changes in the fair value of derivative
instruments that are not designated or do not qualify for hedge accounting in current period earnings. We classify cash flows from
derivative instruments on the consolidated statements of cash flows in the same category as the item being hedged or on a basis
consistent with the nature of the instrument.
At the inception of a hedge, we formally document all relationships between hedging instruments and the underlying hedged items
as well as our risk-management objective and strategy for undertaking the hedge transaction. We also formally assess (both at
inception and on an ongoing basis) whether our derivative instruments are highly effective in offsetting changes in the fair value or
cash flows of the underlying hedged items and whether those derivatives are expected to remain highly effective in future periods.
When we determine that a derivative instrument is not highly effective as a hedge, we discontinue hedge accounting prospectively.
In all situations in which we discontinue hedge accounting and the derivative instrument remains outstanding, we carry the
derivative instrument at its fair value on our consolidated balance sheets and recognize subsequent changes in its fair value in
current period earnings.
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income or Loss. Our accumulated other comprehensive income or loss includes foreign
currency translation adjustments, unrealized gains and losses on available-for-sale debt securities, and unrealized gains and losses
on derivative instruments designated and qualifying as cash flow hedges. We record these components of accumulated other
comprehensive income or loss net of tax and release such tax effects when the underlying components affect earnings.
Revenue Recognition – Module Sales. We recognize revenue for module sales at a point in time following the transfer of control of
the modules to the customer, which typically occurs upon shipment or delivery depending on the terms of the underlying contracts.
Such contracts may contain provisions that require us to make liquidated damage payments to the customer if we fail to ship or
deliver modules by scheduled dates. We recognize these liquidated damages as a reduction of revenue in the period we transfer
control of the modules to the customer.
Revenue Recognition – Solar Power Project Sales. We recognize revenue for the sale of a development project or for the sale of a
completed system when we enter into the associated sales contract with the customer. Such revenue recognition is dependent, in
part, on our customers’ commitment to perform their obligations under the contract, which is typically measured through the receipt
of cash deposits or other forms of financial security issued by creditworthy financial institutions or parent entities.
80
Table of Contents
As part of certain prior project sales, we conduct performance testing of a system to confirm it meets the operational and capacity
expectations noted in its EPC agreement. In addition, we may provide an energy performance test during the first or second year of
a system’s operation to demonstrate that the actual energy generation for the applicable period meets or exceeds the modeled
energy expectation, after certain adjustments. In certain instances, a bonus payment may be received at the end of the applicable
test period if the system performs above a specified level. Conversely, if there is an underperformance event with regard to these
tests, we may incur liquidated damages as specified in the applicable EPC agreement. Such performance guarantees represent a
form of variable consideration and are estimated at contract inception at their most likely amount and updated at the end of each
reporting period as additional performance data becomes available and only to the extent that it is probable that a significant
reversal of any incremental revenue will not occur.
Revenue Recognition – Operations and Maintenance. We recognize revenue for standard, recurring O&M services over time as
customers receive and consume the benefits of such services, which typically include 24/7 system monitoring, certain PPA and
other agreement compliance, large generator interconnection agreement compliance, performance engineering analysis, regular
performance reporting, turn-key maintenance services including spare parts and corrective maintenance repair, warranty
management, and environmental services. Costs of O&M services are expensed in the period in which they are incurred.
Revenue Recognition – Energy Generation. We sell energy generated by PV solar power systems under PPAs or on an open
contract basis. For energy sold under PPAs, we recognize revenue each period based on the volume of energy delivered to the
customer (i.e., the PPA off-taker) and the price stated in the PPA. For energy sold on an open contract basis, we recognize revenue
at the point in time the energy is delivered to the grid based on the prevailing spot market prices.
Shipping and Handling Costs. We account for shipping and handling activities related to contracts with customers as costs to fulfill
our promise to transfer the associated products. Accordingly, we record amounts billed for shipping and handling costs as a
component of net sales, and classify such costs as a component of cost of sales.
Taxes Collected from Customers and Remitted to Governmental Authorities. We exclude from our measurement of transaction
prices all taxes assessed by governmental authorities that are both (i) imposed on and concurrent with a specific revenue-producing
transaction and (ii) collected from customers. Accordingly, such tax amounts are not included as a component of net sales or cost of
sales.
Research and Development. We incur research and development costs during the process of researching and developing new
products and enhancing our existing products, technologies, and manufacturing processes. Our research and development costs
consist primarily of employee compensation, materials, outside services, and depreciation. We expense these costs as incurred until
the resulting product has been completed, tested, and made ready for commercial manufacturing.
Production Start-Up. Production start-up expense consists of costs associated with operating a production line before it is qualified
for commercial production, including the cost of raw materials for solar modules run through the production line during the
qualification phase, employee compensation for individuals supporting production start-up activities, and applicable facility related
costs. Production start-up expense also includes costs related to the selection of a new site and implementation costs for
manufacturing process improvements to the extent we cannot capitalize these expenditures.
81
Table of Contents
Share-Based Compensation. We recognize share-based compensation expense for the estimated grant-date fair value of equity
awards issued as compensation to employees over the requisite service period, which is generally four or five years. For awards
with performance conditions, we recognize share-based compensation expense if it is probable that the performance conditions will
be achieved. We account for forfeitures of share-based awards as such forfeitures occur. Accordingly, when an associate’s
employment is terminated, all previously unvested awards granted to such associate are forfeited, which results in a benefit to
share-based compensation expense in the period of such associate’s termination equal to the cumulative expense recorded through
the termination date for the unvested awards. We recognize share-based compensation expense for awards with graded vesting
schedules on a straight-line basis over the requisite service periods for each separately vesting portion of the award as if each award
was in substance multiple awards.
Foreign Currency Translation. The functional currencies of certain of our foreign subsidiaries are their local currencies.
Accordingly, we apply period-end exchange rates to translate their assets and liabilities and daily transaction exchange rates to
translate their revenues, expenses, gains, and losses into U.S. dollars. We include the associated translation adjustments as a
separate component of “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” within stockholders’ equity. The functional currency of our
subsidiaries in Canada, Chile, Malaysia, Singapore, and Vietnam is the U.S. dollar; therefore, we do not translate their financial
statements. Gains and losses arising from the remeasurement of monetary assets and liabilities denominated in currencies other than
a subsidiary’s functional currency are included in “Foreign currency loss, net” in the period in which they occur.
Income Taxes. We use the asset and liability method to account for income taxes whereby we calculate deferred tax assets or
liabilities using the enacted tax rates and tax law applicable to when any temporary differences are expected to reverse. We
establish valuation allowances, when necessary, to reduce deferred tax assets to the extent it is more likely than not that such
deferred tax assets will not be realized. We do not provide deferred taxes related to the U.S. GAAP basis in excess of the outside tax
basis in the investment in our foreign subsidiaries to the extent such amounts relate to indefinitely reinvested earnings and profits of
such foreign subsidiaries.
Income tax expense includes (i) deferred tax expense, which generally represents the net change in deferred tax assets or liabilities
during the year plus any change in valuation allowances, and (ii) current tax expense, which represents the amount of tax currently
payable to or receivable from taxing authorities. We only recognize tax benefits related to uncertain tax positions that are more
likely than not of being sustained upon examination. For those positions that satisfy such recognition criteria, the amount of tax
benefit that we recognize is the largest amount of tax benefit that is more likely than not of being sustained on ultimate settlement
of the uncertain tax position.
Per Share Data. Basic net income or loss per share is computed by dividing net income or loss by the weighted-average number of
common shares outstanding for the period. Diluted net income per share is computed giving effect to all potentially dilutive
common shares, including restricted stock and performance units, unless there is a net loss for the period. In computing diluted net
income per share, we utilize the treasury stock method.
Government Grants. We account for government assistance that is not subject to the scope of ASC 740 using a grant accounting
model, by analogy to International Accounting Standards 20, Accounting for Government Grants and Disclosure of Government
Assistance, and recognize such grants when we have reasonable assurance that we will comply with the grant’s conditions and that
the grant will be received. Government grants whose primary condition is the purchase, construction, or acquisition of a long-lived
asset are considered asset-based grants and are recognized as a reduction to such asset’s cost basis, which reduces future
depreciation. Other government grants not related to long-lived assets are considered income-based grants, which are initially
recognized as “Government grants receivable” and are also recognized as a reduction to the related cost of activities that generated
the benefit. Proceeds received from asset-based grants are presented as cash inflows from investing activities on the consolidated
statements of cash flows, whereas proceeds received from income-based grants are presented as cash inflows from operating
activities.
82
Table of Contents
3. Sales of Businesses
Sale of Japan Project Development Business
In May 2022, we entered into various agreements with certain subsidiaries of PAG, a private investment firm, for the sale of our
Japan project development business. The transaction included our approximately 293 MW utility-scale solar project development
platform, which comprised the business of developing, contracting for the construction of, and selling utility-scale PV solar power
systems. Additionally, PAG agreed to certain module purchase commitments.
In June 2022, we completed the sale of our Japan project development business and, following certain customary post-closing
adjustments, received total consideration of ¥66.4 billion ($490.8 million) and transferred cash and restricted cash of ¥8.4 billion
($61.9 million) to PAG. As a result of this transaction, we recognized a gain of $245.2 million, net of transaction costs, during the
year ended December 31, 2022, which was included in “Gain on sales of businesses, net” in our consolidated statements of
operations.
Sales of North American and International O&M Operations
In August 2020, we entered into an agreement with a subsidiary of Clairvest for the sale of our North American O&M operations.
In March 2021, we completed the transaction and, following certain customary post-closing adjustments, received total
consideration of $149.1 million. As a result of this transaction, we recognized a gain of $115.8 million, net of transaction costs and
post-closing adjustments, during the year ended December 31, 2021, which was included in “Gain on sales of businesses, net” in
our consolidated statements of operations.
In January 2022, we completed the sale of our Chilean O&M operations to a separate subsidiary of Clairvest and, following certain
customary post-closing adjustments, received total consideration of $1.9 million. As a result of this transaction, we recognized a
gain of $1.6 million, net of transaction costs and post-closing adjustments, during the year ended December 31, 2022, which was
included in “Gain on sales of businesses, net” in our consolidated statements of operations.
In September 2022, we completed the sale of our Australian O&M operations to a separate subsidiary of Clairvest and, following
certain customary post-closing adjustments, received total consideration of $6.0 million. As a result of this transaction, we
recognized a gain of $4.4 million, net of transaction costs and post-closing adjustments, during the year ended December 31, 2022,
which was included in “Gain on sales of businesses, net” in our consolidated statements of operations.
In September 2022, we also completed the sale of our Japanese O&M operations to a subsidiary of PAG and, following certain
customary post-closing adjustments, received total consideration of ¥692.7 million ($4.8 million). As a result of this transaction, we
recognized a gain of $1.4 million, net of transaction costs and post-closing adjustments, during the year ended December 31, 2022,
which was included in “Gain on sales of businesses, net” in our consolidated statements of operations.
Sale of U.S. Project Development Business
In January 2021, we entered into an agreement with Leeward, a subsidiary of the Ontario Municipal Employees Retirement
System, for the sale of our U.S. project development business. In March 2021, we completed the transaction and received
consideration of $151.4 million for the sale of such business. As a result of this transaction, we recognized a gain of $31.5 million,
net of transaction costs and post-closing adjustments, during the year ended December 31, 2021, which was included in “Gain on
sales of businesses, net” in our consolidated statements of operations.DC
83
Table of Contents
4. Goodwill and Intangible Assets
Goodwill
Goodwill for the modules business consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
December 31,
2021Acquisitions
(Impairments)December 31,
2022
Gross amount $ 407,827  $ — $ 407,827  
Accumulated impairment losses (393,365 ) — (393,365 )
Total $ 14,462  $ — $ 14,462  
December 31,
2020Acquisitions
(Impairments)December 31,
2021
Gross amount $ 407,827  $ — $ 407,827  
Accumulated impairment losses (393,365 ) — (393,365 )
Total $ 14,462  $ — $ 14,462  
We performed our annual impairment analysis in the fourth quarters of 2022, 2021, and 2020. ASC 350-20 allows companies to
perform a qualitative assessment of whether it is more likely than not that a reporting unit’s fair value is less than its carrying value
to determine whether it is necessary to perform a quantitative goodwill impairment test. Such qualitative assessment considers
various factors, including macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, cost factors, the overall financial
performance of a reporting unit, and any other relevant events affecting our company or a reporting unit.
We performed a qualitative assessment for our modules business in each respective period and concluded that it was not more
likely than not that the fair value of the modules business was less than its carrying amount. Accordingly, a quantitative goodwill
impairment test for the modules business was not required in any period presented.
Intangible assets, net
The following tables summarize our intangible assets at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
December 31, 2022
 Gross AmountAccumulated
Amortization Net Amount
Developed technology $ 97,347  $ (68,650 )$ 28,697  
Patents 8,970  (6,561 ) 2,409  
Total $ 106,317  $ (75,21 1)$ 31,106  
December 31, 2021
 Gross AmountAccumulated
Amortization Net Amount
Developed technology $ 99,964  $ (61,985 )$ 37,979  
Power purchase agreements 6,486  (1,621 ) 4,865  
Patents 8,480  (5,815 ) 2,665  
Total $ 114,930  $ (69,421 )$ 45,509  
Amortization of intangible assets was $10.9 million, $10.9 million, and $10.8 million for the years ended December 31, 2022,
2021, and 2020, respectively.
84
Table of Contents
Estimated future amortization expense for our definite-lived intangible assets was as follows at December 31, 2022 (in thousands):
Amortization
Expense
2023 $ 10,510  
2024 10,380  
2025 3,910  
2026 2,526  
2027 2,426  
Thereafter 1,354  
Total amortization expense $ 31,106  
5. Cash, Cash Equivalents, and Marketable Securities
Cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
2022 2021
Cash and cash equivalents:
Cash $ 1,476,945  $ 1,450,654  
Money market funds 4,324  — 
Total cash and cash equivalents 1,481,269  1,450,654  
Marketable securities:
Foreign debt 59,777  103,317  
U.S. debt 56,463  18,627  
Time deposits 980,472  253,445  
Total marketable securities 1,096,712  375,389  
Total cash, cash equivalents, and marketable securities $ 2,577,981  $ 1,826,043  
The following table provides a reconciliation of cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and restricted cash equivalents reported
within our consolidated balance sheets as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 to the total of such amounts as presented in the
consolidated statements of cash flows (in thousands):
Balance Sheet Line Item 2022 2021
Cash and cash equivalents Cash and cash equivalents $ 1,481,269  $ 1,450,654  
Restricted cash – current Other current assets 3,175  1,532  
Restricted cash – noncurrent Other assets 2,734  3,651  
Restricted cash equivalents – noncurrent Other assets 6,284  — 
Total cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash, and
restricted cash equivalents $ 1,493,462  $ 1,455,837  
During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we sold marketable securities for proceeds of $5.5 million and $188.1
million, respectively, and realized gains of less than $0.1 million and $0.2 million, respectively, on such sales. See Note 10. “Fair
Value Measurements” to our consolidated financial statements for information about the fair value of our marketable securities.
85
Table of Contents
The following tables summarize the unrealized gains and losses related to our available-for-sale marketable securities, by major
security type, as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 As of December 31, 2022
Amortized
CostUnrealized
GainsUnrealized
LossesAllowance for
Credit LossesFair
Value
Foreign debt $ 59,940  $ — $ 140 $ 23 $ 59,777  
U.S. debt 58,308  — 1,823  22 56,463  
Time deposits 980,810  — — 338 980,472  
Total $ 1,099,058  $ — $ 1,963  $ 383 $ 1,096,712  
 As of December 31, 2021
Amortized
CostUnrealized
GainsUnrealized
LossesAllowance for
Credit LossesFair
Value
Foreign debt $ 103,263  $ 81 $ 18 $ 9 $ 103,317  
U.S. debt 19,003  10 384 2 18,627  
Time deposits 253,531  — — 86 253,445  
Total $ 375,797  $ 91 $ 402 $ 97 $ 375,389  
The following table presents the change in the allowance for credit losses related to our available-for-sale marketable securities for
the years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
2022 2021
Allowance for credit losses, beginning of period $ 97 $ 121 
Provision for credit losses, net 667 423 
Sales and maturities of marketable securities (381) (447)
Allowance for credit losses, end of period $ 383 $ 97 
The contractual maturities of our marketable securities as of December 31, 2022 were as follows (in thousands):
Fair
Value
One year or less $ 983,472  
One year to two years 73,086  
Two years to three years 31,841  
Three years to four years 4,427  
Four years to five years — 
More than five years 3,886  
Total $ 1,096,712  
86
Table of Contents
6. Restricted Marketable Securities
Restricted marketable securities consisted of the following as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
2022 2021
Foreign government obligations $ 46,886  $ 64,855  
Supranational debt 8,661  10,997  
U.S. debt 109,328  145,326  
U.S. government obligations 17,195  23,548  
Total restricted marketable securities $ 182,070  $ 244,726  
Our restricted marketable securities represent long-term investments to fund the estimated future cost of collecting and recycling
modules covered under our solar module collection and recycling program. We have established a trust under which estimated
funds are put into custodial accounts with an established and reputable bank, for which First Solar, Inc.; First Solar Malaysia Sdn.
Bhd.; and First Solar Manufacturing GmbH are grantors. As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, such custodial accounts also included
noncurrent restricted cash and cash equivalents balances of $6.7 million and $0.9 million, respectively, which were reported within
“Other assets.” Trust funds may be disbursed for qualified module collection and recycling costs (including capital and facility
related recycling costs), payments to customers for assuming collection and recycling obligations, and reimbursements of any
overfunded amounts. Investments in the trust must meet certain investment quality criteria comparable to highly rated government
or agency bonds. As necessary, we fund any incremental amounts for our estimated collection and recycling obligations on an
annual basis based on the estimated costs of collecting and recycling covered modules, estimated rates of return on our restricted
marketable securities, and an estimated solar module life of 25 years, less amounts already funded in prior years.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, we sold all our restricted marketable securities for proceeds of $258.9 million and
realized gains of $11.7 million on such sales, and repurchased $255.6 million of restricted marketable securities as part of our
ongoing management of the custodial accounts. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we sold certain restricted marketable
securities for proceeds of $115.2 million and realized gains of $15.1 million on such sales, and repurchased $114.5 million of
restricted marketable securities as part of our ongoing management of the custodial accounts. See Note 10. “Fair Value
Measurements” to our consolidated financial statements for information about the fair value of our restricted marketable securities.
87
Table of Contents
The following tables summarize the unrealized gains and losses related to our restricted marketable securities, by major security
type, as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 As of December 31, 2022
Amortized
CostUnrealized
GainsUnrealized
LossesAllowance for
Credit LossesFair
Value
Foreign government obligations $ 64,008  $ — $ 17,112 $ 10 $ 46,886  
Supranational debt 11,146  — 2,485  — 8,661  
U.S. debt 148,288  — 38,932  28 109,328  
U.S. government obligations 24,551  — 7,352  4 17,195  
Total $ 247,993  $ — $ 65,881  $ 42 $ 182,070  
 As of December 31, 2021
Amortized
CostUnrealized
GainsUnrealized
LossesAllowance for
Credit LossesFair
Value
Foreign government obligations $ 66,867  $ — $ 2,002  $ 10 $ 64,855  
Supranational debt 11,362  — 365 — 10,997  
U.S. debt 150,060  — 4,697  37 145,326  
U.S. government obligations 24,640  — 1,086  6 23,548  
Total $ 252,929  $ — $ 8,150  $ 53 $ 244,726  
The following table presents the change in the allowance for credit losses related to our restricted marketable securities for the
years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
2022 2021
Allowance for credit losses, beginning of period $ 53 $ 13 
Provision for credit losses, net (11) 69 
Sales of restricted marketable securities — (29)
Allowance for credit losses, end of period $ 42 $ 53 
As of December 31, 2022, the contractual maturities of our restricted marketable securities were between 8 years and 17 years.
88
Table of Contents
7. Consolidated Balance Sheet Details
Accounts receivable trade, net
Accounts receivable trade, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Accounts receivable trade, gross $ 325,379  $ 430,100  
Allowance for credit losses (1,042 ) (664)
Accounts receivable trade, net $ 324,337  $ 429,436  
Accounts receivable unbilled, net
Accounts receivable unbilled, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Accounts receivable unbilled, gross $ 30,654  $ 25,336  
Allowance for credit losses — (63)
Accounts receivable unbilled, net $ 30,654  $ 25,273  
Allowance for credit losses
The following tables present the change in the allowances for credit losses related to our accounts receivable for the years ended
December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
Accounts receivable trade 2022 2021
Allowance for credit losses, beginning of period $ 664 $ 3,009  
Provision for credit losses, net 553 (2,224 )
Writeof fs (175) (121)
Allowance for credit losses, end of period $ 1,042  $ 664 
Accounts receivable unbilled 2022 2021
Allowance for credit losses, beginning of period $ 63 $ 303 
Provision for credit losses, net (63) (240)
Allowance for credit losses, end of period $ — $ 63 
Inventories
Inventories consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Raw materials $ 397,912  $ 404,727  
Work in process 66,641  65,573  
Finished goods 417,218  433,51 1 
Inventories $ 881,771  $ 903,81 1 
Inventories – current $ 621,376  $ 666,299  
Inventories – noncurrent $ 260,395  $ 237,512  
89
Table of Contents
Other current assets
Other current assets consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Spare maintenance materials and parts $ 114,428  $ 112,070  
Operating supplies 47,492  41,034  
Prepaid expenses 43,262  28,232  
Prepaid income taxes 8,314  41,379  
Restricted cash 3,175  1,532  
Derivative instruments (1) 2,018  5,816  
Other 18,384  14,129  
Other current assets $ 237,073  $ 244,192  
——————————
(1) See Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our derivative instruments.
Property, plant and equipment, net
Property, plant and equipment, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Land $ 35,259  $ 18,359  
Buildings and improvements 893,049  693,289  
Machinery and equipment 2,762,801  2,527,627  
Office equipment and furniture 146,467  139,61 1 
Leasehold improvements 40,160  40,517  
Construction in progress 1,121,938  461,708  
Property , plant and equipment, gross 4,999,674  3,881,1 11 
Accumulated depreciation (1,462,772 ) (1,231,524 )
Property , plant and equipment, net $ 3,536,902  $ 2,649,587  
We assess our property, plant and equipment for impairment whenever events or changes in circumstances arise that may indicate
that the carrying amount of such assets may not be recoverable. We consider a long-lived asset to be abandoned after we have
ceased use of the asset and we have no intent to use or repurpose it in the future, and such abandoned assets are recorded at their
salvage value, if any. During 2020, we recorded an impairment loss of $17.4 million in “Cost of sales” for certain abandoned
module manufacturing equipment, including framing and assembly tools, as such equipment was no longer compatible with our
long-term module technology roadmap.
Depreciation of property, plant and equipment was $244.9 million, $233.2 million, and $198.9 million for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
90
Table of Contents
PV solar power systems, net
PV solar power systems, net consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
2022 2021
PV solar power systems, gross $ 11,593  $ 281,660  
Accumulated depreciation (5,351 ) (64,367 )
PV solar power systems, net $ 6,242  $ 217,293  
Depreciation of PV solar power systems was $9.2 million, $11.8 million, and $19.6 million for the years ended December 31, 2022,
2021, and 2020, respectively.
We evaluate our PV solar power systems for impairment under a held and used impairment model whenever events or changes in
circumstances arise that may indicate that the carrying amount of a particular system may not be recoverable. Such events or
changes may include a significant decrease in the market price of the asset, current-period operating or cash flow losses combined
with a history of such losses or a projection of future losses associated with the use of the asset, and changes in expectations
regarding our intent to hold the asset on a long-term basis or the timing of a potential asset disposition.
In November 2021, the off-taker for our 4 MW PV solar power plant located in Samoa notified us of its intention to terminate the
PPA. Given the limited availability of alternative off-take opportunities, including both contracted and uncontracted sales of
electricity produced by the project, we determined it was more likely than not that the carrying amount of the project was not
recoverable due to our expectation that the project would be disposed of significantly before the end of its previously estimated
useful life. As a result, we measured the fair value of the plant using an income approach valuation technique and recorded an
impairment loss of $10.2 million in “Cost of sales” for the difference between the estimated fair value and carrying value of the
plant.
During 2022, we received multiple non-binding offers to purchase our Luz del Norte PV solar power plant and elected to pursue
such opportunities in coordination with the project’s lenders. As a result of the expected sale, we compared the undiscounted future
cash flows for the project to its carrying value and determined that the project was not recoverable. Accordingly, we measured the
fair value of the project using a market approach valuation technique and recorded an impairment loss of $57.8 million in “Cost of
sales” in our consolidated statements of operations. Such impairment loss was comprised of $55.6 million for PV solar power
systems, $1.3 million for intangible assets, and $0.9 million for operating lease assets. In December 2022, we completed the sale of
the project to a subsidiary of Toesca Asset Management (“Toesca”). In connection with the sale, the project’s lenders agreed to
forgive a portion of the loan balance. See Note 11. “Debt” to our consolidated financial statements for further information related to
this transaction.
Project assets
Project assets consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Project assets – development costs, including project acquisition and land costs $ 30,108  $ 117,407  
Project assets – construction costs — 198,081  
Project assets $ 30,108  $ 315,488  
In June 2022, we completed the sale of the majority of our project assets to PAG in connection with the sale of our Japan project
development business. See Note 3. “Sales of Businesses” to our consolidated financial statements for further information about this
transaction.AC
91
Table of Contents
Other assets
Other assets consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Operating lease assets (1) $ 93,185  $ 207,544  
Advance payments for raw materials 91,260  86,962  
Income tax receivables 56,993  39,862  
Accounts receivable unbilled, net 11,498  20,840  
Restricted cash equivalents 6,284  — 
Restricted cash 2,734  3,651  
Accounts receivable trade, net 1,500  21,293  
Indirect tax receivables 123 21,873  
Other 56,265  36,739  
Other assets $ 319,842  $ 438,764  
——————————
(1) See Note 9. "Leases" to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our lease arrangements.
Accrued expenses
Accrued expenses consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Accrued property , plant and equipment $ 148,777  $ 42,031  
Accrued freight 77,136  61,429  
Accrued compensation and benefits 47,939  34,606  
Accrued inventory 44,679  42,170  
Accrued other taxes 19,765  23,103  
Product warranty liability (1) 10,660  13,598  
Accrued project costs 4,601  48,836  
Other 29,225  22,677  
Accrued expenses $ 382,782  $ 288,450  
——————————
(1)    See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our “Product Warranties.”
Other current liabilities
Other current liabilities consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Operating lease liabilities (1) $ 9,193  $ 12,781  
Derivative instruments (2) 6,668  3,550  
Other taxes payable 1,185  8,123  
Other 4,199  10,293  
Other current liabilities $ 21,245  $ 34,747  
——————————
(1) See Note 9. "Leases" to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our lease arrangements.
(2) See Note 8. “Derivative Financial Instruments” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our derivative instruments.
92
Table of Contents
Other liabilities
Other liabilities consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Operating lease liabilities (1) $ 40,589  $ 145,912  
Deferred tax liabilities, net (2) 28,929  27,699  
Product warranty liability (3) 23,127  38,955  
Other 27,292  43,658  
Other liabilities $ 119,937  $ 256,224  
——————————
(1) See Note 9. "Leases" to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our lease arrangements.
(2) See Note 16. “Income Taxes” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our net deferred tax liabilities.
(3) See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of our “Product Warranties.”
8. Derivative Financial Instruments
As a global company, we are exposed in the normal course of business to interest rate, foreign currency, and commodity price risks
that could affect our financial position, results of operations, and cash flows. We use derivative instruments to hedge against these
risks and only hold such instruments for hedging purposes, not for speculative or trading purposes.
Depending on the terms of the specific derivative instruments and market conditions, some of our derivative instruments may be
assets and others liabilities at any particular balance sheet date. We report all of our derivative instruments at fair value and account
for changes in the fair value of derivative instruments within “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” if the derivative instruments
qualify for hedge accounting. For those derivative instruments that do not qualify for hedge accounting (i.e., “economic hedges”),
we record the changes in fair value directly to earnings. See Note 10. “Fair Value Measurements” to our consolidated financial
statements for information about the techniques we use to measure the fair value of our derivative instruments.
The following tables present the fair values of derivative instruments included in our consolidated balance sheets as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
 December 31, 2022
 Other Current
Assets Other AssetsOther Current
Liabilities Other Liabilities
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:   
Commodity swap contracts $ — $ 17 $ 4,447  $ 144 
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments $ — $ 17 $ 4,447  $ 144 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:   
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ 2,018  $ — $ 2,221  $ — 
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 2,018  $ — $ 2,221  $ — 
Total derivative instruments $ 2,018  $ 17 $ 6,668  $ 144 
93
Table of Contents
 December 31, 2021
 Other Current
AssetsOther Current
Liabilities
Derivatives designated as hedging instruments:  
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ 1,336  $ 139 
Total derivatives designated as hedging instruments $ 1,336  $ 139 
Derivatives not designated as hedging instruments:  
Foreign exchange forward contracts $ 4,480  $ 3,411 
Total derivatives not designated as hedging instruments $ 4,480  $ 3,411 
Total derivative instruments $ 5,816  $ 3,550  
The following table presents the pretax amounts related to derivative instruments designated as cash flow hedges affecting
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and our consolidated statements of operations for the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
Foreign Exchange
Forward
ContractsCommodity Swap
Contracts Total
Balance as of December 31, 2019 $ (962)$ — $ (962)
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) (3,881 ) 1,472  (2,409 )
Amounts reclassified to earnings impacting:
Cost of sales 1,199  — 1,199  
Balance as of December 31, 2020 (3,644 ) 1,472  (2,172 )
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) 2,864  1,531  4,395  
Amounts reclassified to earnings impacting:
Cost of sales 1,906  (3,003 ) (1,097 )
Balance as of December 31, 2021 1,126  — 1,126  
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) 545 (8,101 ) (7,556 )
Amounts reclassified to earnings impacting:
Cost of sales (1,671 ) 859 (812)
Balance as of December 31, 2022 $ — $ (7,242 )$ (7,242 )
During the years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021, we recognized unrealized losses of less than $0.1 million within “Cost of
sales” for amounts excluded from effectiveness testing for our foreign exchange forward contracts designated as cash flow hedges.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized unrealized gains of $1.2 million within “Cost of sales” for amounts
excluded from effectiveness testing for our foreign exchange forward contracts designated as cash flow hedges.
The following table presents the pretax amounts related to derivative instruments designated as net investment hedges affecting
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and our consolidated statements of operations for the year ended December 31,
2022 (in thousands):
Foreign Exchange
Forward
Contracts
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $ — 
Amounts recognized in other comprehensive income (loss) (667)
Balance as of December 31, 2022 $ (667)
94
Table of Contents
During the year ended December 31, 2022, we recognized unrealized gains of $0.9 million within “Other income (expense), net”
for amounts excluded from effectiveness testing for our derivative instruments designated as net investment hedges.
The following table presents gains and losses related to derivative instruments not designated as hedges affecting our consolidated
statements of operations for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
Amount of Gain (Loss) Recognized in Income
Income Statement Line Item 2022 2021 2020
Foreign exchange forward contracts Cost of sales $ 583 $ 57 $ (462)
Foreign exchange forward contracts Foreign currency loss, net 75,421  15,053  (6,317 )
Interest rate swap contracts Interest expense, net — (315) (7,259 )
Interest Rate Risk
From time to time, we may use interest rate swap contracts to mitigate our exposure to interest rate fluctuations associated with
certain of our debt instruments. We do not use such swap contracts for speculative or trading purposes. During the years ended
December 31, 2021 and 2020, all of our interest rate swap contracts related to project specific debt facilities. Such swap contracts
did not qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in accordance with ASC 815 due to our expectation to sell the associated
projects before the maturity of their project specific debt financings and corresponding swap contracts. Accordingly, changes in the
fair values of these swap contracts were recorded directly to “Interest expense, net.”
Foreign Currency Risk
Cash Flow Exposure
We expect certain of our subsidiaries to have future cash flows that will be denominated in currencies other than the subsidiaries’
functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and the other currencies
in which they transact will cause fluctuations in the cash flows we expect to receive or pay when these cash flows are realized or
settled. Accordingly, we enter into foreign exchange forward contracts to hedge a portion of these forecasted cash flows. As of
December 31, 2021, these foreign exchange forward contracts hedged our forecasted cash flows for periods up to 11 months. These
foreign exchange forward contracts qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in accordance with ASC 815, and we designated
them as such. We report unrealized gains or losses on such contracts in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and subsequently
reclassify applicable amounts into earnings when the hedged transaction occurs and impacts earnings. We determined that these
derivative financial instruments were highly effective as cash flow hedges as of December 31, 2021.
As of December 31, 2021, the notional values associated with our foreign exchange forward contracts qualifying as cash flow
hedges were as follows (notional amounts and U.S. dollar equivalents in millions):
December 31, 2021
Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
U.S. dollar (1) $38.4 $38.4
British pound GBP  10.6 $14.4
——————————
(1) These derivative instruments represent hedges of outstanding payables denominated in U.S. dollars at certain of our foreign subsidiaries
whose functional currencies are other than the U.S. dollar .
95
Table of Contents
Net Investment Exposure
The functional currencies of certain of our foreign subsidiaries are their local currencies. Accordingly, we apply period-end
exchange rates to translate their assets and liabilities and daily transaction exchange rates to translate their revenues, expenses,
gains, and losses into U.S. dollars. We include the associated translation adjustments as a separate component of “Accumulated
other comprehensive loss” within stockholders’ equity. From time to time, we may seek to mitigate the impact of such translation
adjustments by entering into foreign exchange forward contracts that are designated as hedges of net investments in certain foreign
subsidiaries. In June 2022, we entered into a foreign exchange forward contract with a notional value of ¥8.0 billion
($60.6 million), which matured in December 2022. Such foreign exchange forward contract qualified for and was designated as a
hedge of our net investment in a certain foreign subsidiary in Japan. We report unrealized gains or losses on this contract, which are
based on spot exchange rates, as a component of our foreign currency translation adjustments within “Accumulated other
comprehensive loss” and subsequently reclassify applicable amounts into earnings when the net investments are sold or
substantially liquidated.
Transaction Exposure and Economic Hedging
Many of our subsidiaries have assets and liabilities (primarily cash, receivables, deferred taxes, payables, accrued expenses,
operating lease liabilities, and solar module collection and recycling liabilities) that are denominated in currencies other than the
subsidiaries’ functional currencies. Changes in the exchange rates between the functional currencies of our subsidiaries and the
other currencies in which these assets and liabilities are denominated will create fluctuations in our reported consolidated
statements of operations and cash flows. We may enter into foreign exchange forward contracts or other financial instruments to
economically hedge assets and liabilities against the effects of currency exchange rate fluctuations. The gains and losses on such
foreign exchange forward contracts will economically offset all or part of the transaction gains and losses that we recognize in
earnings on the related foreign currency denominated assets and liabilities.
We also enter into foreign exchange forward contracts to economically hedge balance sheet and other exposures related to
transactions between certain of our subsidiaries and transactions with third parties. Such contracts are considered economic hedges
and do not qualify for hedge accounting. Accordingly, we recognize gains or losses from the fluctuations in foreign exchange rates
and the fair value of these derivative contracts in “Foreign currency loss, net” on our consolidated statements of operations.
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, the notional values of our foreign exchange forward contracts that do not qualify for hedge
accounting were as follows (notional amounts and U.S. dollar equivalents in millions):
December 31, 2022
Transaction Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
Sell Canadian dollar CAD 4.2 $3.1
Sell Chilean peso CLP 5,996.5 $7.0
Purchase Euro €160.2 $170.5
Sell Euro €38.4 $40.9
Sell Indian rupee INR 27,119.5 $327.4
Purchase Japanese yen ¥2,982.7 $22.4
Sell Japanese yen ¥8,950.3 $67.1
Purchase Malaysian ringgit MYR 99.8 $22.6
Sell Malaysian ringgit MYR 13.7 $3.1
Sell Mexican peso MXN 34.6 $1.8
Purchase Singapore dollar SGD 1.4 $1.0
96
Table of Contents
December 31, 2021
Transaction Currency Notional Amount USD Equivalent
Purchase Australian dollar AUD 3.2 $2.3
Purchase Brazilian real BRL  2.6 $0.5
Sell Brazilian real BRL  2.6 $0.5
Purchase British pound GBP  2.5 $3.4
Sell Chilean peso CLP 4,058.6 $4.8
Purchase Euro €77.6 $88.0
Sell Euro €38.6 $43.8
Sell Indian rupee INR 10,943.0 $147.1
Purchase Japanese yen ¥667.5 $5.8
Sell Japanese yen ¥31,524.6 $273.9
Purchase Malaysian ringgit MYR 17.0 $4.1
Sell Malaysian ringgit MYR 24.5 $5.9
Sell Mexican peso MXN 34.6 $1.7
Purchase Singapore dollar SGD 5.5 $4.1
Commodity Price Risk
We use commodity swap contracts to mitigate our exposure to commodity price fluctuations for certain raw materials used in the
production of our modules. During the year ended December 31, 2022, we entered into various commodity swap contracts to hedge
a portion of our forecasted cash flows for purchases of aluminum frames between July 2022 and December 2023. Such swaps had
an aggregate initial notional value based on metric tons of forecasted aluminum purchases, equivalent to $70.5 million, and entitle
us to receive a three-month average London Metals Exchange price for aluminum while requiring us to pay certain fixed prices.
The notional amount of the commodity swap contracts proportionately adjusts with forecasted purchases of aluminum frames. As
of December 31, 2022, the notional value associated with these contracts were $30.5 million.
These commodity swap contracts qualify for accounting as cash flow hedges in accordance with ASC 815, and we designated them
as such. We report unrealized gains or losses on such contracts in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” and subsequently
reclassify applicable amounts into earnings when the hedged transactions occur and impact earnings. We determined that these
derivative financial instruments were highly effective as cash flow hedges as of December 31, 2022. In the following 12 months,
we expect to reclassify into earnings $6.6 million of net unrealized losses related to these commodity swap contracts that are
included in “Accumulated other comprehensive loss” at December 31, 2022 as we realize the earnings effects of the related
forecasted transactions. The amount we ultimately record to earnings will depend on the actual commodity pricing when we realize
the related forecasted transactions.
97
Table of Contents
9. Leases
Our lease arrangements include land associated with our corporate and administrative offices, land for our international
manufacturing facilities, and certain of our manufacturing equipment. Such leases primarily relate to assets located in the United
States, Malaysia, India, and Vietnam.
The following table presents certain quantitative information related to our lease arrangements for the years ended December 31,
2022 and 2021, and as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
2022 2021
Operating lease cost $ 14,634 $ 17,681
Variable lease cost 2,517 2,041
Short-term lease cost 339 817
Total lease cost $ 17,490 $ 20,539
Payments of amounts included in the measurement of operating lease liabilities $ 15,359 $ 19,405
Lease assets obtained in exchange for operating lease liabilities $ 4,394 $ 21,187
December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Operating lease assets $ 93,185 $ 207,544
Operating lease liabilities – current 9,193 12,781
Operating lease liabilities – noncurrent 40,589 145,912
Weighted-average remaining lease term 6 years 19 years
Weighted-average discount rate 5.1 % 2.8 %
In June 2022, we completed the sale of our Japan project development business to PAG, which included the transfer of various land
leases associated with the business. As a result, we derecognized lease assets of $87.7 million, current lease liabilities of
$3.0 million, and noncurrent lease liabilities of $77.9 million. See Note 3. “Sales of Businesses” to our consolidated financial
statements for further information about this transaction.
As of December 31, 2022, the future payments associated with our lease liabilities were as follows (in thousands):
Total Lease
Liabilities
2023 $ 11,319  
2024 10,895  
2025 9,814  
2026 8,343  
2027 5,768  
Thereafter 11,384  
Total future payments 57,523  
Less: interest (7,741 )
Total lease liabilities $ 49,782  
98
Table of Contents
10. Fair Value Measurements
The following is a description of the valuation techniques that we use to measure the fair value of assets and liabilities that we
measure and report at fair value on a recurring basis:
•Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash Equivalents. At December 31, 2022, our cash equivalents and restricted cash
equivalents consisted of money market funds. We value our cash equivalents and restricted cash equivalents using observable
inputs that reflect quoted prices for securities with identical characteristics and classify the valuation techniques that use these
inputs as Level 1.
•Marketable Securities and Restricted Marketable Securities. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, our marketable securities
consisted of foreign debt, U.S. debt, and time deposits, and our restricted marketable securities consisted of foreign and U.S.
government obligations, supranational debt, and U.S. debt. We value our marketable securities and restricted marketable
securities using observable inputs that reflect quoted prices for securities with identical characteristics or quoted prices for
securities with similar characteristics and other observable inputs (such as interest rates that are observable at commonly
quoted intervals). Accordingly, we classify the valuation techniques that use these inputs as either Level 1 or Level 2
depending on the inputs used. We also consider the effect of our counterparties’ credit standing in these fair value
measurements.
•Derivative Assets and Liabilities. At December 31, 2022 and 2021, our derivative assets and liabilities consisted of foreign
exchange forward contracts involving major currencies. At December 31, 2022, our derivative assets and liabilities also
consisted of commodity swap contracts involving major commodity prices. Since our derivative assets and liabilities are not
traded on an exchange, we value them using standard industry valuation models. As applicable, these models project future
cash flows and discount the amounts to a present value using market-based observable inputs, including credit risk, foreign
exchange rates, forward and spot prices for currencies, and forward prices for commodities. These inputs are observable in
active markets over the contract term of the derivative instruments we hold, and accordingly, we classify the valuation
techniques as Level 2. In evaluating credit risk, we consider the effect of our counterparties’ and our own credit standing in the
fair value measurements of our derivative assets and liabilities, respectively.
99
Table of Contents
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the fair value measurements of our assets and liabilities measured on a recurring basis were as
follows (in thousands):
Fair Value Measurements at Reporting
Date Using
December 31,
2022Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
Assets:
Cash equivalents:
Money market funds $ 4,324  $ 4,324  $ — $ — 
Restricted cash equivalents:
Money market funds 6,284  6,284  — — 
Marketable securities:
Foreign debt 59,777  — 59,777  — 
U.S. debt 56,463  — 56,463  — 
Time deposits 980,472  980,472  — — 
Restricted marketable securities 182,070  — 182,070  — 
Derivative assets 2,035  — 2,035  — 
Total assets $ 1,291,425  $ 991,080  $ 300,345  $ — 
Liabilities:
Derivative liabilities $ 6,812  $ — $ 6,812  $ — 
Fair Value Measurements at Reporting
Date Using
December 31,
2021Quoted Prices
in Active
Markets for
Identical
Assets
(Level 1)Significant
Other
Observable
Inputs
(Level 2)Significant
Unobservable
Inputs
(Level 3)
Assets:
Marketable securities:
Foreign debt $ 103,317  $ — $ 103,317  $ — 
U.S. debt 18,627  — 18,627  — 
Time deposits 253,445  253,445  — — 
Restricted marketable securities 244,726  — 244,726  — 
Derivative assets 5,816  — 5,816  — 
Total assets $ 625,931  $ 253,445  $ 372,486  $ — 
Liabilities:
Derivative liabilities $ 3,550  $ — $ 3,550  $ — 
100
Table of Contents
Fair Value of Financial Instruments
At December 31, 2022 and 2021, the carrying values and fair values of our financial instruments not measured at fair value were as
follows (in thousands):
 December 31, 2022 December 31, 2021
Carrying
ValueFair
ValueCarrying
ValueFair
Value
Assets:
Accounts receivable unbilled, net - noncurrent $ 11,498  $ 10,304  $ 20,840  $ 18,846  
Accounts receivable trade, net - noncurrent 1,500  1,339  21,293  18,605  
Liabilities:
Long-term debt, including current maturities (1) $ 185,000  $ 160,986  $ 246,737  $ 243,865  
——————————
(1) Excludes unamortized discounts and issuance costs.
The carrying values in our consolidated balance sheets of our current trade accounts receivable, current unbilled accounts
receivable, restricted cash, accounts payable, and accrued expenses approximated their fair values due to their nature and relatively
short maturities; therefore, we excluded them from the foregoing table. The fair value measurements for our noncurrent unbilled
accounts receivable, noncurrent trade accounts receivable, and long-term debt are considered Level 2 measurements under the fair
value hierarchy.
Credit Risk
We have certain financial and derivative instruments that subject us to credit risk. These consist primarily of cash, cash equivalents,
marketable securities, accounts receivable, restricted cash, restricted cash equivalents, restricted marketable securities, foreign
exchange forward contracts, and commodity swap contracts. We are exposed to credit losses in the event of nonperformance by the
counterparties to our financial and derivative instruments. We place these instruments with various high-quality financial
institutions and limit the amount of credit risk from any one counterparty. We monitor the credit standing of our counterparty
financial institutions. Our net sales are primarily concentrated among a limited number of customers. We monitor the financial
condition of our customers and perform credit evaluations whenever considered necessary. We typically require some form of
payment security from our customers, including, but not limited to, advance payments, parent guarantees, letters of credit, bank
guarantees, or surety bonds.
101
Table of Contents
11. Debt
Our long-term debt consisted of the following at December 31, 2022 and 2021 (in thousands):
Balance (USD)
Loan Agreement Currency 2022 2021
India Credit Facility USD $ 185,000  $ — 
Luz del Norte Credit Facilities USD — 183,829  
Kyoto Credit Facility JPY — 62,908  
Long-term debt principal 185,000  246,737  
Less: unamortized discounts and issuance costs (651) (6,836 )
Total long-term debt 184,349  239,901  
Less: current portion — (3,896 )
Noncurrent portion $ 184,349  $ 236,005  
India Credit Facility
In July 2022, FS India Solar Ventures Private Limited, our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary, entered into a finance agreement (the
“India Credit Facility”) with the U.S. International Development Finance Corporation (“DFC”) for aggregate borrowings up to
$500.0 million for the development and construction of an approximately 3.3 GW solar module manufacturing facility located in
Tamil Nadu, India. Principal on the India Credit Facility is payable in scheduled semi-annual installments through the facility’s
expected maturity in August 2029. The India Credit Facility is guaranteed by First Solar, Inc.
Luz del Norte Credit Facilities
In August 2014, Parque Solar Fotovoltaico Luz del Norte SpA (“Luz del Norte”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project
company, entered into credit facilities (the “Luz del Norte Credit Facilities”) with DFC and the International Finance Corporation
(“IFC”) to provide limited-recourse senior secured debt financing for the design, development, financing, construction, testing,
commissioning, operation, and maintenance of a 141 MW PV solar power plant located near Copiapó, Chile. In December 2022,
we completed the sale of the project to a subsidiary of Toesca. In connection with the sale, DFC and IFC agreed to forgive a portion
of the outstanding loan balance, resulting in a gain of $30.2 million recorded within "Other income, net” in our consolidated
statements of operations. The remaining outstanding balance of $145.3 million was assumed by Toesca.
Kyoto Credit Facility
In July 2020, First Solar Japan GK, our wholly-owned subsidiary, entered into a construction loan facility with Mizuho Bank, Ltd.
for borrowings up to ¥15.0 billion ($142.8 million), which are intended to be used for the construction of a 38 MW PV solar
power plant located in Kyoto, Japan. In May 2022, we repaid the remaining $73.2 million principal balance on the credit facility.
Momura Credit Facility
In May 2022, FS Japan Project 25 GK (“Momura”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into a
credit agreement with Nomura Capital Investment Co., Ltd. and Aozora Bank, Ltd. for aggregate borrowings up to ¥21.5 billion
($168.1 million) for the development and construction of a 53 MW PV solar power plant located in Tochigi, Japan. The credit
facility consisted of an ¥18.8 billion ($146.6 million) term loan facility, a ¥1.9 billion ($15.1 million) consumption tax facility, and
a ¥0.8 billion ($6.4 million) debt service reserve facility. In June 2022, we completed the sale of our Japan project development
business, and the credit facility’s outstanding balance of $107.2 million was assumed by PAG. See Note 3. “Sales of Businesses” to
our consolidated financial statements for further information about this transaction.DC 
AC
AC
AC
102
Table of Contents
Yatsubo Credit Facility
In May 2022, FS Japan Project 24 GK (“Yatsubo”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into a
credit agreement with Nomura Capital Investment Co., Ltd. and Aozora Bank, Ltd. for aggregate borrowings up to ¥10.9 billion
($85.0 million) for the development and construction of a 26 MW PV solar power plant located in Tochigi, Japan. The credit
agreement consisted of a ¥9.5 billion ($74.2 million) term loan facility, a ¥1.0 billion ($7.6 million) consumption tax facility, and a
¥0.4 billion ($3.2 million) debt service reserve facility. In June 2022, we completed the sale of our Japan project development
business, and the credit facility’s outstanding balance of $70.0 million was assumed by PAG. See Note 3. “Sales of Businesses” to
our consolidated financial statements for further information about this transaction.
Orido Credit Facility
In May 2022, FS Japan Project B5 GK (“Orido”), our indirect wholly-owned subsidiary and project company, entered into a credit
agreement with Nomura Capital Investment Co., Ltd. and Aozora Bank, Ltd. for aggregate borrowings up to ¥5.3 billion ($41.3
million) for the development and construction of a 14 MW PV solar power plant located in Tochigi, Japan. The credit agreement
consisted of a ¥4.6 billion ($36.0 million) term loan facility, a ¥0.5 billion ($3.6 million) consumption tax facility, and a ¥0.2 billion
($1.7 million) debt service reserve facility. In June 2022, we completed the sale of our Japan project development business, and the
credit facility’s outstanding balance of $18.0 million was assumed by PAG. See Note 3. “Sales of Businesses” to our consolidated
financial statements for further information about this transaction.
Interest Rate Risk
As of December 31, 2022, our long-term debt borrowing rates were as follows:
Loan Agreement Interest Rate Effective Interest Rate
India Credit Facility U.S. Treasury Constant Maturity Yield plus 1.75% 4.96%
During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, we paid $11.6 million, $12.7 million, and $14.9 million, respectively,
of interest related to our long-term debt arrangements.
Future Principal Payments
At December 31, 2022, the future principal payments on our long-term debt were due as follows (in thousands):
Total Debt
2023 $ — 
2024 13,117 
2025 33,633  
2026 33,633  
2027 33,652  
Thereafter 70,965  
Total long-term debt future principal payments $ 185,000  AC
AC
103
Table of Contents
12. Commitments and Contingencies
Commercial Commitments
During the normal course of business, we enter into commercial commitments in the form of letters of credit and surety bonds to
provide financial and performance assurance to third parties. As of December 31, 2022, the majority of these commercial
commitments supported our modules business.
As of December 31, 2022, the issued and outstanding amounts and available capacities under these commitments were as follows
(in millions):
Issued and
OutstandingAvailable
Capacity
Bilateral facilities (1) $ 117.4 $ 98.8 
Surety bonds 9.1 232.8  
——————————
(1) Of the total letters of credit issued under the bilateral facilities, $ 5.5 million was secured with cash.
Product Warranties
When we recognize revenue for sales of modules or projects, we accrue liabilities for the estimated future costs of meeting our
limited warranty obligations for both modules and the balance of the systems. We estimate our limited product warranty liability for
power output and defects in materials and workmanship under normal use and service conditions based on return rates for each
series of module technology. We make and revise these estimates based primarily on the number of solar modules under warranty
installed at customer locations, our historical experience with and projections of warranty claims, and our estimated per-module
replacement costs. We also monitor our expected future module performance through certain quality and reliability testing and
actual performance in certain field installation sites. From time to time, we have taken remediation actions with respect to affected
modules beyond our limited warranties and may elect to do so in the future, in which case we would incur additional expenses.
Such potential voluntary future remediation actions beyond our limited warranty obligations may be material to our consolidated
statements of operations if we commit to any such remediation actions.
Product warranty activities during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 were as follows (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
Product warranty liability , beginning of period $ 52,553  $ 95,096  $ 129,797  
Accruals for new warranties issued 4,727  9,266  9,424  
Settlements (12,690 ) (12,337 ) (22,464 )
Changes in estimate of product warranty liability (10,803 ) (39,472 ) (21,661 )
Product warranty liability , end of period $ 33,787  $ 52,553  $ 95,096  
Current portion of warranty liability $ 10,660  $ 13,598  $ 22,278  
Noncurrent portion of warranty liability $ 23,127  $ 38,955  $ 72,818  
104
Table of Contents
During the year ended December 31, 2022 and 2021, we revised our limited product warranty liability estimate based on updated
information regarding our warranty claims, which reduced our product warranty liability by $10.2 million and $33.1 million,
respectively. This updated information reflected lower-than-expected warranty claims for our older series of module technology as
well as the evolving claims profile of our newest series of module technology, resulting in reductions to our projected module
return rates. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we revised this estimate based on updated information regarding our
warranty claims, which reduced our product warranty liability by $19.7 million. This updated information reflected lower-than-
expected settlements for our older series of module technology and revisions to projected settlements, resulting in a lower projected
return rate.
Indemnifications
In certain limited circumstances, we have provided indemnifications to customers or other parties under which we are contractually
obligated to compensate such parties for losses they suffer resulting from a breach of a representation, warranty, or covenant; the
resolution of specific matters associated with a project’s development or construction; or guarantees of a third party’s payment or
performance obligations. For contracts that have such indemnification provisions, we initially recognize a liability under ASC 460
for the estimated premium that would be required by a guarantor to issue the same indemnity in a standalone arm’s-length
transaction with an unrelated party. We may base these estimates on the cost of insurance or other instruments that cover the
underlying risks being indemnified and may purchase such instruments to mitigate our exposure to potential indemnification
payments. We subsequently measure such liabilities at the greater of the initially estimated premium or the contingent liability
required to be recognized under ASC 450. We recognize any indemnification liabilities as a reduction of earnings associated with
the related transaction.
After an indemnification liability is recorded, we derecognize such amount pursuant to ASC 460 depending on the nature of the
indemnity, which derecognition typically occurs upon expiration or settlement of the arrangement, and any contingent aspects of
the indemnity are accounted for in accordance with ASC 450. As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, we accrued $2.5 million and
$3.8 million of current indemnification liabilities, respectively. As of December 31, 2022, the maximum potential amount of future
payments under our indemnifications was $97.1 million, and we held insurance and other instruments allowing us to recover up to
$28.0 million of potential amounts paid under the indemnifications.
In September 2017, we made an indemnification payment in connection with the sale of one of our projects following the
underpayment of anticipated cash grants by the United States government. In February 2018, the associated project entity
commenced legal action against the United States government seeking full payment of the cash grants. In May 2021, the parties
reached an agreement, pursuant to which the United States government made a settlement payment to the project entity. Under the
terms of the indemnification arrangement, we received $65.1 million for our portion of the settlement payment, which we recorded
as revenue during the year ended December 31, 2021.
Solar Module Collection and Recycling Liability
We previously established a module collection and recycling program, which has since been discontinued, to collect and recycle
modules sold and covered under such program once the modules reach the end of their service lives. For legacy customer sales
contracts that are covered under this program, we agreed to pay the costs for the collection and recycling of qualifying solar
modules, and the end-users agreed to notify us, disassemble their solar power systems, package the solar modules for shipment, and
revert ownership rights over the modules back to us at the end of the modules’ service lives. Accordingly, we recorded any
collection and recycling obligations within “Cost of sales” at the time of sale based on the estimated cost to collect and recycle the
covered solar modules.
105
Table of Contents
We estimate the cost of our collection and recycling obligations based on the present value of the expected future cost of collecting
and recycling the solar modules, which includes estimates for the cost of packaging materials; the cost of freight from the solar
module installation sites to a recycling center; material, labor, and capital costs; and by-product credits for certain materials
recovered during the recycling process. We base these estimates on our experience collecting and recycling solar modules and
certain assumptions regarding costs at the time the solar modules will be collected and recycled. In the periods between the time of
sale and the related settlement of the collection and recycling obligation, we accrete the carrying amount of the associated liability
and classify the corresponding expense within “Selling, general and administrative” expense on our consolidated statements of
operations.
We periodically review our estimates of expected future recycling costs and may adjust our liability accordingly. Such adjustments
are presented within “Cost of sales” on our consolidated statements of operations. During the year ended December 31, 2022, we
completed our annual cost study of obligations under our module collection and recycling program and reduced the associated
liability by $7.5 million primarily due to lower estimated capital and chemical costs resulting from improvements to our module
recycling technology. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we completed our annual cost study of obligations under our
module collection and recycling program and increased the associated liability by $10.8 million primarily due to lower estimated
by-product credits for certain semiconductor materials recovered during the recycling process and updates to certain valuation
assumptions. During the year ended December 31, 2020, we completed our annual cost study of obligations under our module
collection and recycling program and reduced the associated liability by $18.9 million primarily due to changes to the estimated
timing of cash flows associated with capital, labor, and maintenance costs and updates to certain valuation assumptions.
Our module collection and recycling liability was $128.1 million and $139.1 million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021,
respectively. During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, we recognized accretion expense of $5.5 million, $5.4
million and $5.2 million, respectively, associated with this liability. See Note 6. “Restricted Marketable Securities” to our
consolidated financial statements for more information about our arrangements for funding this liability.
Legal Proceedings
Class Action
On January 7, 2022, a putative class action lawsuit titled City of Pontiac General Employees’ Retirement System v. First Solar, Inc.,
et al., Case No. 2:22-cv-00036-MTL, was filed in the United States District Court for the District of Arizona (hereafter “Arizona
District Court”) against the Company and certain of our current officers (collectively, “Putative Class Action Defendants”). The
complaint was filed on behalf of a purported class consisting of all purchasers of First Solar common stock between February 22,
2019 and February 20, 2020, inclusive. The complaint asserts violations of Sections 10(b) and 20(a) of the Securities Exchange Act
of 1934 and Rule 10b-5 based on allegedly false and misleading statements related to the Company’s Series 6 solar modules and its
project development business. It seeks unspecified damages and an award of costs and expenses. On April 25, 2022, the Arizona
District Court issued an order appointing the Palm Harbor Special Fire Control & Rescue District Firefighters’ Pension Plan and the
Greater Pennsylvania Carpenters’ Pension Fund as Lead Plaintiffs. On June 23, 2022, Lead Plaintiffs filed an Amended Complaint
that brings the same claims and seeks the same relief as the original complaint. Putative Class Action Defendants filed a motion to
dismiss on August 22, 2022. Lead Plaintiffs filed their opposition to the motion to dismiss on October 21, 2022. Putative Class
Action Defendants filed a reply in support of their motion to dismiss on November 21, 2022. On January 10, 2023, the Court
granted the Putative Class Action Defendants’ motion to dismiss in full, with leave to amend by February 10, 2023. On February
10, 2023, Lead Plaintiffs filed a Second Amended Complaint. Putative Class Action Defendants filed a motion to dismiss the
Second Amended Complaint on February 24, 2023. Given the early stage of the litigation, at this time we are not in a position to
assess the likelihood of any potential loss or adverse effect on our financial condition or to estimate the amount or range of possible
loss, if any, from this action.
106
Table of Contents
Derivative Action
On September 13, 2022, a derivative action titled Federman v. Widmar, et al., Case No. 2:22-cv-01541-JAT, was filed by a putative
stockholder purportedly on behalf of the Company in the Arizona District Court against our current directors and certain officers of
the Company (collectively, “Derivative Action Defendants”), alleging violations of Section 14(a) of the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, breach of fiduciary duties, contribution and indemnification, aiding and abetting, and gross mismanagement. The complaint
generally alleges that the Derivative Action Defendants caused or allowed false and misleading statements to be made concerning
the Company’s Series 6 modules and project development business. The action includes claims for, among other things, damages in
favor of the Company and an award of costs and expenses to the putative plaintiff stockholder, including attorneys’ fees. The
Company believes that the plaintiff in the derivative action lacks standing to pursue litigation on behalf of First Solar. On February
17, 2023, the case was transferred to Judge Liburdi, who is also presiding over the related putative class action. The plaintiff in the
derivative action intends to file an amended derivative complaint, which the parties have jointly stipulated will be due by March 10,
2023. Given the early stage of the litigation, at this time we are not in a position to assess the likelihood of any potential loss or
adverse effect on our financial condition or to estimate the amount or range of possible loss, if any, from this action.
Opt Out Action
First Solar was party to a suit titled Maverick Fund, L.D.C. v. First Solar, Inc., et al., Case No. 2:15-cv-01156-ROS, filed in 2015 in
the Arizona District Court by putative stockholders that opted out of our previously settled class action lawsuit.
In July 2020, the parties executed a definitive settlement agreement pursuant to which First Solar agreed to pay a total of
$19 million in exchange for mutual releases and a dismissal with prejudice of the Opt-Out Action. The agreement contains no
admission of liability, wrongdoing, or responsibility by any of the defendants. On July 30, 2020, First Solar funded the settlement,
and on July 31, 2020, the parties filed a joint stipulation of dismissal. On September 10, 2020, the Arizona District Court entered an
order dismissing the case with prejudice. As of December 31, 2019, we accrued $13 million of estimated losses for this action. As a
result of the settlement, we accrued an incremental $6 million litigation loss during the year ended December 31, 2020.
Other Matters and Claims
On July 12, 2021, Southern Power Company and certain of its affiliates (“Southern”) filed an arbitration demand with the American
Arbitration Association against two subsidiaries of the Company, alleging breach of the EPC agreements for five projects in the
United States, for which the Company’s subsidiaries served as EPC contractor. The arbitration demand asserts breach of obligations
to design and engineer the projects in accordance with the EPC agreements, particularly as such obligations relate to the
procurement of tracker systems and inverters. The Company and its subsidiaries deny the claims, and defended the claims in
arbitration hearings, which concluded in late February 2023. At this time, the Company believes that Southern is seeking damages
of approximately $60 million. The parties are in the process of submitting post-hearing briefs and proposals, which are due in early
May 2023. The arbitration panel will choose from the parties’ proposals by issuing an award later this year. At this time, given the
inherent risks and uncertainties involved in arbitration, we believe the likelihood of a potential loss is reasonably possible, but we
are unable to estimate the amount or range of potential loss, if any, from this arbitration.
107
Table of Contents
During the year ended December 31, 2022, we received several indemnification demands from certain customers, for whom we
provided EPC services, regarding claims that such customers’ PV tracker systems infringe, in part, on patents owned by Sade, the
owner of a company called Trabant Solar, Inc. In January 2023, we were notified by two of our customers that Sade served them
with patent infringement complaints, and we have assumed the defense of these claims. We have conducted due diligence on the
patents and claims and believe that we will prevail in the actions. Additionally, we anticipate the commencement of an Inter Partes
Review before the United States Patent and Trademark Office seeking to invalidate such claims. Given the early stage of the
litigation, at this time we are not in a position to assess the likelihood of any potential loss or adverse effect on our financial
condition or to estimate the amount or range of possible loss, if any, from these actions.
We are party to other legal matters and claims in the normal course of our operations. While we believe the ultimate outcome of
these matters and claims will not have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations, or cash flows, the
outcome of such matters and claims is not determinable with certainty, and negative outcomes may adversely affect us.
13. Revenue from Contracts with Customers
The following table presents the disaggregation of revenue from contracts with customers for the years ended December 31, 2022,
2021, and 2020 along with the reportable segment for each category (in thousands):
Category Segment 2022 2021 2020
Solar modules Modules $ 2,428,278  $ 2,331,380  $ 1,736,060  
Solar power systems Other 153,290  513,362  794,797  
Energy generation (1) Other 25,756  37,614  61,948  
O&M services Other 11,995  43,060  115,590  
EPC services (2) Other — (2,039 ) 2,937  
Net sales $ 2,619,319  $ 2,923,377  $ 2,711,332  
——————————
(1) During the year ended December 31, 2020, the majority of energy generated and sold by our PV solar power systems was accounted for
under ASC 840 consistent with the classification of the associated PP As.
(2) For certain of our EPC agreements, we provide an energy performance test during the first or second year of a system’ s operation to
demonstrate that the actual energy generation for the applicable period meets or exceeds the modeled energy expectation, after certain
adjustments. If there is an underperformance event with regard to these tests, we may incur liquidated damages as specified in the
applicable EPC agreement. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we accrued liquidated damages for certain of these agreements,
which we recognized as a reduction to revenue.
We recognize revenue for module sales at a point in time following the transfer of control of the modules to the customer, which
typically occurs upon shipment or delivery depending on the terms of the underlying contracts. Such contracts may contain
provisions that require us to make liquidated damage payments to the customer if we fail to ship or deliver modules by scheduled
dates. We recognize these liquidated damages as a reduction of revenue in the period we transfer control of the modules to the
customer.
We recognize revenue for sales of development projects or completed systems when we enter into the associated sales contract. For
certain prior project sales, including sales of solar power systems with EPC services, such revenue included estimated amounts of
variable consideration. These estimates may require significant judgment to determine the most likely amount of net contract
revenues. The cumulative effect of revisions to estimates is recorded in the period in which the revisions are identified and the
amounts can be reasonably estimated. During the years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021, we recorded revenue of $1.5 million
and $71.3 million, respectively, due to net changes in transaction prices for certain projects we previously sold, which represented
0.9% and 2.1% of the aggregate revenue for such projects, respectively. Changes for the year ended December 31, 2021 were
primarily due to a $65.1 million settlement of an outstanding indemnification arrangement associated with the prior sale of a
project. See Note 12. “Commitments and Contingencies” to our consolidated financial statements for discussion of
108
Table of Contents
our indemnification arrangements. During the year ended December 31, 2020, revenue decreased $17.0 million due to net changes
in transaction prices for certain projects we previously sold, partially offset by a $7.5 million increase in revenue due to net changes
in input cost estimates for such projects, which represented 0.5% of the aggregate revenue for such projects.
The following table reflects the changes in our contract assets, which we classify as “Accounts receivable unbilled, net” and our
contract liabilities, which we classify as “Deferred revenue,” for the year ended December 31, 2022 (in thousands):
 2022 2021 Change
Accounts receivable unbilled, net (1) $ 42,152  $ 46,113 $ (3,961 ) (9)%
Deferred revenue $ 1,207,940  $ 297,81 1 $ 910,129  306 %
——————————
(1) Includes $11.5 million and $20.8 million of noncurrent accounts receivable unbilled, net classified as “Other assets” on our consolidated
balance sheets as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively .
During the year ended December 31, 2022, our contract assets decreased by $4.0 million primarily due to billings for certain prior
project sales. During the year ended December 31, 2022, our contract liabilities increased by $910.1 million primarily due to
advance payments received for sales of solar modules in the current year, partially offset by the recognition of revenue for sales of
solar modules for which payment was received in prior years. During the years ended December 31, 2022 and 2021, we recognized
revenue of $279.1 million and $182.0 million, respectively, that was included in the corresponding contract liability balance at the
beginning of the periods.
As of December 31, 2022, we had entered into contracts with customers for the future sale of 61.4 GW of solar modules for an
aggregate transaction price of $17.7 billion, which we expect to recognize as revenue through 2029 as we transfer control of the
modules to the customers. Such aggregate transaction price excludes estimates of variable consideration associated with (i) future
module technology improvements, including new product designs and enhancements to certain energy related attributes, (ii) the
extension of the ITC, (iii) sales freight in excess of a defined threshold, (iv) changes to certain commodity prices, and (v) the
module wattage committed for delivery, among other things. As a result, the revenue recognized from such contracts may increase
or decrease in future periods relative to the original transaction price. These contracts may also be subject to amendments made by
us or requested by our customers. These amendments may increase or decrease the volume of modules to be sold under the
contract, change delivery schedules, or otherwise adjust the expected revenue under these contracts.
14. Stockholders’ Equity
Preferred Stock
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, we had authorized 30,000,000 shares of undesignated preferred stock, $0.001 par value, none
of which was issued and outstanding. Our board of directors is authorized to determine the rights, preferences, and restrictions on
any series of preferred stock that we may issue.
Common Stock
As of December 31, 2022 and 2021, we had authorized 500,000,000 shares of common stock, $0.001 par value, of which
106,609,094 and 106,332,315 shares, respectively, were issued and outstanding. Each share of common stock is entitled to a single
vote. We have not declared or paid any dividends through December 31, 2022.DC
109
Table of Contents
15. Share-Based Compensation
The following table presents share-based compensation expense recognized in our consolidated statements of operations for the
years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
Cost of sales (1) $ 3,174  $ 892 $ 3,183  
Selling, general and administrative (1) 22,367  19,578  22,093  
Research and development (2) 3,080  432 3,991  
Production start-up 35 — — 
Total share-based compensation expense $ 28,656  $ 20,902  $ 29,267  
——————————
(1) On March 31, 2021, we completed the sales of our North American O&M operations and U.S. project development business, which
resulted in the forfeiture of unvested shares for associates departing the Company as part of the transactions. See Note 3. “Sales of
Businesses” to our consolidated financial statements for further information related to these transactions.
(2) Effective March 15, 2021, our former Chief Technology Officer retired from the Company , which resulted in the forfeiture of his
unvested shares during the year ended December 31, 2021.
Share-based compensation expense capitalized in inventory and PV solar power systems was $0.3 million and $0.7 million as of
December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively. As of December 31, 2022, we had $36.5 million of unrecognized share-based
compensation expense related to unvested restricted stock and performance units, which we expect to recognize over a weighted-
average period of approximately 1.6 years. During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, we recognized an income
tax benefit in our statement of operations of $7.3 million, $7.5 million, and $7.3 million, respectively, related to share-based
compensation expense, including excess tax benefits. We authorize our transfer agent to issue new shares, net of shares withheld for
taxes as appropriate, for the vesting of restricted stock and performance units or grants of unrestricted stock.
Share-Based Compensation Plans
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we adopted our 2020 Omnibus Plan, under which directors, officers, employees, and
consultants of First Solar, Inc. (including any of its affiliates) are eligible to participate in various forms of share-based
compensation. The 2020 Omnibus Plan is administered by the compensation committee(or any other committee designated by our
board of directors), which is authorized to, among other things, determine the recipients of grants, the exercise price, and the
vesting schedule of any awards made under the 2020 Omnibus Plan. Our board of directors may amend, modify, or terminate the
2020 Omnibus Plan without the approval of our stockholders, except for amendments that would increase the maximum number of
shares of our common stock available for awards under the 2020 Omnibus Plan, increase the maximum number of shares of our
common stock that may be delivered by incentive stock options, or modify the requirements for participation in the 2020 Omnibus
Plan.
The 2020 Omnibus Plan provides for the grant of incentive stock options, non-qualified stock options, stock appreciation rights,
restricted shares, restricted stock units, performance units, cash incentive awards, performance compensation awards, and other
equity-based and equity-related awards. In addition, the shares underlying any forfeited, expired, terminated, or canceled awards, or
shares surrendered as payment for taxes required to be withheld, become available for new award grants. We may not grant awards
under the 2020 Omnibus Plan after 2030, which is the tenth anniversary of the 2020 Omnibus Plan’s approval by our stockholders.
As of December 31, 2022, we had 6,500,832 shares available for future issuance under the 2020 Omnibus Plan.
110
Table of Contents
Restricted Stock and Performance Units
We issue shares to the holders of restricted stock units on the date the restricted units vest. The majority of shares issued are net of
applicable withholding taxes, which we pay on behalf of our associates. As a result, the actual number of shares issued will be less
than the number of restricted stock units granted. Prior to vesting, restricted stock units do not have dividend equivalent rights or
voting rights, and the shares underlying the restricted stock units are not considered issued and outstanding.
In April 2018, the compensation committee approved grants of performance units for key executive officers and associates to be
earned over an approximately three-year performance period, which ended in December 2020. Vesting of the 2018 grants of
performance units was contingent upon the relative attainment of target gross margin, operating expense, and contracted revenue
metrics. In February 2021, the compensation committee certified the achievement of the vesting conditions applicable to the grants,
which approximated the target level of performance. Accordingly, each participant received one share of common stock for each
vested performance unit, net of any tax withholdings.
In July 2019, the compensation committee approved additional grants of performance units for key executive officers to be earned
over a multi-year performance period, which ended in December 2021. Vesting of the 2019 grants of performance units was
contingent upon the relative attainment of target cost per watt, module wattage, gross profit, and operating income metrics. In
March 2022, the compensation committee certified the achievement of the vesting conditions applicable to the grants, which
approximated the maximum level of performance. Accordingly, each participant received one share of common stock for each
vested performance unit granted, net of any tax withholdings.
In March 2020, the compensation committee approved additional grants of performance units for key executive officers to be
earned over a multi-year performance period, which ended in December 2022. Vesting of the 2020 grants of performance units is
contingent upon the relative attainment of target contracted revenue, module wattage, and return on capital metrics, to be certified
by the compensation committee in 2023.
In May 2021, the compensation committee approved additional grants of performance units for key executive officers. Such grants
are expected to be earned over a multi-year performance period ending in December 2023. Vesting of the 2021 grants of
performance units is contingent upon the relative attainment of target contracted revenue, cost per watt, incremental average selling
price, and operating income metrics.
In March 2022, the compensation committee approved additional grants of performance units for key executive officers. Such
grants are expected to be earned over a multi-year performance period ending in December 2024. Vesting of the 2022 grants of
performance units is contingent upon the relative attainment of target contracted revenue, cost per watt, and return on capital
metrics.
Vesting of performance units is also contingent upon the employment of program participants through the applicable vesting dates,
with limited exceptions in case of death, disability, a qualifying retirement, or a change-in-control of First Solar. Outstanding
performance units are included in the computation of diluted net income per share based on the number of shares that would be
issuable if the end of the reporting period were the end of the contingency period.
In February 2022, First Solar adopted a Clawback Policy (“the Policy”) that applies to the Company’s current and former
Section 16 officers. The Policy applies to all incentive compensation, including any performance-based annual incentive awards
and performance-based equity compensation. The Policy was adopted to ensure that incentive compensation is paid or awarded
based on accurate financial results and the correct calculation of performance against incentive targets.
111
Table of Contents
The following is a summary of our restricted stock unit activity, including performance unit activity, for the year ended
December 31, 2022:
 
 
  
Number of SharesWeighted-
Average
Grant-Date
Fair Value
Unvested restricted stock units at December 31, 2021 1,316,860 $ 60.09  
Restricted stock units granted (1) 462,234 89.21  
Restricted stock units vested (425,019 ) 62.20  
Restricted stock units forfeited (43,188 ) 64.86  
Unvested restricted stock units at December 31, 2022 1,310,887 $ 69.51  
——————————
(1) Restricted stock units granted include the maximum amount of performance units available for issuance under our long-term incentive
program for key executive officers and associates. The actual number of shares to be issued will depend on the relative attainment of the
performance metrics described above.
We estimate the fair value of our restricted stock unit awards based on our stock price on the grant date. For the years ended
December 31, 2021 and 2020, the weighted-average grant-date fair value for restricted stock units granted in such years was $78.86
and $45.01, respectively. The total fair value of restricted stock units vested during 2022, 2021, and 2020 was $26.4 million, $27.8
million, and $32.9 million, respectively.
Unrestricted Stock
During the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, we awarded 19,868; 19,513; and 27,731, respectively, of fully vested,
unrestricted shares of our common stock, excluding amounts withheld for taxes, to the chairman and independent members of our
board of directors. Accordingly, we recognized $1.9 million, $1.8 million, and $1.5 million of share-based compensation expense
for these awards during the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, respectively.
112
Table of Contents
16. Income Taxes
In August 2022, the U.S. President signed into law the IRA, which revised U.S. tax law by, among other things, including a new
CAMT of 15% on certain large corporations, imposing a 1% excise tax on stock buybacks, and providing various incentives to
address climate change, including the introduction of the advanced manufacturing production credit. The provisions of the IRA are
generally effective for tax years beginning after 2022. Given the complexities of the IRA, which is pending technical guidance and
regulations from the IRS and U.S. Treasury Department, we will continue to monitor these developments and evaluate the potential
future impact to our results of operations.
In November 2022, the U.S. Treasury Department released proposed foreign tax credit (“FTC”) regulations addressing various
aspects of the U.S. FTC regime. Among other items, these proposed regulations provide certain exceptions for determining
creditable foreign withholding taxes. Taxpayers may rely on these proposed regulations, which apply to tax years beginning on or
after December 28, 2021. As a result of these proposed regulations, foreign withholding taxes will continue to be creditable.
In March 2020, the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (the “CARES Act”) was signed into law. The CARES Act
includes a number of federal corporate tax relief provisions that are intended to support the ongoing liquidity of U.S. corporations.
Among other provisions, the CARES Act allows net operating losses incurred in 2018, 2019, and 2020 to be carried back to each of
the five preceding taxable years. As a result of the CARES Act, we expect to carry back our 2019 and 2020 net operating losses to
our 2016 U.S. corporate income tax return, which restores certain foreign tax credits we expect to utilize by amending our 2017 and
2018 U.S. corporate income tax returns. Such amended returns restore other general business credits we expect to utilize in future
tax years before the credits expire and eliminate the transition tax liability for accumulated earnings of foreign subsidiaries resulting
from the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act. As a result, we recorded a tax benefit of $89.7 million for the year ended December 31, 2020,
which represents the one-time income tax benefit for the difference between the statutory federal corporate income tax rate of 35%
applicable to our 2016 U.S. corporate income tax return and the current federal corporate income tax rate of 21%. Any changes to
the estimate will be recorded in the period the carry back claims are filed.
Although we continue to evaluate our plans for the reinvestment or repatriation of unremitted foreign earnings, we expect to
indefinitely reinvest the earnings of our foreign subsidiaries to fund our international operations, with the exception of certain
subsidiaries for which applicable taxes have been recorded as of December 31, 2022. Accordingly, we have not recorded any
provision for additional U.S. or foreign withholding taxes related to the outside basis differences of our foreign subsidiaries in
which we expect to indefinitely reinvest their earnings. However, our future plans for repatriation of unremitted foreign earnings
could be affected by our current and future expansion activities and the timing of the IRA credits, the majority of which are
expected to be refunded in cash.
The U.S. and non-U.S. components of our income or loss before income taxes for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and
2020 were as follows (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
U.S. (loss) income $ (17,652 )$ 315,297  $ 22,475  
Non-U.S. income 26,250  256,865  270,715  
Income before taxes and equity in earnings $ 8,598  $ 572,162  $ 293,190  
113
Table of Contents
The components of our income tax expense or benefit for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 were as follows (in
thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
Current expense (benefit):    
Federal $ 8,434  $ 9,531  $ (149,162 )
State 399 3,469  4,027  
Foreign 49,984  10,109  26,303  
Total current expense (benefit) 58,817  23,109  (118,832 )
Deferred (benefit) expense:    
Federal (13,928 ) 58,510  12,681  
State (700) 3,775  7,591  
Foreign 8,575  18,075  (8,734 )
Total deferred (benefit) expense (6,053 ) 80,360  11,538  
Total income tax expense (benefit) $ 52,764  $ 103,469  $ (107,294 )
Our Malaysian subsidiary has been granted a long-term tax holiday that expires in 2027. The tax holiday, which generally provides
for a full exemption from Malaysian income tax, is conditional upon our continued compliance with meeting certain employment
and investment thresholds, which we are currently in compliance with and expect to continue to comply with through the expiration
of the tax holiday in 2027.
Our Vietnamese subsidiary had previously been granted a tax incentive that provided a two-year tax exemption, which began in
2020, and reduced annual tax rates through the end of 2025. In May 2022, our Vietnamese subsidiary was granted a new long-term
tax incentive that provides an additional two-year tax exemption and reduced annual tax rates through 2036, conditional upon our
continued compliance with certain revenue and R&D spending thresholds, which we are currently in compliance with and expect to
continue to comply with through the expiration of the tax holiday.
Our income tax results differed from the amount computed by applying the relevant U.S. statutory federal corporate income tax rate
to our income or loss before income taxes for the following reasons for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in
thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
 Tax Percent Tax Percent Tax Percent
Statutory income tax expense $ 1,806  21.0 %$ 120,154  21.0 %$ 61,570  21.0 %
Effect of tax holiday 27,424  318.9  % (32,339 ) (5.7)% (11,500 ) (3.9)%
Changes in valuation allowance 22,239  258.6  % 2,603  0.5 % (31,671 ) (10.8)%
Non-deductible expenses 10,776  125.3  % 3,955  0.7 % 3,834  1.3 %
Change in tax contingency 4,326  50.3 % 2,198  0.4 % (59,010 ) (20.1)%
Foreign dividend income 2,857  33.2 % 2,611 0.5 % 3,004  1.0 %
Effect of CARES Act 1,127  13.1 % 1,880  0.3 % (89,699 ) (30.6)%
State tax, net of federal benefit 700 8.1 % 4,757  0.8 % 11,059  3.8 %
Share-based compensation (1,017 ) (11.8)% (2,991 ) (0.5)% (720) (0.2)%
Return to provision adjustments (1,767 ) (20.5)% (4,932 ) (0.9)% 2,414  0.8 %
Foreign tax rate dif ferential (4,227 ) (49.1)% 4,632  0.8 % 6,135  2.1 %
Tax credits (12,654 ) (147.2 )% (3,395 ) (0.6)% (8,091 ) (2.8)%
Other 1,174  13.8 % 4,336  0.8 % 5,381  1.8 %
Reported income tax expense (benefit) $ 52,764  613.7  %$ 103,469  18.1 %$ (107,294 ) (36.6)%
114
Table of Contents
During the year ended December 31, 2022, we received net tax refunds of $3.9 million. During the years ended December 31, 2021
and 2020, we made net tax payments of $38.2 million and $22.2 million, respectively.
Deferred income taxes reflect the net tax effects of temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities
calculated under U.S. GAAP and the amounts calculated for preparing our income tax returns. The items that gave rise to our
deferred taxes as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 were as follows (in thousands):
 2022 2021
Deferred tax assets:   
Net operating losses $ 122,950  $ 110,979  
Tax credits 103,260  86,885  
Capitalized research and development 32,932  — 
Accrued expenses 28,226  35,193  
Long-term contracts 23,531  9,065  
Compensation 13,167  10,551  
Equity in earnings 4,172  4,174  
Deferred expenses 1,735  1,786  
Inventory 1,490  10,057  
Restricted marketable securities and derivatives 357 — 
Goodwill and intangible assets 221 1,784  
Other 23,249  24,244  
Deferred tax assets, gross 355,290  294,718  
Valuation allowance (135,763 ) (123,917 )
Deferred tax assets, net of valuation allowance 219,527  170,801  
Deferred tax liabilities:   
Property , plant and equipment (150,477 ) (106,361 )
Investment in foreign subsidiaries (5,689 ) (15,583 )
Acquisition accounting / basis dif ference (4,065 ) (4,065 )
Capitalized interest (1,331 ) (1,338 )
Restricted marketable securities and derivatives — (4,337 )
Other (8,214 ) (7,654 )
Deferred tax liabilities (169,776 ) (139,338 )
Net deferred tax assets $ 49,751  $ 31,463  
We use the deferral method of accounting for investment tax credits under which the credits are recognized as reductions in the
carrying value of the related assets. The use of the deferral method also results in a basis difference from the recognition of a
deferred tax asset and an immediate income tax benefit for the future tax depreciation of the related assets. Such basis differences
are accounted for pursuant to the income statement method.
The following table shows changes in the valuation allowance against our deferred tax assets during the years ended December 31,
2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
Valuation allowance, beginning of year $ 123,917  $ 127,71 1 $ 151,705  
Additions 58,922  8,976  23,884  
Reversals (47,076 ) (12,770 ) (47,878 )
Valuation allowance, end of year $ 135,763  $ 123,917  $ 127,71 1 
115
Table of Contents
We maintained a valuation allowance of $135.8 million and $123.9 million as of December 31, 2022 and 2021, respectively,
against certain of our deferred tax assets, as it is more likely than not that such amounts will not be fully realized. During the year
ended December 31, 2022, the valuation allowance increased by $11.8 million primarily due to current year operating losses in
certain jurisdictions, partially offset by the partial release of the valuation allowance in jurisdictions with current year operating
income.
As of December 31, 2022, we had federal and aggregate state net operating loss carryforwards of $9.0 million and $423.3 million,
respectively. As of December 31, 2021, we had federal and aggregate state net operating loss carryforwards of $10.4 million and
$428.5 million, respectively. If not used, the federal net operating loss carryforwards incurred prior to 2018 will begin to expire in
2030, and the state net operating loss carryforwards will begin to expire in 2029. Federal net operating losses arising in tax years
beginning in 2018 may be carried forward indefinitely, and the associated deduction is limited to 80% of taxable income. The
utilization of our net operating loss carryforwards is also subject to an annual limitation under Section 382 of the IRC due to
changes in ownership. Based on our analysis, we do not believe such limitation will impact our realization of the net operating loss
carryforwards as we anticipate utilizing them prior to expiration.
As of December 31, 2022, we had U.S. foreign tax credit carryforwards of $9.3 million, federal and state research and development
credit carryforwards of $63.8 million, and investment tax credits of $55.4 million available to reduce future federal and state
income tax liabilities. If not used, these credits will begin to expire in 2028, 2029, and 2029, respectively.
The following table shows a reconciliation of the beginning and ending amount of liabilities associated with uncertain tax positions
for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
Unrecognized tax benefits, beginning of year $ 7,811 $ 5,370  $ 72,169  
Increases related to prior year tax positions 4,569  — 169 
Decreases related to prior year tax positions — (44) (256)
Decreases from lapse in statute of limitations (361) (492) (67,396 )
Increases related to current tax positions 2,474  2,977  684 
Unrecognized tax benefits, end of year $ 14,493  $ 7,811 $ 5,370  
If recognized, $14.5 million of unrecognized tax benefits, excluding interest and penalties, would reduce our annual effective tax
rate. Due to the uncertain and complex application of tax laws and regulations, it is possible that the ultimate resolution of uncertain
tax positions may result in liabilities that could be materially different from these estimates. In such an event, we will record
additional tax expense or benefit in the period in which such resolution occurs. Our policy is to recognize any interest and penalties
that we may incur related to our tax positions as a component of income tax expense or benefit. During the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020, we recognized interest and penalties of $0.3 million, $0.3 million, and $5.3 million,
respectively, related to unrecognized tax benefits.
We are subject to audit by federal, state, local, and foreign tax authorities. We are currently under examination in India, Japan,
Chile, Singapore, and the state of California. We believe that adequate provisions have been made for any adjustments that may
result from tax examinations. However, the outcome of tax examinations cannot be predicted with certainty. If any issues addressed
by our tax examinations are not resolved in a manner consistent with our expectations, we could be required to adjust our provision
for income taxes in the period such resolution occurs.
116
Table of Contents
The following table summarizes the tax years that are either currently under audit or remain open and subject to examination by the
tax authorities in the most significant jurisdictions in which we operate:
 Tax Years
Vietnam 2012 - 2021
Singapore 2017 - 2021
United States 2018 - 2021
Malaysia 2019 - 2021
In certain of the jurisdictions noted above, we operate through more than one legal entity, each of which has different open years
subject to examination. The table above presents the open years subject to examination for the most material of the legal entities in
each jurisdiction. Additionally, tax years are not closed until the statute of limitations in each jurisdiction expires. In the
jurisdictions noted above, the statute of limitations can extend beyond the open years subject to examination.
17. Net (Loss) Income per Share
The calculation of basic and diluted net (loss) income per share for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 was as
follows (in thousands, except per share amounts):
2022 2021 2020
Basic net (loss) income per share    
Numerator:    
Net (loss) income $ (44,166 )$ 468,693  $ 398,355  
Denominator:    
Weighted-average common shares outstanding 106,551 106,263 105,867
Diluted net (loss) income per share    
Denominator:    
Weighted-average common shares outstanding 106,551 106,263 105,867
Effect of restricted stock and performance units — 661 819 
Weighted-average shares used in computing diluted net (loss) income per share 106,551 106,924 106,686
Net (loss) income per share:
Basic $ (0.41)$ 4.41 $ 3.76 
Diluted $ (0.41)$ 4.38 $ 3.73 
The following table summarizes the potential shares of common stock that were excluded from the computation of diluted net
(loss) income per share for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 as such shares would have had an anti-dilutive
effect (in thousands):
2022 2021 2020
Anti-dilutive shares 576 14 —
117
Table of Contents
18. Accumulated Other Comprehensive Loss
The following table presents the changes in accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of tax, for the year ended December 31,
2022 (in thousands):
Foreign Currency
Translation
AdjustmentUnrealized (Loss)
Gain on
Marketable
Securities and
Restricted
Marketable
SecuritiesUnrealized Gain
(Loss) on
Derivative
Instruments Total
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $ (89,452 )$ (8,036 )$ 1,126  $ (96,362 )
Other comprehensive loss before reclassifications (27,306 ) (59,383 ) (7,556 ) (94,245 )
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive
loss (4,715 ) — (812) (5,527 )
Net tax ef fect — 2,639  1,678  4,317  
Net other comprehensive loss (32,021 ) (56,744 ) (6,690 ) (95,455 )
Balance as of December 31, 2022 $ (121,473 )$ (64,780 )$ (5,564 )$ (191,817 )
The following table presents the pretax amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into our consolidated
statements of operations for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
Comprehensive Income Components Income Statement Line Item 2022 2021 2020
Foreign currency translation adjustment:
Foreign currency translation adjustment Cost of sales $ — $ 269 $ 370 
Foreign currency translation adjustment Gain on sales of businesses, net 3,756  — — 
Foreign currency translation adjustment Other income (expense), net 959 (1,203 ) 2,560  
Total foreign currency translation adjustment 4,715  (934) 2,930  
Unrealized gain on marketable securities and
restricted marketable securities Other income (expense), net — 11,696  15,346  
Unrealized gain (loss) on derivative instruments:
Foreign exchange forward contracts Cost of sales 1,671  (1,906 ) (1,199 )
Commodity swap contracts Cost of sales (859) 3,003  — 
Total unrealized gain (loss) on derivative
instruments 812 1,097  (1,199 )
Total gain reclassified $ 5,527  $ 11,859  $ 17,077  
118
Table of Contents
19. Segment and Geographical Information
Our primary segment is our modules business, which involves the design, manufacture, and sale of CdTe solar modules, which
convert sunlight into electricity. Third-party customers of our modules segment include developers and operators of systems,
utilities, independent power producers, commercial and industrial companies, and other system owners. Our residual business
operations include certain project development activities, O&M services, the results of operations from PV solar power systems we
owned and operated in certain international regions, and the sale of such systems to third-party customers.
Our business is managed by our Chief Executive Officer, who is also considered our chief operating decision maker (“CODM”).
Our CODM views sales of solar modules as the primary driver of our consolidated operating results. Our modules segment
contributes to our operating results by providing the fundamental technologies and solar modules that drive our business and sales
opportunities. Accordingly, our CODM generally makes decisions about allocating resources and assessing performance of the
company based on the gross profit of our modules segment. However, information about our modules segment assets is not
reported to the CODM for purposes of making such decisions. Accordingly, we exclude such asset information from our reportable
segment financial disclosures.
The following tables provide a reconciliation of certain financial information for our reportable segment to information presented in
our consolidated financial statements for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 (in thousands):
 Year Ended December 31, 2022
 Modules Other Total
Net sales $ 2,428,278  $ 191,041  $ 2,619,319  
Gross profit (loss) 115,397  (45,539 ) 69,858  
Depreciation and amortization expense 230,827  9,361  240,188  
Goodwill 14,462  — 14,462  
 Year Ended December 31, 2021
 Modules Other Total
Net sales $ 2,331,380  $ 591,997  $ 2,923,377  
Gross profit 472,926  257,028  729,954  
Depreciation and amortization expense 219,712  12,189  231,901  
Goodwill 14,462  — 14,462  
 Year Ended December 31, 2020
 Modules Other Total
Net sales $ 1,736,060  $ 975,272  $ 2,711,332  
Gross profit 429,131  251,542  680,673  
Depreciation and amortization expense 181,402  20,813  202,215  
Goodwill 14,462  — 14,462  
119
Table of Contents
The following table presents net sales for the years ended December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020 by geographic region, based on the
customer country of invoicing (in thousands):
 2022 2021 2020
United States $ 2,193,619  $ 2,456,597  $ 1,843,433  
Chile 173,279  32,050  21,870  
France 67,656  121,537  127,097  
Japan 46,426  207,609  469,657  
India 37,215  37,650  33,848  
Canada 82 5,288  118,865  
All other foreign countries 101,042  62,646  96,562  
Net sales $ 2,619,319  $ 2,923,377  $ 2,711,332  
The following table presents long-lived assets, which include property, plant and equipment, operating lease assets, project assets,
and PV solar power systems as of December 31, 2022 and 2021 by geographic region, based on the physical location of the assets
(in thousands):
 2022 2021
United States $ 1,876,218  $ 1,112,369  
Malaysia 791,750  862,156  
Vietnam 611,031  652,639  
India 341,616  106,966  
Japan 30,454  420,071  
Chile — 213,846  
All other foreign countries 15,368  21,865  
Long-lived assets $ 3,666,437  $ 3,389,912  
120
Table of Contents
20. Concentrations of Risks
Customer Concentration Risk. The following customers each comprised 10% or more of our total net sales for the years ended
December 31, 2022, 2021, and 2020:
 2022 2021 2020
 % of Net Sales % of Net Sales % of Net Sales
Customer #1 14 % * *
Customer #2 10 % * *
Customer #3 10 % * *
Customer #4 * 12 % *
Customer #5 * 10 % 11 %
Customer #6 * * 10 %
——————————
* Net sales for these customers were less than 10% of our total net sales for the period.
Supplier Risk. Several of our key raw materials and components, in particular CdTe and substrate glass, and manufacturing
equipment are either single-sourced or sourced from a limited number of suppliers. Failure of any of our key suppliers to perform
could disrupt our supply chain and adversely impact our operations by impairing our ability to deliver solar modules to customers
in the required quality and quantities and at a price that is profitable to us.
Production Risk. Shortages of essential components and equipment could occur due to increases in demand or interruptions of
supply, which may be exacerbated by the availability of logistics services, thereby adversely affecting our ability to meet customer
demand for our products. Our solar modules are currently produced at our facilities in Perrysburg, Ohio; Lake Township, Ohio;
Kulim, Malaysia; and Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam. Damage to or disruption of these facilities could interrupt our business and
adversely affect our ability to generate net sales.
121
Table of Contents
INDEX TO EXHIBITS
The following exhibits are filed with or incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10-K:
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
First FilingExhibit
Number
3.1 Amended and Restated Certificate of Incorporation of First Solar , Inc. S-1/A 333-135574 10/25/06 3.1
3.2 Amended and Restated Bylaws of First Solar , Inc. 8-K 001-33156 7/23/21 3.1
4.1 Description of the Registrant’ s Securities 10-K 001-33156 2/21/20 4.1
10.1+ Form of Change in Control Severance Agreement S-1/A 333-135574 10/25/06 10.15
10.2 Form of Director and Of ficer Indemnification Agreement 10-K 001-33156 2/27/13 10.20
10.3+ Employment Agreement, dated March 15, 2011, and Change in
Control Severance Agreement, dated April 4, 2011 between First
Solar , Inc. and Mark Widmar10-Q 001-33156 5/5/1 1 10.3
10.4+ Employment Agreement, effective July 1, 2012, and Change in
Control Severance Agreement, effective July 1, 2012 between First
Solar , Inc. and Geor ges Antoun10-Q 001-33156 8/3/12 10.1
10.5+ Non-Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of
March 15, 201 1, between First Solar , Inc. and Mark Widmar10-Q 001-33156 5/7/13 10.2
10.6+ Change in Control Severan ce Agreement, effective as of July 1, 2012,
between First Solar , Inc. and Geor ges Antoun10-Q 001-33156 5/7/13 10.3
10.7+ Amendment to Change in Control Severance Agreement 10-Q 001-33156 8/7/13 10.1
10.8 Restricted Cash Assignment of Deposits 10-Q 001-33156 8/6/14 10.2
10.9+ First Solar , Inc. 2015 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan DEF
14A001-33156 4/8/15 App. A
10.10+ Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of July 1, 2016,
between First Solar , Inc. and Mark Widmar , and Amendment to Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of July 1,
2016, between First Solar, Inc. and Mark Widmar , and Second
Amendment to Change-in- Control Severance Agreement, effective as
of July 1, 2016, between First Solar , Inc. and Mark Widmar10-Q 001-33156 4/28/16 10.1
10.11+ Employment Agreement, effective as of October 24, 2016, and
Change-in-Control Severance Agreement, effective as of October 24,
2016, between First Solar , Inc. and Alexander Bradley10-Q 001-33156 11/3/16 10.1
10.12+ Employment Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement,
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Agreem ent, and Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of October
7, 2019 between First Solar , Inc. and Caroline Stockdale10-K 001-33156 2/21/20 10.34
10.13+ Form of Performance Unit Award Agreement - Form Perf Unit-010 10-K 001-33156 2/21/20 10.46
10.14+ First Solar , Inc. 2020 Omnibus Incentive Compensation Plan DEF
14A001-33156 4/1/20 App. A
10.15+ Form of Grant Notice for 2020-2022 Executive Performance Equity
Plan10-Q 001-33156 5/8/20 10.1
10.16+ Employment Agreement, First Amendment to Employment
Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement, Confidentiality
and Intellectual Property Agreement, and Non-Comp etition and Non-
Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August 10, 2020 between First
Solar , Inc. and Patrick Buehler10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.1
10.17+ Employment Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement,
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Agreem ent, and Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August
10, 2020 between First Solar , Inc. and Jason Dymbort10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.2
122
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
First FilingExhibit
Number
10.18+ Employment Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement,
Confidentiality and Intellectual Property Agreem ent, and Non-
Competition and Non-Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August
10, 2020 between First Solar , Inc. and Markus Gloeckler10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.3
10.19+ Employment Agreement , First Amendment to Employment
Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement, Confidentiality
and Intellectual Property Agreement, and Non-Comp etition and Non-
Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August 10, 2020 between First
Solar , Inc. and Michael Koralewski10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.4
10.20+ First Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of October
8, 2020 between First Solar , Inc. and Caroline Stockdale10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.5
10.21+ Employment Agreement , First Amendment to Employment
Agreement, Change In Control Severance Agreement, Confidentiality
and Intellectual Property Agreement, and Non-Comp etition and Non-
Solicitation Agreement, effective as of August 10, 2020 between First
Solar , Inc. and Kuntal Kumar Verma10-Q 001-33156 10/28/20 10.6
10.22+ First Amendment to Employment Agreement, effective as of January
8, 2021 between First Solar , Inc. and Markus Gloeckler10-K 001-33156 2/26/21 10.46
10.23+ Form of Performance Unit Award Agreement - Form Perf Unit-01 1 10-K 001-33156 2/26/21 10.47
10.24+ Form of Performance Unit Award Agreement - Form Perf Unit-012 10-K 001-33156 2/26/21 10.48
10.25+ Form of Grant Notice for 2021-2023 Executive Performance Equity
Plan10-Q 001-33156 7/30/21 10.1
10.26+ Form of Performance Unit Award Agreement - Form Perf Unit-013 10-K 001-33156 3/1/22 10.31
10.27+ Form of Performance Unit Award Agreement - Form Perf Unit-014 10-Q 001-33156 4/28/22 10.1
10.28+ Form of Grant Notice for 2022-2024 Executive Performance Equity
Plan10-Q 001-33156 4/28/22 10.6
10.29‡§ Business Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated May 12, 2022, among
First Solar Japan GK, PAG Renewables Holding Pte. Ltd. and PAG
Renewables FM Holding Pte. Ltd.10-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.1
10.30‡§ First Amendment to Business Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated
June 24, 2022, among First Solar Japan GK, PAG Renewables
Holding Pte. Ltd. and P AG Renewables FM Holding Pte. Ltd.10-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.2
10.31‡§ Membership Interests Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated May 12,
2022, among First Solar Japan GK, Kyoto Solar Plant L.P., Yatsubo
Solar Plant L.P., Momura Solar Plant L.P., Iwaki Solar Plant L.P., Hita
Solar Plant L.P., Shimo Onuki Solar Plant L.P., Orido Solar Plant L.P.,
Handa Solar Plant L.P . and Tochigi Solar Plant L.P .10-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.3
10.32‡§ First Amend ment to Membership Interests Purchase and Sale
Agreement, dated June 24, 2022, among First Solar Japan GK, Kyoto
Solar Plant L.P., Yatsubo Solar Plant L.P., Momura Solar Plant L.P.,
Iwaki Solar Plant L.P., Hita Solar Plant L.P., Shimo Onuki Solar Plant
L.P., Orido Solar Plant L.P., Handa Solar Plant L.P. and Tochigi Solar
Plant L.P .10-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.4
10.33‡§ TK Interests Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated May 12, 2022,
among TK Investco 7 Pte. Ltd., TK Investco 8 Pte. Ltd., TK Investco
10 Pte. Ltd., TK Investco 1 1 Pte. Ltd. and Gioia Investment Pte. Ltd.10-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.5
123
Table of Contents
Incorporated by Reference
Exhibit
Number Exhibit Description Form File No.Date of
First FilingExhibit
Number
10.34‡§ First Amendm ent to TK Interests Purchase and Sale Agreement, dated
June 24, 2022, among TK Investco 7 Pte. Ltd., TK Investco 8 Pte.
Ltd., TK Investco 10 Pte. Ltd., TK Investco 11 Pte. Ltd. and Gioia
Investment Pte. Ltd.10-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.6
10.35‡§ Finance Agreement between FS India Solar Ventures Private Limited
and United States International Development Finance Corporation
dated July 27, 202210-Q 001-33156 7/28/22 10.7
10.36‡§ Guaranty Agreement, dated August 4, 2022, between First Solar , Inc.
and United States International Development Finance Corporation10-Q 001-33156 10/27/22 10.1
10.37+* Form of Performance Unit Award Agreement - Form Perf Unit-015 — — — —
10.38+* Form of RSU Award Agreement — — — —
10.39+* Form of Grant Notice for RSU Award Agreement — — — —
10.40+* Form of Option Award Agreement — — — —
10.41+* Form of Share Award Agreement — — — —
10.42+* Form of Cash Incentive Award Agreement — — — —
10.43+* Form of Performance Cash Incentive Award Agreement — — — —
21.1* List of Subsidiaries of First Solar , Inc. — — — —
23.1* Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm — — — —
31.1* Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)
and 15d-14(a), as amended— — — —
31.2* Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a)
and 15d-14(a), as amended— — — —
32.1† Certification of Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer
pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section
906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002— — — —
101.INS* XBRL  Instan ce Document – the instance document does not appear in
the Interactive Data file because its XBRL  tags are embedded within
the Inline XBRL  document— — — —
101.SCH* XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Schema Document — — — —
101.CAL* XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document — — — —
101.DEF* XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document — — — —
101.LAB* XBRL  Taxonomy Label Linkbase Document — — — —
101.PRE* XBRL  Taxonomy Extension Presentation Document — — — —
104* Cover page formatted as Inline XBRL  and contained in Exhibit 101 — — — —
——————————
+    Management contract, compensatory plan, or arrangement.
‡    Portions of this exhibit have been redacted in compliance with Item 601(b)(10) of Regulation S-K.
§    Exhibits and schedules have been omitted pursuant to Item 601(a)(5) of Regulation S-K.
*    Filed herewith.
†    Furnishe d herewith. This exhibit shall not be deemed “filed” for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 or
otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section, nor shall it be deemed incorporated by reference in any filing under the Securities Act
of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, whether made before or after the date hereof and irrespective of any general
incorporation language in any filings.
Item 16. Form 10-K Summary
None.
124
Table of Contents
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
FIRST  SOLAR, INC.
Date: February 28, 2023 By: /s/ BYRON JEFFERS
Name: Byron Jef fers
Title: Chief Accounting Of ficer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Title Date
/s/ MARK R. WIDMAR Chief Executive Of ficer and Director February 28, 2023
Mark R. Widmar
/s/ ALEXANDER R. BRADLEY Chief Financial Of ficer February 28, 2023
Alexander R. Bradley
/s/ MICHAEL  J. AHEARN Chairman of the Board of Directors February 28, 2023
Michael J. Ahearn
/s/ RICHARD D. CHAPMAN Director February 28, 2023
Richard D. Chapman
/s/ ANIT A MARANGOL Y GEORGE Director February 28, 2023
Anita Marangoly Geor ge
/s/ GEORGE A. HAMBRO Director February 28, 2023
Geor ge A. Hambro
/s/ MOLL Y E. JOSEPH Director February 28, 2023
Molly E. Joseph
/s/ CRAIG KENNEDY Director February 28, 2023
Craig Kennedy
/s/ LISA  A. KRO Director February 28, 2023
Lisa A. Kro
/s/ WILLIAM J. POST Director February 28, 2023
William J. Post
/s/ PAUL  H. STEBBINS Director February 28, 2023
Paul H. Stebbins
/s/ MICHAEL  SWEENEY Director February 28, 2023
Michael Sweeney
/s/ NORMAN L. WRIGHT Director February 28, 2023
Norman L. Wright
125
